CHAPTER I.
THE PROCESSION.
`
Stand
aside, serf!' were the stern tones of an officer, addressed to a youth.
With a thousand others, he was watching the procession of the Priests
of the sun, headed by the emperor and his nobles, on the way to offer
sacrifices at each gate of the city, to propitiate the wrath of their Deity
for rain had not fallen on the earth for the space of eleven weeks, and the
fierce sun had burned up the harvests.
The eyes of this youth seemed to be fixed more particularly on the
princess Eylla, than on the spectacle, gorgeous as it was, with its seas of
plumes and banners; its glittering helms and golden shields; its trains of
knights in silver armor, and brazen chariots, with silken canopies of green
and gold, containing beautiful virgins of the sun, glorious in their robes of
white, and beaming coronets of stars.
`Stand aside, serf!' cried the officer a second time to the unheeding
youth, and, at the same instant, the glittering point of a long, slender spear
he carried, pricked the breast of the young man, who, ere it could
penetrate
,
caught it in his hand, wrenched it from his grasp, broke it in twain,
and cast the pieces disdainfully at his feet.
`Ha! It is the slave Montezuma!' cried the infuriated officer. `He
has mocked us full long. Cut him down!'
But ere the soldiers which formed the guard about the emperor and his
daughter, and which the officer commanded, could obey, the crowd opened
to the right and left and received the destined victim into its bosom.
`Hew your way to him,' cried the emperor, whose attention had been
drawn to the scene, and who now beheld the citizens protecting the offender;
`cut the slaves in pieces!'
`Nay, my father, will you let blood be spilled on this sacred time?'
plead the sweet and earnest voice of the princess Eylla, who, riding in
the imperial chariot beside the emperor, also witnessed the affray.
`They are my slaves, and it is in their blood that I float above their
heads,' was the stern reply of the tyrant.
`Nay, father! see how the poor people fall before the weapons of the
fierce guards! And look! others, as fast as their fellows are slain, press up
to fill the gap, and, with their devoted hearts, place a barrier between thy
vengeance and its victim!'
`Therefore should they die for thus daring to thwart my will! On your
life, noble,' he called to the governor of his guard, `let not the insolent
slave escape!'
`Spare him  O, spare them! For my sake, sire, bid them hold,' plead
the princess earnestly.
`Dost thou plead for a few score bondmen, daughter! If I let this pass,
the slaves will beard me on my throne!'
`Alas! such fearful slaughter!' she cried, covering her eyes from the
scene. `Father! Emperor!' she again exclaimed, falling at his feet in
the chariot, `shall Eylla plead in vain!'
`Ascala, call off your guards! Their insolence is enough punished.
Hath the mover of it been slain?'
`Thrice he strove to force himself upon our blades,' answered the noble,
`armed with the pike-end he wrested from me, but the multitude held him
back. Thou seest him standing yonder, taller by the head than his fellows,
gazing on thee with defiance.'
The lovely princess had fallen upon the emperor's neck, as he yielded to
her tears, and gratefully kissed him. With strange affection for one so
sanguinary
in his disposition, he tenderly returned it upon her forehead, and
then sternly bade the procession move on.
But Eylla  for curiosity to gaze on a man, for whom so many had given
their lives, had led her to seek him in the crowd, ere the noble pointed him
out  did not pass on before she met, and received from the dark eyes of
the handsome young man, a look of grateful homage and acknowledgment.
The gentleness of the princess drew her as near to the hearts of her
subjects
,
as the sternness of her father removed him from them, so the youth
felt that it was no insult for his gaze, humble as he was, to seek the eye of
the princess, and thank her for her interposition.
But the mischief that glance did, cannot be estimated! The princess
Eylla rode on  but, from that moment, she forgot the procession,  her
father  every thing but the face of the youth for whom she had
interceded
.
Her mind, as she proceeded, became filled with curiosity to know
who he could be that held at his command, and willing devotion, the lives
of so many men; and then her thoughts run upon his lofty aspect and noble
bearing; recalled his grateful, yet respectful glance; dwelt upon the dark
fire of his fine eyes, and the expressive manly beauty of his countenance.
But the more she thought, the more bewildered she grew, till, at length,
recalled to herself by the approach of the procession to the Temple of the
Gate, she hung her head in confusion, and concealed within the silken folds
of her azure vesture the blush that crimsoned her virgin cheek.
CHAPTER II.
THE BALCONY.
In
the centre of the present empire of Mexico, and within the borders
of the beautiful country once inhabited by the ancestors of those wild and
splendid savages, the Comanchees, lies a chain of elevated mountains, whose
snowy peaks pierce the skies, leaving the vast fields of clouds floating
midway
between them and the plains. Towards the south they make a majestic
curve, and enclose within their embrace a lake twelve leagues in
circumference
,
on the bright bosom of which, like an emerald cast upon a mirror,
rests the beautiful island of Alcolo, the seat of the Aztec empire. One of
these mountains, which is called the peak of Ix, is loftier than the rest, and
on its inaccessible summit blazes a star-like point, which is said to be a
single diamond. This glittering apex is here called the `star of the Burning
Stone.' By day the dazzling point glows in the splendor of the cloudless
sun-light with all the dyes of the iris; by night its brightness is subdued,
and its light becomes pure and pale like the chastened radiance of the
moonbeam.
At the period of our story, this lake, with its central island and encircling
girdle of bright, snow-capped mountains, was the seat of an empire now no
more. From the midst of the fair island of Alcolo rose the proud city of
Mexico
,
its capital, gorgeous with golden domes, needle-like pinnacles, overlaid
with silver, majestic towers, and vast temples dedicated to the Sun, and to the
god of war; while through it, dividing it into two parts, flowed a broad
artificial
river, which, for more than a league, reflected from its steel-like bosom
continuous lines of temples, palaces, and edifices of costly grandeur. Here
had been for ages the imperial palace and throne of the emperors, and here
still was the centre of wealth, power, and regal magnificence.
Ulyd
, the last monarch of his race, and of the Aztec dynasty, now sat on
the throne of this glorious empire. He was haughty, cruel, and imperious.
His foot rested upon the necks of his many millions of subjects, and his
sceptre was converted into a sword, which was hourly bathed in human
blood. But
Eylla
, the only daughter of the sanguinary emperor, was
gentle as the dove in temper; fearless as the eagle of her house in spirit;
as darkly beautiful as Lyn, the Angel of Flowers; and as graceful in form and
motion as the antelope, that runs upon the mountains. The tyrant loved his
daughter, and that love was all that humanized his nature. In one of the
lesser streets of this gorgeous capital, near the water, lived a poor net-maker,
Macho by name, whose sole merit was his honesty, and whose only income
was the daily pittance earned by the toil of his hands. He had lost his
wife, but Heaven had tempered its judgments with mercy, and left him a
son and daughter, to share his labors and solace his old age. Montezuma,
which was the name of the youth, was now twenty-three years of age. His
stature was lofty, and his port noble; while the highest manly grace and
beauty were stamped upon his face and person. His dignity was that of
virtue; his beauty that of a gentle temper and a cheerful heart. He was
doated on by his father, idolized by his sister, honored and beloved by
all of his degree in the city; but despised, so closely had nature allied him
to them, by all the nobles of the court. Such was Montezuma at the period
of our story. His sister, Fatziza, was four years his junior. She was the
loveliest virgin that bent her knee to adore the rising sun in all the city of
Mexico. The night was not darker than her hair, nor the stars that gem it
brighter than her eyes. Her voice was low and musical as the love-note of
the Thu, when at twilight he woos his mate amid the dark branches of the
zampzin-tree, and when she sang the groves that overhung the canal would
ring vocal with the answering melody of the Tzire, the bulbul of Alcolo.
She was as happy as a bird from morning till night, and her cheerful face, as
she went about the humble but neat little cot of the old net-maker, looking
after her domestic affairs, made glad the hearts of all who looked upon her;
and no heart did her smile make more glad than that of her lover, Sismarqui,
the handsome son of Ota, the renowned embosser of shields, who lived in the
adjoining street.
It was on the same hour of the afternoon in which the events connected
with the passage of the procession through the street leading from the
temple of the sun to the east gate occurred, that the beautiful Fatziza,
ignorant
of what had happened, was seated on the little cane-balcony, that
projected
above the sidewalk of the narrow street in which she lived. She was
arrayed in the neat, virgin attire becoming her condition, and her dark hair,
besides being plaited and bound with the usual fillet, was ornamented with a
simple white flower of the
tepala
, for it was near the time that Sismarqui
was wont to pass, on his way from the shop towards the imperial armory,
followed by his father's two apprentices, laden with the shields that had been
embossed that day. The little balcony in which she sat was not curiously
latticed and adorned with pictured, silken curtains, like the more spacious
verandahs that ornamented the houses of the better class of citizens, but
instead was protected by a screen of green net-work, netted by her own
fingers. It was now drawn aside, to admit more freely the breeze from the
water, so that if any among the passing crowd should chance to cast their
eyes upward, they could easily have discovered her; and many, indeed,
were the enamored youth, that stopped to linger and gaze upon her beauty,
as, unconscious of their admiration, she bent her face over a piece of useful
needlework, on which she was industriously employed.
Let it not be supposed, that it was female vanity that brought Fatziza to
sit so openly above her father's shop-door. In that paradisial climate,
where the air is ever mild and halmy, where summer weds with autumn
but to produce a spring of fruit and flowers in endless succession, the
artificers
,
and humbler citizens of that degree, knew no other apartment in
which to assemble for enjoying the evening time, than the light balconies
that shaded their shop-dwellings. Here Fatziza had sat from childhood,
evening after evening, and with a child's innocence of purpose she had now
taken her accustomed seat there this evening. She expected her lover too;
and at every third stitch in her needle-work, she glanced up the street to see
if he was yet coming. The street was called the Street of the Net-makers,
from the number of that craft dwelling in it, and terminated at the canal;
so that her father's house, being the last in it, one end of it overhung the
water. At this end was also a balcony, projecting from her brother's room,
and which, by a narrow terrace, was connected with that on the street where
she was seated. By going a few steps round this platform, therefore,
Fatziza could command a wide view of the gay canal, with its gilt and
painted barges, of every fantastic shape, whether of bird, beast, or fish, or of
fabled monster, moving in various directions upon its placid bosom, and an
extended line of the palaces of the Aztec noblemen on the opposite shore,
with the Temple of the Sun rising majestically in the midst of them; while in
the distance, the sky-piercing boundary of snowy peaks glittered in the
beams of the setting sun, as if helmed with gold. But she had seen this scene
every day of her life, and the canal had no charm for her eye, save when, at
the monthly feasts of the sun, she could behold, as she had thrice done, her
lover outstripping, in the aquatic race, fleets of competitors, and bearing off
from the steps of the island altar, the silver ore with which the high priest
rewarded the victor.
Her thoughts were running upon these achievements of her lover, when
suddenly the sound of steel ringing against steel arrested her ear, and she
looked up from her needle with a heightened glow, and with the exclamation,
`He is coming.'
But, instead of seeing Sismarqui, followed by the two apprentices bearing
2
the shields, she beheld a young cavalier in light court-armor, such as was the
fashion for nobles to wear when not in battle, ambling on a black charger
down the street, at an easy, careless pace, as if listless of his time. His
sword, which glittered with its superb finish, and which, to show its
matchless
polish, was passed naked through a ring at his girdle instead of a
scabbard
,
occasionally struck against the steel plates of his saddle-peak, as his
steed slightly started from side to side at the sudden appearance of maidens
drawn to their verandahs by the rare sight, in that quarter, of a knight of the
emperor's court; and Fatziza knew that it was this sound she had mistaken
for her lover's approach. Nevertheless, she did not drop her eyes again
upon her work, but with curiosity gazed upon the stranger as he slowly
came towards her. He wore an open stell helmet, fashioned like an eagle's
beak, the symbol of the sacred eagle of the house of Aztecs, and shaded by
a high and waving plume of snow-white feathers. His corslet was of the
finest steel, and yielded like velvet to the motions of his body. Across his
breast was bound a scarf of green and gold, and a short horseman's cloak
fell gracefully from his left shoulder to his stirrups. On his saddle-bow hung
a small courtier's shield, with a golden sun emblazoned in its centre. His
steed was covered with a transparent silver net, that descended to his small
symmetrical fetlocks, while massive chains of nicely fitting plates of gold
ornamented
as well as mailed his chest.
These points of horse and rider drew but a momentary glance from the
maiden, who was familiar with the town-costume of the emperor's knights;
nor did the elegance of his figure, nor the finished grace with which he sat
his horse, nor the perfection of his
manege
elicit her admiration; for she
had seen cavaliers ride before as well as he; but what attracted her notice
was, that he wore, dropped from the front-piece of his helmet, a curtain or veil
of the finest steel, that concealed the upper part of his face as low down as
his mouth, which was of a most beautiful shape, and shaded by a raven-black
mustache. He wore no other beard, and his chin and lower part of his face
were those of a young and very handsome man. This demi-visor was woven
so openly as to permit vision, as his riding plainly showed, while it defeated
the closest scrutiny of observers. This mode of appearing forth masked,
altogether, she was aware, was not uncommon among the nobles and gay
young cavaliers of the highest rank in the city, but there was something in
the appearance of this horseman, that drew from the eye of the net-maker's
daughter more notice than she had in her maidenly propriety ever before
bestowed upon one of a rank so high above her. Perhaps it was that she
regarded him with more interest, inasmuch as she expected, when she looked
up, to have seen Sismarqui; and perhaps the extreme beauty of the part
of his face visible beneath the mask, caused her eyes to linger with curiosity,
for he was indeed very handsome, so far as discoverable,  and a pleasant
smile dwelt upon his mouth, as he paced along the close street. Fatziza did
not reflect, as she gazed, that though she could not see his eyes, that they
beheld her, unconscious of their observation, and rested upon her beautiful
face with passionate delight. In a few steps further his ambling steed had
paced opposite to the balcony; and the maiden, as if she
felt
the hidden
gaze fixed upon her face, withdrew her eyes, and blushingly bent her head
over her work. To her surprise and alarm, the horseman, instead of passing
by towards a shaded path, which led between a row of gardens and the
canal, suddenly drew rein before the balcony, and laid his hand
lightly
upon the balustrade; for so low was this humble maiden's boudoir,
that, as he sat upon his horse, he was nearly on a level with her who sat
within it.
`A fair evening to thee, sweet mistress,' he said, in the courteous, yet
condescending tones, that became his bearing and her condition; `Nay, I
pr'y thee, draw not thy curtain. I would fain hold a moment's discourse
with thee.'
`Nay, my lord,' said Fatziza, with embarrassment, and looking still more
beautiful for her confusion, while her hand lingered on the band of the
netting
,
which she dared not drop in the face of one so superior to her, even
though his rude intrusion might well have excused her; but citizens of her
class had been from infancy accustomed to imperial slavery, and were hourly
exposed to the domineering whims and idle passions of the nobles, as well as
to the absolute will of their Emperor. Her life was in the young cavalier's
hands, and she trembled to anger him. `Nay, my lord; I am but a poor
net-maker's daughter,' was all she dared say, as she held the folds of the
screen in her arrested hand.
`Therefore shouldst thou feel the more grateful for the grace done thee.
By the bright diamond of Ix! thy eyes were never made to net coarse
threads together into fisher's nets; they are snares in themselves, that should
be cast to catch princes. There be many, both prince and noble, in Mexico,
would come to thy net, fair fisher.'
Fatziza dropped her head at this language, and let fall the heavy lias
over her dark eyes, till they were shaded from his view.
`Wilt thou then veil them, pretty one? Nay, 't is too late. Thou canst not
undo the mischief they have done. Pray, child, what is thy name?'
`Fatziza, my lord,' she replied, in a half-tone of fear.
`There is a sweet flower, called Fatziza, in the Princess Eylla's garden.
It hath a tall and graceful stalk; and its leaves, of the richest coral dye, are
folded two and two together, like a maiden's lips. Wert thou named
after it?'
`Nay, my good lord; allow me to retire.'
`Stay,' he said, quickly, placing his hand upon her wrist with just force
enough to detain her. `What a moulded hand! Tezcuco, the emperor's
sculptor, would give his famous statue of the Vichu for such a model for his
chisel. Were the ladies of the court to behold it, fair maid, thou wouldst be
the next virgin to be sacrificed to the Sun.'
Fatziza instantly shuddered, and the color fled her cheek.
`It makes thee tremble, child. 'T is true, the divinity will have none but
the loveliest; but it were a pity thou shouldst e'er be chosen as a victim.'
`The holy Avandu forbid!' she cried with clasped fingers.
`It is the holy Avandu, virgin, that alone claims such lovely victims as
thyself. But I see it gives thee pain. Let us discourse of love. I have an
idle half hour till the twilight deepen.'
`Nay, sir, I am but an humble artisan's daughter.'
`So, thou didst tell me before. Yet I would rather linger by thy balcony,
and look into thy sweet dark eyes, and listen to thy soft love-keyed voice,
than be the accepted wooer of any lady in the empire beneath the princess,
who scarce excels thee in charms.' As the young cavalier said this in the
easy, quiet tone which had characterized his manner from the first, he
seemed to be gazing upon her face through the links of his mask, with bold
admiration of the beauty he had so highly, yet so justly praised. Fatziza
seemed as if she should sink upon the floor of the veranda, for she felt
the danger of her position only as it could be appreciated by a maiden living
beneath a government in which all below the rank of nobles were treated as
serfs and bondmen, possessing no right, either in their persons, goods, or
lives, and existing only at the caprice of a monarch, who, with his haughty
court was only withheld by indifference or satiety, from violating every tie
nature taught them to hold most sacred.
`Brave knight,' she said earnestly, while her eyes were fixed on him with
even more eloquence of pleading than flowed from her lips, `I beseech you
ride on and leave one whose companionship, even for the idle moment you
have given to it, will do thee dishonor with this noble princess, whom you
serve, while the regard you bestow on me will but bring affliction to my
father's roof. Go, I pray thee, sir, and take a poor maiden's thanks for
the honor you have now done her.'
`Gentle Fatziza, this earnest eloquence of thy tongue and eyes for me to
leave thee, is but flinging golden chains about my neck, to bind me closer.
Ah, there is a
basalan
within thy window! reach it hither! Dost thou play
on it?'
`To my father, when he asks for music,' she replied, overjoyed to be
released
from the hold he had upon her hand, even to get the instrument for
him, which, fearing to disobey, she timidly placed in his hands.
He run his fingers lightly and skillfully over the chords of the
basalan
,
a rude instrument of three strings, not differing much from the Moorish
guitar, which was much used by the humbler classes, and said with a smile,
`Wouldst thou hear a knight sing a courtly ballad upon a
basalan
, before a
net-maker's balcony, fair mistress?'
`Nay, sir, put me not to ridicule before my own townswomen.'
`By the star Ula! where the soul of music hath her abode  I do not
mock thee, pretty mistress. Listen.' He thrummed two or three notes, and
shook his head. `Thy instrument is something rude  but if there be
melody in the strings, it shall come forth.'
He then placed the lesser end of the
basalan
against his breast, and
sweeping the strings rudely, but with bold and rapid touches, sung the
following
song in a voice wonderfully full of rich, deep melody:
THE KNIGHT AT THE BALCONY.
PRINCE PALIPAN TO FATZIZA.
Lady
, I love, at the deep midnight
To look on the glittering orbs of light
That burn in the heavens afar;
Their light is as pure as the royal gem,
Or the holy fire that enkindled them,
But thine eye is a brighter star!
The stars look brightly down on me,
Whispering of war and chivalry,
And glory's triumph car;
But, from orbs that so far above me shine
I turn to a beauty more divine,
To thee  a more heavenly star!
I have listed the clang of the trumpet blast
On the foeman my breast I have fearlessly cast,
Uncaring for wound or scar;
But the trumpet is silent  the stars shine not now,
But thine eye  that clear gem 'neath thy beautiful brow
Is a brighter and dearer star!
When he had ended, he handed back to her the instrument, saying, `Now,
pr'y thee, fair fisher's daughter, return me a song for mine?'
Fatziza had listened, till she forgot the unpleasantness of her situation, to
the stirring song of the free cavalier, and carefully had he noted the effect
of it upon her bounding bosom and brightening eye. His request at once
broke the charm. She stood silent and hesitating.
`Nay, then, if thou wilt not sing, coy maid, then thou shalt kiss me.'
He seized the hand in which she carelessly held the
basalan
, near his
reach, and drawing her towards him, rose in his stirrup, and pressed, ere
she could escape, a kiss upon her mouth. At the instant of this act of
knightly gallantry, a young man of a bold and free carriage made his
appearance
,
followed closely by two apprentices laden with shields. His eye
detected the purpose of the cavalier in rising in his stirrup, and, quicker
than lightning, he snatched two of the shields from the packs, and struck
them together with a loud crash. The sharp sound caused the horse to
rear so suddenly, that, ere the cavalier could recover his seat, he was thrown
from his saddle to the ground. On recovering his feet, he beheld the young
man in the act of replacing the shields, which at once explained the cause,
though not the motive of the rude clamor. He instantly leaped upon his
horse again, and, with his naked sword, spurred towards him. The
man instantly seized a shield upon which he received and shivered the
blade, and, with his other hand, caught the horse by the head, and skillfully
turned him aside from his person.
`Hold, Sismarqui! Harm him not, if thou lovest thy life and me!'
cried the maiden, who had witnessed this from the balcony, and knew well
the impatient spirit of her lover  for his eye, as he stood at the horse's
head, was fixed on the knight with vindictive menace, and his athletic frame
worked in its sinews, and writhed like that of the leopard-hound, ere he
bounds from the leash upon his prey.
The cavalier to whom the words of Fatziza had given the clue to the
young armorer's motive, in attempting to unhorse him, surveyed him steadily
in his turn, and his hand sought in his breast for the short dagger worn
by knights of his degree, which he half drew forth, and then replaced again.
`Not now, slave!' he said, in the low, deliberate tone of quiet rage. `I
shall
remember thee
. Thou hast been full bold to unhorse a knight for
kissing
thy mistress. It had like to have been a dear kiss to me. Thou hast
taken care, as I shall do, that it shall be a dear one to thyself.'
Thus speaking, the horseman turned and rode towards the little balcony,
where stood Fatziza  pale, and anxious for the safety of her lover, whom
she felt had, in one brief moment, created an enemy of the most dangerous
description.
`Sweet fisher's  nay  'tis sweet net-maker's daughter, I do remember,'
he said courteously, yet with an irony in his habitual haughty manner he
could ill suppress, `thou shouldst have given me the song.'
`O, thou wilt forgive him, my lord?'
`He hath broken my sword.'
`He shall give thee another of his own make, of finer temper.'
`But he hath unhorsed me. Shall he put me on my horse again, pretty
one?'
`Forgive him, sir.'
`Thou dost plead well and gracefully.'
`He is my lover.'
`Therefore should I
not
forgive him.'
`Shame, Fatziza!' cried the proud young man; it ill becometh a maid
like thee to ask favor of a knight. I scorn his forgiveness, and despise his
hatred.'
`Ha! this is language from a slave.'
`Therefore do I use the only freedom a slave has  that of speech.'
`Fair mistress, shall I forgive him?'
`I need it not,' said the armorer, fiercely.
`Yes, yes, I pray thee ' interpleaded the maiden.
`Then I do forgive him, because it doth not please him that I should, and
that I have a mind to do thee a kindness. His favor, sweet maid, shall hang
on
thine
. So, if thou carest for him, thou wilt be less coy when next we
chance to meet. Fare thee well, beauteous Fatziza.'
With these words, portent with coming evil to her, he gave rein to his
steed, and riding forward, turned to the left, opposite the net-maker's house,
and disappeared slowly along a shaded path, between the gardens and the
canal.
CHAPTER III.
THE EVENING SACRIFICE.
The
citizens who had been drawn from their shops and dwellings by the
loud ringing of the shields, and had witnessed, with terror, the quarrel
between
one of their own condition and a knight of the emperor's court,
followed
,
in silence, with their eyes, the retiring cavalier, until he was out of
sight: they then turned them upon the young armorer, with alarm and
foreboding
depicted on their faces. He stood where the cavalier had left him, with
his arms folded moodily across his breast, and, with a dark and cloudy brow,
gazing towards the point where he had disappeared. He was a young man,
a little under the middle height, with a broad chest and a firmly set frame.
His complexion was a fine, clear brown, his features decidedly handsome,
and strongly marked with fire and intelligence above his condition. The
carriage of his head was proud, if not commanding, and his step and attitudes
were expressive of firmness and decision. His eyes were gray, and
exceedingly
vivid in their light, yet steady and resolute in their gaze. He was
altogether, a young man of a bold and fearless character, impetuous in
temper
,
and haughty above his station, as a bondman.
`Why look ye upon me, fellow-slaves, as if ye expected to see the earth
open and swallow me up,' he cried, suddenly turning upon the crowd in the
street. `I have had the boldness to speak to a knight, and lo! you stand
about me, trembling like women.'
`Alas, rash youth,' said an old man, who was leaning upon his staff
near him; `I fear thou hast laid thy head and ours upon the block; given our
fair street to the flames, and our women and children to the lust of the
emperor's
soldiery.'
`He did but salute thy bride, and it were an honor, rather than matter of
grievance,' said a maker of lance-shafts, with a half-finished shaft in his
hand, upon which he rested.
`Surely, surely,' echoed several craftsmen; `and if we had not wives and
daughters with charms to tempt a knight's lip, we would hold them little
worth.'
`This is the spirit ye are of!' cried the young armorer, with a flashing
eye. `Ye are fit material for slaves! May your wives be torn from your
houses; your daughters be violated before your eyes, by reckless nobles
and may you be so accursed as to grovel and thank them for the grace they
have done ye. Ye are slaves  and slaves ye will die.'
The bold language and indignant manner of the young bondman, made
every hearer tremble, and, interchanging glances of fear with one another,
they dispersed, precipitately, in all directions, and, entering their shops, shut
themselves in, leaving the young armorer alone in the street, with his
apprentices
,
and but one of the citizens that had composed the crowd. This
man had stood aloof, as Sismarqui spoke to them, but, on their timid
dispersion
,
he advanced towards him, and said, in a low tone:
`Young artisan  you have spoken the mind of many worthy citizens of
Mexico.'
The armorer turned upon him, and saw beside him a stout man of middle
age, the upper part of his person wrapped in the broad scarf of blue linen,
that marked the caste to which he himself belonged, and wearing, also, the
bondman's scarlet cap, and striped drawers. His features were bold and
decided, and the aspect of his countenance was rigidly stern. He was a
little taller than the young man, but less muscular and sinewy. In his hand
he held a short oar, which indicated his profession as a waterman.
Sismarqui
surveyed him closely, an instant, and then grasping his hand, said, in
the same tone,
`There are then three
men
among the serfs of the empire.
`Who is the third?'
`Montezuma.'
`I have heard the name.'
`Every man in Mexico shall yet hear it, from the tyrant to the infant at
the breast. What is thy name?'
`Casipeti.'
`Art thou that Casipeti who yesterday struck the lieutenant of the king's
guards, for attempting too free license with his daughter, as he was walking
with her, across the Vanda?'
`I am.'
`Come in doors, and let me embrace thee! Thank the gods! liberty yet
lives in human breasts. Nay, noble Casipeti  hesitate not  'tis my
father-in-law's Macho, the net-maker.'
`Not now, good youth. When thou wouldst find me, seek me at my
dwelling on the stone bridge.'
Thus speaking, the citizen left him, and hastened up the street.
`Fatziza,' said the young man to the maiden, who had continued to remain
in the spot on the balcony, where the knight had left her, with clasped
fingers and tearful eyes, as if transfixed with grief, at his terrible parting
words,  `
his favor, sweet maid, shall hang on thine
, ringing in her ears.
`Fatziza!'
Thrice he repeated the name  each time more tenderly than before  ere
she heard him. `Go in, dear Fatziza, lest thy presence there should give
further occasion for courtly insults. I will but go with the apprentices, and
leave these shields with the armorer, and be back ere the sun be down.'
`Haste, Sismarqui! and, O! let me soon see thee; for I fear I know not
what evil.'
`Thou needest not fear, dear bride; thy brother's arm and mine shall be
thy defence against any danger that menaces thee.'
`It is not for myself I fear, but for thee, Sismarqui. Thou hast angered a
noble.'
`A prince should not insult thee with impunity.'
`Thou art given to strange language, this evening. Thy quick spirit will
bring evil upon thee and me.'
`Art thou sorry I unhorsed the knight?'
`Nay; thou art jealous!'
`Of my honor ?'
`Ha, ha, ha! a serf's honor!'
Sismarqui turned, like lightning, to see who had uttered this laugh and
bitter gibe, and saw, near him, a tall, slender man, who, from his brown
doublet, white scarf, and green silk cap, with a silver eagle upon its point,
was one of the servitors of the Prince. He had just come from a small gate,
leading from the street into the gardens, and bore a basket of garlands and
fruit in his hand, and was proceeding towards the water side, as if to cross
to the palace, when the words of the young armorer arrested him. From
his swarthy complexion, deep sunken and glittering eyes, long braided black
hair, and beardless lip, he was of the false and dissembling race of the
Flascalas
.
Sismarqui gazed upon him an instant, with an impetuous and
resenting
glance; and then turning away, bade his apprentices take up their
burdens
and follow him.
`Stay, armorer!' he said; advancing a step.
`What would you?' Sismarqui replied; delaying, while the boys went on.
`I would know of thee, what is a serf's honor?'
`I will strike thee, thou Flascalan eunuch, unless thou pass on.'
At this instant the palace slave caught sight of Fatziza. Her beauty
struck him with a surprise that he did not attempt to conceal.
`Ah! a beauteous virgin, artisan! A rare flower.'
`I will break thy head for thee, if thou pass not on.'
`Darest thou threaten one of the Prince's household?' cried the Flascalan,
in a harsh, shrill voice. `Here, sweet! there is a nosegay for thee.'
He threw towards the balcony, as he spoke, a bunch of flowers, which fell
back again upon the ground. The eunuch sprung forward to get them, when
the young man placed his foot upon them, and crushed them. The foiled
servitor drew back, and looking up at the balcony, said, muttering, as if he
had guessed the relation in which she stood to the youth
`I will bring thee, bright virgin, a wreath from the Emperor's nephew,
the gallant Prince Palapan, when he shall hear from my lips of thy charms.
I will note the house well.'
As he stepped back to survey the net-maker's abode, the young armorer
seized him by the neck
`If thou darest to breathe to the Prince, or to mortal man, aught touching
this maiden,' he said fiercely, `I will tear thy heart from thy throat. Lo,
see to it.'
He flung him from him as he spoke, and followed his gliding figure with
his eyes, till he saw him get into a boat, and shoot out into the canal, where
he was soon lost to the eye, in the gathering shades of evening.
`Alas! Sismarqui, you have made two vindictive enemies within the
hour. Where will this end?' cried Fatziza.
`I hope in firing the nobles against the people  in rousing a spirit of
resistance, among the five hundred thousand bondmen within the walls, to
the tyranny of the thirty thousand who rule and enslave them. If what I
have done within this hour but strike the spark of liberty, I am content my
body shall kindle the conflagration.'
`Ah! Sismarqui, you love me not.'
`I love thee, dear Fatziza; but I love freedom better.'
`What hath given thee this mood?' she said, bending over the balcony, as
he leaned against it, and taking his hand.
`The gods gave it me with my nature. It hath been in me from the hour
of early boyhood. I compared my condition with that of the sons of the
nobles. It was thus I made the comparison. My father had finished a
shield of rare workmanship, and bade me take it to the knight who ordered
it. At his palace gate, I met a boy, scarce half my own age, richly clad,
and decked with jewels, followed by his tutor and two attendants. He asked
me, pertly, what I carried; for it was covered with a cloth, to keep it from
the dust. I told him. Let me see it, said he. His authoritative manner
stung me; and I answered, in the same tone, that it was a sight for knights,
and not for babies. He instantly struck me across the face, with a switch
he carried, and said, Slave! dost thou answer a noble's son thus?' I would
have struck him down, but two slaves seized me, and punished me with the
himboo
, till life nearly left me. I was then sent home to my father, with a
warning never to speak uncivilly to a noble baby.' His lip curled with
scornful contempt as he ended.
`Thy father should have taught thee deference, dear Sismarqui, and this
would not have happened to thee,' said Fatziza.
`Thus it is!' he said, bitterly. `We all, youth and maiden, drink it in with
our mother's milk. There must be a new race of men, to know what liberty
is. We have been begotten serfs and bondmen.'
`What is the dreadful purpose upon your mind? You are not yourself,
Sismarqui. Come in, and let me soothe thy spirit. I will sing to thee.'
`I have no heart for music. Where is thy brother?' he abruptly asked.
`He hath been gone since noon. He said he thought he should witness
the procession from the Temple to the Gate.'
`Is thy father within?'
`At his netting, in the rear shop.'
`Montezuma should be here by this time. Had he business?'
`To take a pair of nets to some one on the east side of the city.'
`I will call on my way back. I would see him.'
`Breathe not into his ear the strange, dark thoughts that fill your soul,
Sismarqui. I would have my brother's bosom at peace.'
`It is at peace, because he hath not borne the wrong I have borne, by
seeing his betrothed bride  the chaste idol of his bosom  held in the
licentious embrace of a noble. I know Montezuma's spirit. It is kindred
with my own!'
As he spoke, a lurid glare filled the atmosphere with a strange brightness,
communicating to every object a pale crimson hue.
`It is the sacred flame. The sun has set,' said Sismarqui. `Let us
worship.'
The lovers reverently crossed their hands upon their bosoms, and repeated
together, solemnly
`The Sun, our father, hath gone to rest, that his children may repose
3
upon his bosom. U-lu-la! Let us praise him. He hath made us. Light
and heat are his. Day and night are his. We are his children; and he is
our father.'
They then continued their conversation, as before.
`One spark will inflame Montezuma's breast.'
`Strike not that spark, Sismarqui, I pray you.'
`Nay, then, I will not. There will not be opportunity long wanting to
kindle it from other sources. The nobles are becoming more insolent in
these peaceful times, and the Emperor, for want of enemies to slay in battle,
must needs have his thirst for blood slaked from our veins. All his court
follow his example. Two hours since, I saw his guards strike off a young
man's head, because, in his attention to a blind father, whom he was
supporting
across the street, he doffed not his cap to the Arikeve of the Emperor's
stables, as he was prancing by; and when the old man fell to the ground, he
was trampled to death under four score iron hoofs.'
`Fearful!' ejaculated the maiden. `Alas! how shall this evil be averted
from
our
heads?'
`By meeting it half way!  rousing the spirit of freedom in every breast,
and making general insurrection.'
`Thou art mad, Sismarqui.'
`Keep within, dearest Fatziza,' he said hastily, without replying to her
words. `I will soon return, and ere I again leave thee, I hope to kindle thy
spirit with something of the fire that burns in my own bosom.'
He lingered a moment, till he saw her disappear, and close behind her the
door-like window that opened upon the balcony, and then, with a rapid step,
followed his apprentices along the path leading by the canal, which had been
taken by the knight, whose admiration of Fitziza's charms had produced
such menacing results.
The cavalier had continued to ride on, after turning into this path, at the
same ambling pace at which he had passed through the net-maker's street.
On his left, luxuriant gardens were bending their branches, laden with fruit,
to the ground; and on his right flowed the majestic canal, spanned by seven
marble bridges, its surface covered with gorgeous barges, and its banks
adorned with long lines of palaces, groves, and temples. Fishers, in their
sharp, narrow boats, dotted the channel, or, having finished their day's toil,
were spreading their nets upon the shore. Artisans and their apprentices
were returning from their labor, or, loitering upon the shore, were observing
the scenes upon the water, which was dyed with the rosy color of the west,
and was so placid that every object was reflected upon it with the
distinctness
of the reality. Occasionally, a devotional song from a boatman,
addressed to the setting sun, came across the water to the horseman's ear,
strangely mingled with the shouts and laughter of others, the distant call of
one on the opposite bank to his fellow in the stream, and the incessant dash
of the thousand oars that were ceaselessly dipped in the water. The knight
gave but a careless attention to these scenes, and continued on his way, until
he came in sight of the stately entrance of the first bridge; when, seeing
that the sun was nearly down, and that the iron gates would soon be shut,
he spurred forward, and, in a few moments, cantered beneath the lofty
gateway
.
At the portal he reined up, and called the captain of the barrier.
`Istalass,' he said, as the officer appeared, `see that you keep your barrier
with more than usual watchfulness. Drop your portcullis, henceforward, at
half an hour before sunset, till further orders from the Emperor; nor rise
it in the morning, without first sending parties of horse forth to see that there
are no bands of serfs prepared to rush in. I have seen a spirit abroad this
evening, I dreamed not was in the four walls of Mexico.'
`Ah, noble sir! this news is strange. Yet, pardon me, I would do nothing
without orders from the palace.'
`How, sirrah?'
`I do not know thee, save that thou art knightly.'
`True  I had forgot I was masked.'
He lifted his steel veil as he spoke, and instantly replaced it again. The
officer placed his hands upon his breast, in deep reverence, and said
`It is done as you command.'
`See to it  and should any disturbance arise in the quarter in which you
command, be prompt in putting it down. From a lesser matter than I have
seen to-night, got Peru once a new master from the rabble.
He rode rapidly across the noble bridge, which was lined on either side
with columns and statues, and entered a magnificent square, the four sides
of which seemed to be composed of temples and porticoes. In the centre of
the vast square, was a quadrangular terrace of alternate galleries and
gardens, rising one above another, in a pyramidal form, to a great height,
each story lessening as it rose, until the whole magnificent pile terminated in
a circular altar of black marble, at an elevation for overlooking the loftiest
palaces. Around the altar appeared a group of priests of the Sun, in white
robes and flowing beards. Near its head, stood the venerable High Priest,
clothed in white linen, and crowned with a mitre of gold, holding, elevated
in his hand, towards the setting sun, a censor, in which brightly burned the
sacred flame. Opposite the altar, on the west side of the square, towered
the temple of the Celestial Deity, its vast gilded dome terminating in a
single column of porphyry, of so great a height that it was visible from every
part of the city. On the summit of it was a shield of gold, the apparent
size of the Sun, by which stood a single priest, holding extended an azure
veil, studded with stars, as if emblematical of night. In the midst of the
square, and in the immense spaces between the pyramidal altar and the
palaces surrounding it, was assembled a countless multitude, heaving, in their
living motion, like the waves of the sea.
As the knight entered upon this imposing scene, the attention of the whole
throng was fixed upon the summit of the elevated column. Suddenly, there
arose a deep murmur from a myriad of lips, which as instantly ceased; and
again silence, like the hushed stillness of death, reigned over the human
mass.
The priest was veiling the sun!
The cavalier threw himself from his horse, and kneeled beside him, with his
gaze, like all the rest, turned towards the summit of the column of porphyry.
The priest was slowly elevating the veil over the disc of the golden shield,
with the same majestic motion with which the sun, alone visible to his eye,
was descending beneath the horizon. Slowly and gradually the dark
symbolic
veil covered the golden face of the Sun's image, till it concealed the
upper limb, when a deep wail, like the articulation of a world's woe, filled
the air. The whole multitude fell upon their faces to the earth. The High
Priest swung fire from his censor upon the high altar, which kindled into a
vast flame, of a bloody hue, and shed a wild crimson glare over the wide
city; while the company of priests about the altar began to chant a
religious
hymn to their departing deity, while the worshippers, with whom
the knight joined, rising to their feet, chanted, at the end of every verse, a
choral pan of praise.
U-lu-la! I-oe-va! La! U-lu-la!
Praise the Sun! Hail the Sun! He is God. Worship him.
Priests
.
The Sun is our father;
He made us:
We are his children;
We worship him.
People
.
A-van-du! Ulu-la! La! U-lu-la. I-o-vah!
Priests
.
He gives us light by day,
And his heat warms us;
He veils his face by night,
That man may repose.
People
.
A-van-du! Ulu-la-la! I-e-o-va!
Priests
.
He clothes the earth with verdure;
He giveth the rain and harvest.
Great is the Avandu, our father!
Let us worship him.
People
.
A-van-du! I-e-o-va! U-lu-la!
Priests
.
He maketh purple the grape,
And giveth wine for the sad heart;
He melteth the snows for the thirsty herds,
And causeth the sweet grass to grow.
People
.
Praise the Sun! Hail the Sun! He is God. Worship him!
While the priests were chanting, they continued to cast offerings of fruit,
and flowers, and herbs upon the flame. When the hymn was ended, the
High Priest stretched forth his hands above the sea of human heads,
heaving
beneath him, and proclaimed
`Though, my children, we are descended from the sacred and august Sun,
who rules in the heavens and on earth, yet, through guilt, we have fallen
from our original purity. We daily incur his fiery wrath, and deserve death.
But he is pleased to accept the blood of kids and bullocks for the
propitiation
of our daring offences against his ethereal purity, instead of our own
lives  asking human sacrifices only on festivals. Let us, therefore, be grateful
for his mercy, and put our guilt of this past day upon the victim, that it may
be accepted by him as a sacrifice in our stead.'
The High Priest then laid his hands upon the head of a white kid, which
the priests led to the altar, and cried aloud
`Thus, erring children of the Sun, do I lay your offences upon the
expiatory
victim.'
`Avenge thyself, oh Sun! upon the innocent victim, and not on us, the
guilty, responded the multitude with one voice, falling upon their faces to the
ground.
Instantly the knife of the High Priest was buried in the heart of the
substitute
of the people; and, after solemnly sprinkling the blood upon the four
corners of the altar, he laid the victim upon the sacred fire, and consumed it.
As the crowd of worshippers began to retire from the square or court of
the temple, and when the knight was also in the act of remounting his horse,
to ride on his way, he felt a hand slightly pull his cloak. On turning round,
he saw a stout man, with the lower part of his face closely muffled in a coarse
blue scarf, who, from this costume, as well as from the rest of his dress,
appeared to be of the caste of the bondmen.
`What would you, slave?' demanded the cavalier haughtily, scarce
glancing
over his shoulder a second time, and placing his foot in the stirrup.
`Serve thee.'
`Thou art a serf, by thy garb. How canst thou serve me?'
`Both in love and revenge.'
`Ah! that would be rare service. Who art thou and what?
`Casipeti.'
`The Mascal of the palace!
The man hesitated  then replied in a steady tone of voice, `even so, my
lord.'
`What doest thou abroad in this guise, Sir Steward?'
`I have a purpose that I may not betray. As I came through the net
makers' street, my lord, I witnessed thy passage of love at the balcony, and
the fray that followed.'
`Thou didst! Well, what wilt thou make out of it?' said the Knight,
biting his lip impatiently.
`A servile insurrection,' was the reply, in a deep, earnest tone.
`Ha!' exclaimed the cavalier, laying his hand with energy upon the
shoulder of the speaker. `I did have my own suspicions of this  I saw
but a spark fly from the worse flint; but I have known cities laid in ashes by
a spark.'
`Thou hast well penetrated this matter, my lord. Now if thou wouldst
secure this rude fellow for thy own private revenge and his mistress for thy
pleasure, I will aid thee.'
`I shall take my revenge in my own hands,' answered the knight haughtily;
`and in matters of love I need not thy assistance. Dost thou know me?'
`Thou art masked,' answered the man evasively.
`Thou shouldst know well the masker, ere thou venturest such freedom of
speech.'
`Nay, my lord  for such I know thou art, though thy court dress of
armor is unfamiliar to me. The maiden is surpassing fair and will reward
thy dalliance. Thou knowest thou wouldst lose the favor of the princess
by letting thy gallantry to a net-maker's daughter come to her ears  and,
allow me to tell you, my lord, that open violence towards the young armorer
will rouse a spirit among the artisans that will not be easily put down. No,
my lord, whosoever of the princess Eylla's knights thou art, it were wise in
thee to keep this matter under, for thou wilt thus best serve both ends thou
hast in view.'
`Thou art a cunning reasoner  and wisdom as well as policy are in thy
speech,' said the knight. `What dost thou advise? The virgin hath rare
loveliness, and, by the bright sun! she shall not become a serf's bride.'
`What did you purpose, my lord, ere I met you?'
`To despatch a troop of horse and level the street and bring both
prisoners
to the castle,' he said promptly.
And would the princess Eylla have countenanced the presence of this
maid as guest of one of her knights? Even his highness, the Prince
Palipan
,
would not dare do such a thing publicly.'
`
Dare
not!' repeated the knight loudly; and then directly added, in a
different tone, `perhaps he were wiser
not
to do it.'
`If, as it is said, he aspires to the hand of the sweet and virtuous
princess.'
`True  true,' he said hastily. `What dost thou now propose  for in
that we have had conference thus far together, I will tell thee that I have love
for this fair maid, and am resolved to bring her presently to submission. As
for her fiery wooer, I shall have him presently seized and brought to my
abode, lest through him, the matter of his wrong get to the princess' ears.'
`If your lordship will leave the affair with me to manage, it shall be done
as you would wish within the next twelve hours.'
`What, pray, is thy motive in being thus earnest to serve a stranger? as
thou knowest me not.'
`I have my own interests to serve also.'
`And would make me the tool to this end!' returned the knight angrily.
`Nay  my lord  what human being acts without reference to his
interests
?
Whether I serve thee for gold or for hatred of thy victims  't is the
same to thee.'
`Be it so,' said the cavalier, mounting his horse. `When thou wouldst
communicate with me, send me, privately, this signet.'
As he spoke he removed a small ring in which was set an emerald, marked
with some device, and placed it in his hand.
`To
whom
shall I send it, my lord?' asked the man in the low tone of one
seeking confidence.
The knight hesitated an instant and then said, `Come closer, and on thy
life  look thou!  be secret.'
He lifted his visor and the man started back with undisguised surprise,
then crossed his hands upon his breast, and was about to bend in deep
reverence
,
when the knight caught hold of him and said sternly,
`Wouldst thou already expose it to these about here? Go, and serve me
with thy best wit and caution. Thou hast shown thyself to possess a wisdom
during this conference that I shall need make use of in time to come. It is
therefore I would that thou shouldst now know me.'
As the knight ended he struck his spurs into the flank of his impatient steed
and galloped forward in the direction of one of the four great avenues that
led from the angles of the square to the four quarters of the city. The man
looked after him for a moment with the smile of one who has succeeded
beyond
his hopes in some hidden purpose; then examining the ring he placed
it upon his finger, and gathered his scarf about his breast and face. He then
walked rapidly away, in an opposite direction, towards the canal, and was soon
lost in the crowd that thronged its bank, enjoying the evening breeze from
the encircling lake and listening to the sound of music that came from the
numerous pleasure barges of the nobles, that floated like fairy palaces upon
its transparent bosom.
CHAPTER IV.
THE HUNCHBACK.
The
roseate tinge of twilight still lingered on the water, when a small
fisher's
boat, containing two persons, was seen pulling easily along the pier of
columns that terminated the grounds of the Imperial palace on the side of
the canal opposite to the net-maker's street. One of the individuals, who
was seated on the centre thwart of the boat and rowing, was a hunchback: but
his face was like a woman's, for its soft beauty, and his hair flowed in
luxuriant
tresses about his high, massive shoulders. His eyes were very large and
deeply set, and shot forth the most pentrating glances in a direct line. His
spirit looked visibly forth from them. They seemed literally to blaze like
lamps with the intensity of the intellectual fire pent within, and that was
consuming
them.
The other individual was an old man, with a flowing beard, that rendered
his appearance strikingly venerable. The boat was very humble in its
character
as also was the appearance of its occupants. They both wore the
coarse, blue scarf, scarlet cap, and striped fringed drawers, peculiar to the
lower castes of the Mexitili, save that the habit of the younger was
fashioned
with more taste than the elder's, and notwithstanding his deformity, worn
with pretension to youthful grace. In the folds across his breast was placed
a sprig of the delicately-leaved plant of the Ute, as if there belonged to him
a grace of mind and refinement of taste singularly in contrast with the
appearance
of his person. A net and a few fishes lay in the bottom of the
boat; a small awning was spread above the stern, where the old man was
seated, and the bows were ornamented with the rude representation carved
in wood, of a horse's head. The little boat moved steadily on, amid a
multitude
of others, darting swiftly in every direction, and at intervals the youth,
who was rowing, would chant a verse of some hymn to the protecting spirit
of the water. At length they came opposite the entrance to the palace,
when he ceased rowing and gazed upon it. It rose from the shore, terrace
above terrace, supported by slender white marble columns, with gilded
capitals
,
till it terminated in a stately pile of imperial magnificence and grandeur
that rivalled even the Temple of the Sun, which stood near, itself appearing
a city of Grecian domes, and marble towers, and silver spires, mingled with
gardens, fountains, and lofty burnished altars, every point and pinnacle
glittering
with precious stones.
`Father,' said the young man, after having for a few moments surveyed the
gorgeous palace of the emperor, `how many million human lives have been
sacrificed to build up that mountain of laid gold and columned marble?'
`How mean you, my son?' asked the old man; `'t is built of gold and
marble, as thou seest, and not of men's lives. Pull on a little further and then
we shall be high enough to take the current across to our street. 'T is
getting
late.'
`I can imagine, father,' continued the young man, without regarding his
words, and gazing thoughtfully upon the structure, `I can imagine each fair
polished stone to be the scull of a man, like you and me, each diamond to be
a human eye, and every column and glorious ornament to be a human limb.
It is a palace of dead men's bones  and these men were our brothers
our fellow-bondmen.'
`'T is said that three millions of the emperor's subjects died in erecting it,
my son, if that is what you mean  but their lives were his and not their
own.'
`Is
thy
life, father, thine own?' asked the youth with bitterness.
`'Till the emperor bid me give it up for his pleasure.'
`Ulyd is but a man like thyself!'
`He is the brother of the Sun.'
`And thou and I are
children
of the Sun. Which hath the more honor
the son or the brother?
`Hist, boy. Thou art mad. Thy language will be taken up by passing
boats.'
`And what would be the end of it?' he enquired scornfully, and his
glance kindling.
`The loss of thy head and thy father's.'
`May not the emperor take them at any moment if he will? Is it not
better to die having done worthy of death, than be slain like a sheep at
another's will? Father, I am tired of being a serf.'
`If thy tongue cuts thus, thou wilt not have long space to lament thy
weariness
,'
exclaimed the old man in alarm. `Hush, I bid thee! Take thine
oar  or yonder barge will come upon us and bear us down, and thou
knowest
these nobles care little for a poor fisher's life.'
`Thou hast it!
That
is what I would have thee dwell upon in thy heart,
father,' said the hunchback, as the boat, obedient to a few strokes of his oars,
shot aside while a gay pleasure barge darted past like an arrow. `I
would have this feeling of the cheapness of our lives impressed on every mind
in Mexico, till she free herself in her might from this accursed vassalage.
Heaven made not me a slave  to wear this scarlet badge of servitude upon
my head, and this scarf across my body  and that haughty young cavalier,
standing on yonder prow, in silk and gold, to bid me crouch, and kneel, stand
aside or even slay myself at his bidding. I have a man's frame and form as
well as he. I speak, eat, move, as he does  love and hate as he does  in
short, I am a man, and he is no more.'
`Thou art hunchback, boy.' `The gods made me not so.' `No  thou
wert born fair and perfect  but it was a knight in sport tossed his shield
upon thee when thou wert an infant lying on the ground before the door.'
`Would to the just gods I knew this cavalier! I would slay him were he
prince Palipan.'
`Thou art most surely mad, Hucha,' cried the old man, trembling from
head to foot. Thou wilt, with thy hasty words, one day thrust thyself into
the way of death; and what will become of thy poor father.
`Die also, old man! 'T were better to die than live.'
`And Fatziza! Dost thou forget thy cousin, Fatziza?' plead the old
man mournfully.
`She, alas! were better dead than what she is, for her beauty will yet
assuredly
bring to her young bosom, woe and misery I dare not think upon.
Besides,' he said in a sad, bitter tone, `she loves me not. I am Hucha, the
hunchback.'
As he spoke, he once more resumed his oars and was pulling along the
pier as before, when a glittering barge, with a silver prow and a shield above
the stern like the sun, gorgeous with crimson curtains and gilded canopies,
from which floated the sound of music mingled with gay voices of laughter,
came bearing down, impelled by fifty oars. It was the barge he had alluded
to, and on her prow stood the cavalier he had contrasted with himself.
`Ply the oar, boy!' cried the old man. At this instant they heard the
noble say, laughing, `Lo, yonder is a hunchback! he will fright our court
ladies and transfer the nobility. Besides, he is loitering in our course. Pass
on over him!'
The young man bent to the oar, for he saw the imminent danger and
cleared her arrowing and slightly deviating path just in time to escape being
struck by her bows, but fell upon the sweeps of the oars-men. `Knock the
slaves on the head and sink their boat,' cried the noble, as the skiff became
entangled
among the sweeps. `It will teach these fellows better than to obstruct
a knight's pleasure barge.'
The oars-men instantly upset the boat and threw them both out into the
water. The old man would have sunk, for he had been stunned by a blow
dealt from one of the sweeps, but for the aid of his son, who held him up with
one arm, while with the other he clung to one of the oars held by the rowers
and which were chained to the ports. Their weight depressed the barge,
and the noble sprung towards them with his sword drawn and cried sternly,
`Leave thy hold, hunchback!'
`It is my father here, my lord, whom I would save.'
The noble without replying, aimed a blow at his hand, with his weapon,
when he released his grasp and let the barge pass on leaving him swimming
and with difficulty keeping the old man's head above water. Two or three
skiffs were flying to their assistance, when the barge rounded to and the
nobleman
with his friends gathered around him, forbade any one to help them,
while he looked on to witness the result as a novel species of entertainment.
`Thou dost buffet bravely, hunchback!' he cried with irony. `His
shoulders hold wind,' cried another. `Take the old man on thy back, Sir
Hunchback,' mocked a third cavalier.
The old man soon recovered his senses and greatly relieved the young
man of his burden by aiding himself.
`Father,' said the young man, as he saw that he could do without his
assistance
,
`I would sink to my grave now most willingly, did I not hope to
live to avenge this wrong. That gray knight, Guichapa, standing on the
stern, shall repent his pleasant sport.'
`He it was, boy, that cast the shield on thee!' said the old man looking.
`Then the gods help me to swim  for I will not die now.'
They slowly made their way towards the shore, when, as if wearied of the
delay, the noble, after one or two more insulting jeers, bade his barge move
on its way again, and left them to their fate. At this moment a light boat,
with a garland on its stern, pulled by a single man, passed so near them that
the oars were within reach of the young man's grasp.
`I pray thee, brother,' he said, `take this old man from the water.'
`Brother me no brother, slave,' said the rower, in a shrill, sharp key.
And turning his face towards the hunchback he showed the swart features and
glittering eye of the Flascalan.
`Thou hast well said it, eunuch. Pass on,' cried Hucha, withdrawing his
hold upon the side of the boat. `I would rather trust to the water than to one
of thy race.'
The Flascalan struck the young man a sharp blow upon the shoulders,
accompanied
with a laugh of derision, and continued on his way across the
canal.
The barge had scarcely got twenty yards away, when several boats of
their own craft came to their assistance and took them on board. The
hunchback
sat silent until they landed not far from the net-makers' street, and then
touching a lad on the shoulder who had pulled one of the boats, called him
aside and said to him,
`Go, see my father home, Tripeti, and stay there until I come, which will
be shortly. Go. I have matters that will keep me abroad awhile.'
Having seen him depart as he had directed, the hunchback turned to the
boatmen and a group of others who stood round him and said
`My friends, you have done me service in saving me and my father. If
4
the gods will, I will do you a service in return which shall compensate you
and your children's children after you.'
`We need none, good Hucha,' said they all. `We are happy to have
saved you, for you are like a son and a brother to us.'
`Am I indeed so loved?' he inquired with feeling  `then show all your
love for me,' he added with enthusiasm, `by being ready to stand by me
when I shall call upon you.'
`What does your language and manner import?' they asked with surprise.
`Is there a man here that hath not had some injury at the hand of the
nobles?'
`Hush, young man! This is rash language here,' said a staid old boatman,
laying his hand rudely upon him.
`Answer me! Have ye not been wronged?' he repeated without
regarding
the warning. `Nay  then gather about me and I will speak to
thee in a slave's tone. My fellow bondmen,' he said, as they drew near him,
`I will answer for you to a man. Here stands Harani, the refiner, whose
eldest boy was impaled for striking a Flascalan who would have dragged off
his sweet-heart to a nobleman's harem. Here stands Uhman, the waterman,
whose young bride was rifled from his nuptial couch, ere he had pressed it,
by a lieutenant of the Emperor's guards. I see here Pireni, the silver-smith,
who lay in the dungeons of the castle three years, till his last
xu
of silver
was tortured from him. I see here Hurequa, the barge-keeper, Emba, Coro
and Zacuri, who have each been victims of oppression.' He paused and
looked round upon them.
There was a low but unanimous assent.
`This, then, you feel, and dare acknowledge. Thank the gods for this one
step. How many of ourselves, think you, brethren, are there in Mexico that
endure bondage?'
`One million, perhaps,' answered several.
`And thirty thousand nobles, who are the masters, with the tyrant, Ulyd,
at their head.'
`What will this drift to?' asked one of the fishermen, cautiously, of his
fellow.
`It will drift,' answered the young man, whose quick ear had overheard
this, `to placing this million in the possession of their natural rights, which
these thirty thousand nobles unjustly withhold from them. We are men as
well as they. They have no right over our lives and liberties. Let us,
then, assert them, and break those chains that shackle us. As for me, I am
resolved to be free. The first blow will soon be struck. The time is
ripening
;
and, then, when you hear me call upon you  rise, freemen!'
The young man turned and walked away, leaving them gazing upon each
other, in mute surprise, fear, and wonder. The Mexicans had, for several
centuries, been under the sanguinary yoke of the most degrading servitude,
to an aristocracy that haughtily imagined them to belong to an inferior
species to themselves. Their persons, lands, and goods were the property
of the Emperor, who transferred them, at pleasure, to the noblemen of his
court. They had so long been accustomed to the distinction between
themselves
and the nobles, that they never looked to any change in their
destinies
,
or scarce thought of exercising any other will than that of their
masters
.
They were mild, industrious, and intelligent; and, save their political
and social condition, shared all the elements that compose useful citizens.
The artisans of this caste were skillful beyond those of any other nation of
the world, and, so fond was the Emperor and the nobles of architectural and
artificial display, were the most numerous of all. There was, besides, those
of whom was composed the vast overflowing population of the city, a still
lower and more degraded caste, attached to the soil, whose occupation was
that of agriculture. The household servants of the Emperor and nobles
were brought from distant provinces, and were of a different race from the
Mexicans, being chiefly from the country of the Xamiltepec and Flascalan
the natives of the latter being always selected as attendants on the harems
of the nobles. The army of the Emperor was composed of the bondmen
appendant of the soil, each noble bringing into the field a certain number;
and so numerous vere the vassals of this degree, that each knight could, at
any moment, place himself at the head of from six to ten thousand of his
personal retainers.
Such was the political condition of the empire of the opulent and luxurious
Aztecs at this period. Revolts, from time to time, had occurred among the
soldiery
,
and, even in former times, among the artisans in the city; but they were
speedily suppressed; and even the neighboring empire of Peru, the policy
of which was similar, had been twice revolutionized within a century.
Nevertheless
,
this state of feudal vassalage and sole imperial power, continued still
to exist unshaken  the subjects of it submissive and passive, if not content
with their chains. But a new spirit was awakened, by a series of wrongs, in
the breasts of two or three individuals of the enslaved mass, whose spirits had
not bowed so low as their fellows, and Liberty seemed about to descend and
once more make her abode among them.
`We are, indeed, slaves,' said one of the group, after Hucha had
disappeared
.
`The hunchback speaks well. We are no better than the
Xamiltepec, or base Flascalan. He speaks truth.'
`It is true,' answered Pireni, the silver-smith. `I think the Emperor
should treat us better.'
`'T is not better treatment we desire from the Emperor,' said Uhman, the
water-man; `it is freedom we want. We want to feel that our wives and
daughters are our own, and not the licentious nobles'  that our houses,
goods, and coin are
ours
.'
`This were a good thing, could it happen so,' said Hunaqua, the
barge-keeper
;
`but we wont see it in our day, neighbors.'
`No, no; not in our day; we must be content,' was the general response;
and then glancing timidly round, to see if they had been noted conversing
together, they separated, each man going to his own home. But the
startling
subject of their conference was not banished from any of their minds.
The brand had been thrown, and waited only for the wind to fan it.
The hunchback took his way along the water side, until he came to a
narrow, steep street, that led from the canal to a hill top, crowned by a
temple, erected to the god of war. This was the street of The Armorers.
It was nearly deserted, for it was already evening; and the young man
glided along the dark fronts of the buildings, beneath the overshadowing
balconies
,
for some distance, without meeting any one. His step was firm, his
pace swift, and his course decided and unhesitating. At length he stopped,
opposite a long building, of more imposing appearance than others in the
street, on the front of which was hung out a gigantic shield, showing the
craft of the occupant  for the character of every shop in the street was
designated
by a brazen helmet, a sword or spear head, a cuirass or gauntlet, or
some part of knightly garniture, each portion of armor having its own
appropriate
craftsman. The hunchback, after a moment's delay before the
building
,
crossed the street towards it, and struck upon the door.
`Is it thou, Sismarqui?' asked a voice within.
`It is Hucha,' answered the young man, in a low tone.
`Hucha! and, pray, what dost thou here, good youth, after night-coming?'
said a large, heavy man, opening the door from within, and taking him by
the hand, in a friendly manner.
`Let me enter, Ota, and I will inform thee of my business.'
He passed by him into the shop as he spoke; and the armorer, closing
the door, turned towards him.
`Ota,' asked the hunchback, in an assumed, careless tone, glancing about
the low shop, which was hung around with shields, `how many shields hast
thou here? thy craft is thriving.'
`Some seven hundred. Yes, Hucha, 't is a busy trade.'
`And thou art getting rich, doubtless?'
`Rich! Doth not the Emperor's armorer pay me eleven brass
xu
a day,
and doth he not pay the same to all artisans, of whatever trade, in Mexico,
taking their labor. Who getteth rich, that thou talkest thus, boy?' he
replied
,
angrily.
`Were the recompense of thy labor thine, Ota, how many siver
xu
couldst
thou, and thy score of apprentices, earn in a day?'
`Silver
xu?
The Emperor's lieutenant, at the armory, receives from each
knight five golden
xu
for each shield I emboss with the royal eagle, and a
golden
tsi
in addition, if I add to them a sun in low relief.'
`Thou wouldst be a happy man, Ota, would the Emperor give thee thy
honestly earned profits.'
`I could buy the third part of this street in one year's labor.'
`I would thou wert, rich, for I know thou lovest money.'
`It were a hungry love in Mexico, Hucha. I would to God I had been
born a noble.'
`Ah! dost thou love them so well as that?' asked the artful hunchback.
`Nay, I love them not, for I get little good by them  though I live by
their armor. I would be a noble only for the wealth and power it would
give me.'
`Dost thou, then, believe that their wealth and power is all that elevates
them, and the want of which degrades thee?' demanded the young man,
eagerly.
`I did not think so when I was a youth like thyself,' replied the stout
armorer, in a more cautious tone, as if he thought he was speaking too
boldly; `but I have thought since it might be the case.'
`
Thou hast thought justly
,' cried the hunchback, with enthusiasm. `They
have no natural rights that are not equally our own  slaves, bondmen,
serfs as we are. Ota, the time has come when the million of degraded
Mexitili must think for themselves. Light from the bright Sun, celestial
moral light is breaking upon my mind, and I see its beams illuminating
yours. I have visited you to feel your pulse. I find, though other causes
move it, it beats kindred to mine. I am resolved not to sleep till I have
sounded others I have in my mind  thy son, Sismarqui, and my cousin,
Montezuma, being first among them. I think I know their tempers, though,
hitherto, we have conversed on this deep matter but with our eyes, when we
have witnessed wrong we dared not avenge. But the time is coming!
Pledge me thy hand and sacred oath, thou wilt be ready to answer a call to
free thyself and all thou lovest from bondage.'
`Thou art jesting, Hucha,' said Ota, bewildered.
`It will be no jest, if I can inspire but five hundred of my fellow
bondmen
with my spirit. I tell thee, armorer, if I can make thirty young men,
whom I shall call upon to night, listen to me, I can move a power that shall
make the nobles of the empire shake in their gilded palaces.'
`By the gods! young man, I have half caught thy spirit. Hist! Let us
discourse lower. Let me hear thy plan. Thy words have broke the shell
of a nut I have been cracking within my teeth for twenty years.'
They walked apart, a few moments, in close conversation, and then the
armorer, as if replying to some question he had finally put to him, said
`Come hither, and I will show thee.'
He led him towards a door, at the extremity of the shop, and they passed
through it, and crossed a narrow court, to a door that led into the rear of the
adjacent building.
`Now, if thou canst get Insquini, the old sword-maker, to join us, his
influence
will bring in two thirds of the armorers, with their apprentices, in
this street.'
They knocked at the door, which was opened by a small, old man, who,
nevertheless, possessed much of the bearing and fire of youth in his
appearance
.
`Ah! neighbor, is it thou? I was about retiring for the night,' he said,
neither repelling nor inviting them to enter.
`I have brought thee Hucha, the hunchback, who would speak a word
with thee, touching matters, I think, will find thine a willing ear.'
Insquini, on seeing the hunchback, extended his hand frankly towards
him, and said
`Come in, young friend! 'T is over late  but thy company is always
welcome  ever ready at a song thou  ever with a pleasant tale on thy lip.
Come in  come in!'
They entered the shop, and Hucha's eyes glistened, as the lamp the
sword-maker
held gleamed along tiers of swords, arranged symmetrically on the
sides of the long, narrow apartment. It was impossible to read, otherwise
than truly, the language that glowed in them, as he surveyed the steely
array.
`Insquini, thou makest a goodly show of steel, here,' he said, carelessly.
`Doubtless, thou hast a thousand good blades there?'
`Better than that, master. Eighteen hundred at the most  besides a
stack of seven hundred sent here to day to burnish, not yet unpacked.'
`What dost thou make swords for, Insquini?'
`Make swords for, boy?'
`Aye, what are they for? What is their use?'
`Nay  thou art disposed to be merry with an old man, and quibble his
dull brain with a riddle.'
`I was never more serious in my life.'
`I make them for knights and nobles; and I have even burnished a sword
for the Emperor's own use, before I got so old.'
`And what do the knights and nobles with those swords when they get
them?'
`Use them in battle.'
`How long is it since our knights fought in battle?'
`It is seven  nay, eight years.'
`And thou hast had no work in swords since then, Insquini.'
`Bless you, Hucha! It would seem the swords have been made three to
one since then.'
`What is done with them?'
`The nobles or knights, our masters, wear them in bravery by the side, as
it were.'
`And they have made no manner of use of them, then, for eight years.'
`Use! Doth not every gallant slay his man a day?' said the
sword-maker
,
laughing. `There hath been little idle steel, master hunchback!
Ha, ha, ha! Our knights keep themselves in practice.'
`
How?
' demanded the hunchback, coming close to him, and speaking
sternly.
`How!' repeated the sword-maker, starting back a step, alarmed at this
sudden alteration in his hitherto apparently indifferent tone and manner.
`Yes
how
do they keep their swords in play  on wlat objects?'
`Why, surely, master Hucha, upon we citizens about,' replied the artificer,
with a forced laugh; `if we please not their humor.'
`Upon we citizens about, if we please not their humor!' repeated the
young man, with biting irony, mingled with grief. `Yes, thou hast well
said, Inisquini! Would to the gods, the next knight that crosses thy
thresh-hold
would thrust thee through, and impale thee to the side of thy shop, to
test the temper of thy swords.'
`Dost thou wish it, cruel youth?' asked the sword-maker, with surprise
and injured feeling.
`Dost
thou?
' demanded Hucha, with imperative emphasis.
`No, surely,' said the man, with a shudder.
`Yet, it may happen to thee, any day. Dost thou never think of it?'
`Often; but I have escaped all my life, till now.'
`Because thy occupation was useful to them, and thou hast been cunning
in thy speech, with a slave's wisdom. But, passing by thyself  thou hast
five sons, who work with thee at thy craft.'
`Hath harm come to them?' asked the old man, grasping the wrist of
the hunchback, and looking eagerly for his reply.
`No  that I have knowledge of; but thou hast no peace in them. They
may be slain before thy face, and thou not be able to save them.'
`I know it  I fear it hourly,' answered Insquini, with paternal feeling.
`Old man, what wouldst thou do if thou couldst insure thy sons' lives to
good old age?'
`Sacrifice myself to the gods,' answered the father, fervently.
`I know thou wouldst. But thou canst effect it easier. Thou art an old
man, and have seen and thought much. I need not tell thee that the nobles
who enslave us do it not because they are more powerful in number than
we, but because we are the most degraded in spirit?' Is it not so?'
`Hush! thou wilt be heard,' cried Inisquini, with fear.
`Is it not so?' repeated Hucha, more determinedly.
`I have thought it was; but '
`It
is
so. If thou and thy five sons should this moment be sent for by
any dissolute noble, to be set up for a pastime, and then slain, you would
weep, and wail, and wring your hands, and implore the gods; but yet you
would go, like bullocks dragged to the altar of sacrifice.'
The old man looked timidly round, and shrunk within himself with mortal
fear, as if he expected to hear at his door the supposed summons. `Go,
Hucha, go; thou wilt assuredly bring death upon me and mine,' he cried,
trembling.
`Inisquini,' said the young man, solemnly, `I know thou hast a resolute
spirit by nature, and art considered wise above thy fellow-craftsmen. I will
be brief with thee. In a word  within three days the power of the nobles
shall be overthrown, the chains that bind us shall be sundered, and every
serf in Mexico shall be free as heaven's own light.'
`Madman!' cried the sword-maker, with angry surprise.
`There is method in my madness. Listen: I have been, this night,
injured
beyond my forbearance, by these nobles. They cast my father into
the canal, for sport, and, but for me, he would have perished; and me they
mocked with jeers and jests that have stung me to the soul. No, Inisquini!
I shall be passive no longer. Thirty thousand nobles shall not keep their
feet on the necks of a million men, that can walk with their faces
heavenward
.
I shall neither sleep nor eat till I have awakened in the breast of every
man in whom bondage has yet left man's moral courage, the spirit of
retributive
vengeance against our oppressors.
The sword-maker gazed upon the glowing and indignant face of Hucha
for a few seconds after he had ceased, and then paced the floor with a hasty
step. The hunchback pressed the hand of the armorer, Ota, and smiled
victoriously as he looked after him, and witnessed the effect of his words.
`The fire takes,' he said; and added, feelingly, `my degraded
fellow-bondmen
will yet assert their rights!'
`Hucha, there is my hand!' at length said the sword-maker, in a firm
voice; `it were better to die, as surely we must, if we attempt this thing and
fail, than live longer so.'
`We shall
not
die! the gods favor it,' said Hucha, elevating his right hand
towards heaven with a look of kindling enthusiasm. `Let us three embrace
and swear by the sun, our sacred father, we will devote ourselves to this
cause!'
We swear!' all three repeated, in one voice together, stretching their
hands towards the East.
`Now, noble Inisquini,' said the youth, smiling, and glancing at the serried
lines of blades, `we have twenty-five hundred swords. Is it not so?'
`How?' demanded the sword-maker, with astonishment.
`When I came in we had seven hundred shields. Was it not so, Ota?'
said Hucha drily.
The sword-maker turned upon the armorer, and asked, incredulously,
`Hast thou indeed given the emperor's shields to this enterprise?'
`Shall we send them with these swords to him and his knights, to use
against us, should this matter come to a head,' replied Ota, ironically.
`Be it so,' said Inisquini, acquiescing in a measure that at first startled
him, from its magnitude, `I did not think this was so well-shaped a plan. I
can see deeper into it. Hucha, go, with my blessing! Be shrewd, cautious,
and bold.'
`Thou must labor, too. With thy sons and apprentices, and those of Ota,
there are already sixty men counted. They must know it only at the last
moment, when they are wanted for action. They are sure?'
`Sure to do our bidding,' replied both of the artificers together.
`You now know my plan,' said Hucha. `I go now to communicate it to
others. You must be equally diligent to-night and to-morrow in sounding
the armorers through the street. Ten thousand men ought to be
communicated
with, each one converting his fellow, by to-morrow's sunset.'
`For arms,' said Inisquini, `a thousand suits of armor, and swords and
spears enough for twelve thousand men, can be found at hand in this street.'
`And I will bring twelve thousand men to demand them,' said the
hunchback
,
with energy. `Now fare thee well. I must see thy son Sismarqui
to-night, Ota, and, above all, I must see Montezuma.'
`Sismarqui was sent to the armory, but I think Montezuma's fair sister
hath beguiled him of his time on his way back, or he would have been at
home ere this.'
The hunchback bit his lips as he alluded to his cousin Fatziza, as though
he did not relish the coupling of her name with that of the armorer's son
but he said nothing. Grasping the hand of Inisquini, and again urging upon
him to kindle the spirit of insurrection in the breasts of all his trustiest
acquaintances
,
he left him, after the latter had placed in his hand a short,
two-edged
sword, of the finest temper, and with the embosser returned to his
shop by the way he had come.
When Sismarqui returns, say nothing to him of this matter until I meet
him,' he said, as Ota opened the street door to let him out. I will pass here
again before midnight, and give your door a tap to see if he is in, should I
not find him at the net-maker's. Be faithful and true, and thou wilt yet
have thy most glittering visions of wealth realized.'
With these words, the hunchback bade the armorer good night, and issued
forth into the street. He proceeded a short distance along the west side of
it, and entered a shop which was not yet closed. The sign above the door
was a pike. He remained within, ten or twelve minutes, and re-appeared
with an elastic step, and proceeded to an artificer's opposite, and tapped at a
low door, above which was the sign of a helmet, and in a moment after
disappeared
within. Scarcely had he done so before the embosser's door, and
that of Inisquini simultaneously opened, and both made their appearance
wrapped in their scarfs. They met, and conferred an instant on the walk,
and then, separating, pursued different ways, with the air of men bent on
some deep and secret purpose. As Inisquini glided past the shop designated
by the helmet, the hunchback came out.
`Hucha! is it thou?'
`Ah! 't is Inisquini!' returned the other, after a scrutinizing glance.
`What of Requa?'
`The gods seem to have gone before me and breathed into men the spirit
of liberty,' was the animated reply of the young man. `I have only, it
would seem, to lift a standard on yonder summit of the hill of the temple, to
gather a host.'
`Be not rash. Let us proceed safely that we may gain securely,' said the
sword-maker. `Leave this street to Ota and myself, and go you and see
such as live beyond this quarter, whom you think will join us. Let every
thing be secret and sacred till the day and hour be rife. We are moving
abroad with our lives in our open palms.'
`I will then seek Montezuma first,' said Hucha, as he parted from him;
I rely greatly on his judgment and sagacity, if he will join us.'
`We meet at midnight, at my house,' said Inisquini.
`At midnight, then, we shall know whether we are to live slaves, or die
men,' answered Hucha.
Inisquini then parted from him and entered the shop of a halberd-maker,
while the hunchback, after going a short distance in the opposite direction,
turned a corner, and pursued his way along a thoroughfare that led towards
the net-makers' street.
CHAPTER V.
MONTEZUMA.
The quarter of the city in which occurred the tumult and massacre of so
many citizens, in consequence of the intrepid and spirited conduct of the
young scrf Montezuma, in wresting the noble's spear from him, as it was
entering his bosom, was situated towards the East gate, nearly a mile from
the palace, and two thirds of a mile from the net-makers' street, and on the
same side of the canal with the latter. The street in which it occurred was
one of four great avenues that extended from East to West, across the
city, passing over the marble bridges of the canal. In this quarter, the
citizens  if men may be so called that are not freemen  were chiefly
lapidaries
,
and workers in marble, builders, and architects, each craft having its
own street for its peculiar pursuits. It was near the entrance of the street
of lapidaries, where it terminated in an open square, containing an altar to
the god of war, that the fray in which the youth was so conspicuous,
occurred
.
The magnificent procession flowed on, like a river of silken and
golden waves, bearing upon its tide banners, spears, helmets, and plumes,
and moving to the sound of music of the most brilliant and martial
description
.
When the last of the procession, which consisted of a troop of
horsemen
,
clad in steel from peak to spur, had passed by, the multitude, which had
remained motionless and still from the moment the slaughter ceased, gave
breath to a low, deep, long pent-up murmur. There was a slight movement,
and every eye was instinctively turned towards the young man who had been
the cause of the tumult. Montezuma was leaning upon the broken
spear-shaft
he had wrested from the governor of the guard, gazing sternly upon
the dead and dying that lay in their blood at his feet. He at length looked up,
as if he felt their eyes upon him, and, glancing round upon them, again bent his
gaze upon the slain, and remained silent. Of the thousands in that multitude,
there were but few that had seen the young net-maker before his resistance to
the noble who commanded the emperor's guard. Five or six alone of those
about him were his friends and acquaintances; and so dearly had he attached
himself to these, by years of intercourse with them, that no sooner did they
see his life threatened, than, though overcome with surprise at his daring to
resist, they cast themselves before him, not to strike a blow in his defence
for, until this day, this no bondman had dared do  but to cover him with
their bodies. One after another they fell, cut down by the soldiery, when
those around, struck by this devotion, animated by the bold spirit of the
young man, who seemed by the presence of his commanding countenance, to
command their lives, and filled with that new spirit of freedom which seems
at times to descend upon a nation in one day, and as if inspired by the souls of
the fallen, impulsively cast themselves before the breast which had become
the target of so many sanguinary spears, and received in their bodies the
deadly wounds so fatally aimed at him.
Some of the surviving friends of the slain at length broke the silence,
and began to cry out loudly against him, and accuse him of their death.
Others regarded him as if he had been a superior being, and there
threatened
to be a division among them.
`Men and fellow-bondmen, why stand ye here, gazing upon me, as if I
5
were not of like flesh and blood?' he cried, looking round upon them with
stern pity. `Wherefore do ye murmur with yourselves? I have resisted a
noble, and there lie in our midst eighteen dead men who have paid with
their lives for my offence. They are your brethren and mine. I am guilty
of their death. Let him who is the most degraded slave among ye, strike
through the heart that these brave men died to protect.'
As he spoke, he bowed his manly bosom, and seemed to pause and await
the death he demanded.
`Ye are silent! I am not accused. Men and brethren, these dead men
fell not by my hand, though by daring to resist a tyrant, I have been
instrumental
to their death. They fell by the swords of assassins  they are the
victims of the emperor's retributive vengeance. His wrath, which, for the
kindness of some of ye could not reach me, fell upon these! Was it a just
deed to slay these men? I wait for your reply.'
`No  no,' cried several stern voices.
`There spoke the true spirit I would rouse in ye. Hear me! We are
within the walls of Mexico nine hundred thousand slaves, with skins as fair
and hearts as warm as our masters.'
There was an extraordinary movement in the throng, and a confused,
agitated murmur at these words, so new to their ears, and they listened with
pale, eager faces, in which was settled a look of intense expectation, as he
continued.
`And who are these masters? A sanguinary emperor whom you never
behold but with fear of your lives; a body of haughty knights and nobles
of the same spirit with himself, whose pastime it is to slay your sons and
brothers in the streets, for imaginary offences, and violate the honor of your
wives and daughters.'
`True, true,' cried a single voice near him; `true,' echoed a second; `it is
all true,' was taken up by one and another, till a hundred voices responded,
at first, faintly, but as their numbers increased, with almost menacing
firmness
.
Montezuma looked around and smiled, while he lifted his hands to
heaven in gratitude.
`The gods be thanked! I perceive there is coming a day of reckoning for
our masters! Who are these masters? A body not a fiftieth part so
numerous as ourselves, enervated by luxury, and idle and dissolute, because
supported by the unrewarded labor of our own hands. What right, brethren,
has the emperor to seize upon the fruits of your toil? By what claim does
the knight and noble hold the wages earned by the sweat of your brows?
If you earn twelve silver
xu
a day, by what authority does the emperor take
eleven  aye, and the twelfth, if he choose  and cut off your heads and
cast your bodies into the kennel if ye dare to murmur! What joy has the
mother in her first born, or the father in the son of his strength, or the
bridegroom
in his bride, or the brother in his sister's love, if they may be at any
moment torn from the embraces of your affections, and become the property
of tyrants, murderers, and adulterers?'
There was an evidence of the deepest feeling pervading the multitude, as
they listened to language such as none had ever listened to before, and
received ideas that few present had dared entertain, even in the secret closets
of their own hearts. Some who heard him, and had gathered near him from
the first, had partaken of his spirit, and had evidently long thought as he
did. There was visible an elated joy in their stern countenances that
showed
they had at last found a spirit to whose guidance they could safely and freely
surrender themselves, with their crude and half-formed notions of liberty, which,
until this occasion, had been cherished secretly and timidly in their bosoms.
Montezuma dreamt not such a spirit was alive in Mexico. But when the
magnetized steel comes in contact with metals, all that is true steel, though
not at first discerned, at once flies to meet it. He soon found about him a
score of young and middle-aged men, in whom he saw a spirit kindred with
his own. He instantly took advantage of the impression he had made, not
only on them, but on the whole multitude.
Fellow-bondmen! It is time we should know our rights as men, and
citizens of this empire. We and our fathers have been slaves full long to
the emperor and his haughty nobility. Let us break our chains, and elevate
our condition to that of freemen. Let us demand of him protection, by just
laws, for our lives, our possessions, and our domestic honor. Let us secure
to ourselves the right of property in lands, and goods, and tenements, and no
longer hold them, with our lives, at his will. Let us retain for our own
maintenance, and towards the accumulation of wealth, the proceeds of our
toil, which now flows into his coffers. In fine, let us become freemen! If
the emperor will consent to this, his throne shall rest secure, and we will
defend it with our lives  if he will not, let us hurl him from it, and
establish
a government that shall secure to us those political and social rights that
belong to mankind. Behold,' he cried, pointing to the heap of slain, `
behold
the first sacrifice on the altar of our liberties. It was the gods alone
who inspired these men to this act of fatal devotion. Let the spot where
they lie be sacred. Let their bodies be the altar by which we will kneel
and swear to deliver ourselves from bondage, or die as they have died!'
A commotion like that of the wind sweeping across heaving waves rose
upon the air. It was not loud, but deep and earnest. Every man in the
vast multitude seemed moved with the feelings he had awakened. Every
bosom of the thousand bondmen seemed struggling to break from its chains.
The eye of the young insurgent kindled as he beheld the effect produced.
It was the crisis, and he seized it. Elevating his arms, he called on the
gods to bear witness, and stretching his right hand towards the setting sun,
he solemnly adjured this sacred deity to behold his act; then, bending over
the dead, he laid his left hand upon the pile of slain, and lifting the other
towards the heavens, cried, in a voice that rung like a trumpet,
`Behold, ye gods, and thou, most sacred sun! Here, on this consecrated
altar, I swear to be the liberator of my country. Swear, ye who will with
me be free!'
A thousand arms were lifted toward heaven, and a thousand voices
responded,
`We swear!'
Moutezuma looked around upon them as they ceased, and, spreading out
his hands over them, fervently blessed them, from the enthusiasm of his full
and ardent feelings.
`Yes, my friends!' he added, `this spirit is from the gods, and not of
ourselves
.
Let us feel that we are acting under their guidance, and are
protected
by their power. Now, I pray you, retire to your abodes in quiet,
until the hour is rife. It may be at midnight  it may be at sunrise. The
signal shall be a flame on the summit of the temple of the god of war, which
we shall first seize and defend. In the mean while be ready to act, and
busily spread the spirit of revolt throughout your quarter. I hasten to my
own quarter, in the centre of the city, which I shall rouse, if the gods go with
me. Let not the rumor reach the palace; and, lest any traitor should seek
to betray our open plot ere it be matured, at once guard the avenues from
your quarter, and let no man leave it. Ha! yonder moves hastily away
a Flascalan eunuch of the palace, and there sits upon horseback, on the
out-skirts
,
a cavalier. Seize them both! Let this deed show your sincerity.'
The Flascalan fled, and succeeded in making his escape, but the other was
instantly surrounded, and would have been bodily torn from his horse to the
earth, when the knight, who had coolly permitted them to approach within a
few feet of him, unmoved, suddenly cired,
`I will betray you not, brave citizens! Conduct me to your leader, for I
would speak with him.'
`Give up thy sword, then, master,' said one of the most resolute and
zealous of the insurgents.
`Take it,' he replied, giving it readily to him.
As the crowd retired to either side, to let the knight pass through, the
young chief eyed him, first with suspicion, and then with the closest curiosity.
He was a man of large stature, and courteous bearing, and rode one of those
powerful, black horses, of the warlike breed, imported from Peru. His
armor was plain, but not in fashion, like that worn by the Aztec nobles, and
there was no device upon his shield, and on his brazen helmet was the crest
of a lion, instead of the Aztec eagle. His visor was closed; but the short,
light, brown hair escaped beneath his casque, and rested on his shapely
shoulders. As he approached Montezuma, who stood in the space where
lay the dead bodies, his horse reared so powerfully as to threaten to fall
backwards upon his rider, who kept his seat as unmoved as if the motions of
the animal were the result of his own will. The silence and expectation
of the crowd was immense as he came near.
`Young man,' he said, in a tone slightly of reproof, `thou art hasty in
setting upon a knight with such deadly purpose as these friends of thine but
now manifested towards me.'
`Thou wert a listener, noble, to treason. Thou shouldst have held on thy
way, and thou wouldst not have been a prisoner, as now. But methinks
thou art not of Mexico, by thy speech and device.'
`I am a Peruvian, having but this hour entered your city, and having
been witness of thy spirit as I delayed to gaze on the religious procession
and the beauty of the emperor's fair daughter, I was unawares a witness of
what has followed, and did listen to your speech, brave youth, with a
delighted
bosom. I am a Peruvian, and can sympathize with thee.'
`If thou art a Peruvian, then thou art welcome; for I am told there are
no bondmen in Peru, but that the Inca is father to a nation of children. Is
it so, knight?'
`Thou hast been well informed,' replied the knight. `Peace, love, and
contentment dwell with us, and justice and mercy are as the right and left
hands of the Inca, our father.'
`Peru is the land of freedom, friends,' cried Montezuma. `Let us confer
upon Mexico the same blessings. Pray, sir knight, whither do you ride?
through the city? Thou art free to go.'
`Nay, I am but a stranger, and know no hostel better than another. If
either among you could give me hospitality till the morning, I should prefer
it, as my business hither requires that I should be awhile private.'
`Thou shalt go with me, noble sir,' said Montezuma, `though thou wilt
find but poor fare and rude entertainment beneath a net-maker's roof.'
`It is good enough, young man. I will be thy guest; and it may be I can
advise thee somewhat as to guiding the direction of this vast flood thou hast
so boldly unbanked; and if thou wilt, when I shall get through my affairs,
accept my arm and good sword; they shall be freely given to thy cause.'
In a few moments afterwards, the multitude retired from the square to
their several homes, to arm and prepare for the contemplated revolt. The
success of Montezuma in rousing them to action, showed that the love of
liberty is inherent in the human heart, and that, however it may be
obscured
,
it is never wholly extinguished. Not five men in degraded and
enslaved
Mexico until this day had ever spoken the word, and few knew that
there was such a thing as liberty. But the manner in which they received
it when it was pronounced, told plainly that the chord was in their bosoms,
and had hitherto been silent for want of a bold hand to strike it.
Still did Montezuma dream, that the spirit that was kindled in his bosom
was at the same moment firing the breast of the bold young armorer,
Sismarqui
,
rung a mile distant in the net-maker's street, and would shortly,
uninfluenced by either voluntarily, animate the soul of the insulted hunchback.
But Liberty, when she would be worshipped on earth, erects her statue in
such temples as she will; and this evening the sacred flame of freedom,
simultaneously lighted by her own hand, blazed from the chosen altars of
three of the noblest hearts in Mexico.
`Sir knight,' said Montezuma, when the citizens had retired from the
place, which they did in deep and solemn silence, as if their newly awakened
feelings were too serious for words, `dost thou note that deep undercurrent?
how mighty its flow  yet how noiseless! It is this that is going to undermine
the palaces of our masters, and sweep away the ruins, till there shall not be
left a column on its pedestal.'
`Thou hast set in motion a fearful power, young man,' said the knight,
gravely, `which, uncontrolled, will overthrow not only this fair empire, but
recoil upon itself to its own whelming ruin. Pray, as we go along, give me
the history of this matter of public grievance.'
Montezuma pointed to the heap of slain.
`There is written to-day's page of wrongs. Each day hath its leaf.'
`Nay  I know all this. The laws and government and manners of thy
empire we in Peru are not strangers to. I see that you have, at last,
revolted
,
and are meditating the subversion of the throne. But what is the
mode of government, with which thou wouldst replace the present? Wouldst
thou slay the emperor and the nobles, and let each man be his own
governor
?'
`No, knight; this were exchanging tyranny for anarchy. I would not
destroy the throne, but purify it. The emperor should be the ruler of his
people  not their master.'
`You would destroy, then, the barriers that stand between you and the
nobility, leave their rank open to the deserving among yourselves, and from
vassals and appendages to the power of the nobles, become free and
inpendent
citizens, with none but political subjection to the emperior.'
`It is this we aim at,' said Montezuma, with animation, `alone.'
`
You
, yourself, may aim at what you will, young man, if, as it seems, the
gods have decreed you to be leader in this revolt. Take care your virtue
be not wrecked, when ambition take the helm!'
`Nay, by the sacred sun, knight!' said the youth, warmly. `Let my
hopes of my country's freedom be realized to the extent you name, and I
will be content after to be offered the first sacrifice to the gods.'
`Such is thy present spirit, because thou art not yet tempted. Methinks,'
he then said, carelessly, `it was the beauty of the princess Eylla, whom I
beheld in the chariot, that led thee to thrust thyself in the way of the rude
knight's spear, and that now threatens to overturn Mexico.'
`How knowest thou it was the Princess Eylla, Peruvian, if thou hast but
now entered the city a stranger?' asked the young Mexitlian, sternly, looking
suspiciously upon him, as if he sought to penetrate the bars of his closed visor.
`I have been full free in my confidence?'
`Thou holdest my sword in thy hand, and a thousand men would be
obedient to thy sign,' answered the knight, calmly. `I inquired of a
by-stander
,
and he told me. I knew the emperor by his crown, and having
seen his face stamped upon thy coin.'
`Pardon me, knight. But this is a time when confidence should be given
cautiously, especially to one of thy rank. If thou art, as thou sayest, a
Peruvian, come hither on matters of private import, I seek not to penetrate
thy secret, and do again restore thee my confidence. If thou wilt follow me,
I will guide thee to my abode. I have much to do ere midnight.'
The knight dismounted, as if in courtesy to his companion, and, putting
his bridle on his arm, walked beside him. As they passed along through
the narrow and winding streets, the sight of a bondman and a knight
walking
by together, drew many to the doors of their shops, and upon their
balconies.
`I did awhile since allude to the beauty of the emperor's daughter, young
man,' said the knight, as they went along, as if disposed to converse. `What
is her favor with the court?'
`She is lively, in mind as in person, and of a sweet and gentle temper
in all things opposite to the emperor,' answered Montezuma, warmly.
`Hath she been sought in marriage, knowest thou?'
`It is rumored the haughty Prince Palipan will espouse her.'
`Ah! hath she regard for him?'
`Rumor saith not; but 't is the emperor's will, and there is none other in
the empire she can wed.'
The knight walked on in silence a little while, and then suddenly asked,
`When do these espousals take place?'
`Within seven days  on the anniversary of her twentieth birth-day.'
`She is very fair, surpassing my conception of her,' said the knight, after
a pause, as if discoursing with his own mind. He then said, turning to
Montezuma,
`Will not this revolt of the city thou hast on foot grieve this sweet
princess?'
`Nay, I had not thought of it. One would willingly remain a slave, to
shield her from sorrow.'
`Spoken gallantly. I am rejoiced to hear she hath such favor with those
of thy rank.'
`Thou takest singular interest in her for a Peruvian noble,' said
Montezuma
.
`The fame of her beauty hath reached our capital, and the Inca's son
hath been enamored of her in imagination. Her name is the theme of song
among knights and nobles.'
`It were better she were thy prince's bride than that of Prince Palipan,
said the youth, with animation; `yet, methinks, when I remember her gentle
beauty, I should rather she would not marry at all.'
The knight turned his face towards him, as if struck by the manner rather
than by the words of the young man, and then said, with a light laugh,
`Have a care, young chief. There is no bound to the horizon of a youth's
ambition, when he hath once begun to climb.'
As the knight said this, they came near the ruins of what was once a
stately palace. It was now blackened with fire, and its court filled with rank
grass. It presented a scene of singular wildness and desolation in the midst
of a city so full of life.'
The Peruvian paused, and detained his companion by the arm, while he
earnestly surveyed it.
`It is the Axuzco palace,' said Montezuma.
The knight made no reply for some time. At length he said, in a voice
that had all at once become deep and stern,
`Young man, knowest thou the history of this ill-fated family?'
`'T is said  't was when I was a boy it happened  that the Lord
Axuzco
was a traitor, and so the emperor banished him, and razed his palace.'
`He was a traitor, young man, just as thou art now a traitor! He was a
patriotic and a brave man, and dared to tell the tyrant Ulyd his mind. At
length, sickened with the tyranny of the emperor and the licentiousness of
the nobles, with indignation and disgust he withdrew himself from them,
joined himself with the oppressed people, and raised the standard of revolt,
and shouted liberty to the enslaved. This palace was the seat of the
conspiracy
.
But the mass of the debased people knew not the cry, and did not
obey it. He was taken, with a few score of the boldest spirits, that had
united themselves to him, and cast into prison. His companions were
decapitated
and quartered. He himself wrested the headman's axe from his
hands on the very seaffold, and, cutting his way through the soldiers with
the glittering instrument, unborsed a knight, leaped into his saddle, and
escaped through the gates.'
`I never heard of all this before,' said Montezuma, who had listened with
surprise to the knight's narrative.
`Because those with whom thou hast been dare not speak of it. The
name of Axuzco is accursed in Mexico by imperial decree.'
`Would to the gods we had this good knight's arm, now that people have
responded to the cry of liberty.'
`Young man,' said the knight, in an impressive voice, `thou hast thy wish.
Behold in me the banished lord of Axuzco!'
`Thou!' cried Montezuma, starting back at a name that he had but
seldom
heard repeated, and with which he had hitherto associated the darkest
and most fearful qualities.
`Yes. I have come back, after eighteen years' exile, to see once more my
native land and the halls of my youth. The gods have brought me to my
journey's end this day, as if by design. Thou knowest not how my blood
leaped when I saw thee, ere I had got a furlong into the city, resist the
emperor's guard. I thanked heaven that I had found one man in Mexico
on my return. I could have embraced thee to my heart.'
`Noble lord of Axuzco '
`Nay, I am but a simple Peruvian cavalier  my secret is with thee till I
see fit to reveal it  I but gave it into thy keeping as pledge of confidence.
Now I do think of it, I will e'en seek the naked hospitality of my own
abode. My steed will fare richly off the wild grass of the court, and I need
nothing. When thou needest my aid, thou wilt find me in yonder wing.
There was my chamber, and I would make friendship with its walls again.'
`Footstep hath not ventured there since thou left it, sir.
`Then 't is the more sacred to my feelings. When thou dost think thyself
sufficiently safe to light thy beacon upon the Temple of War, come hither
with those friends thou takest into thy closest councils, and let once more
the standard of liberty be raised within these walls which the emperor's
curse hath consecrated to be its most sacred temple.'
As he spoke he grasped the young man's hand and led his horse beneath
the dilapidated archway of the ruin, and crossed the gloomy court in the
direction of the main body of the building, which, though partially destroyed,
still preserved the outline of its former stately character, and some remains
of its architectural beauty.
Montezuma, after lingering a moment till he saw him pass through the
ivy-mantled entrance to the hall, pursued his way, wondering at the events
that the last hour had produced. The day was nearly at a close when he
resumed his way, and he had gone but a few steps when the crimson light
of the altar fires illumined the sky and told him that the sun had set. He
stopped, and turning his face towards the west, crossed his hands upon his
breast, and for an instant worshipped, and then continued rapidly to walk
forward. At length he entered a narrow lane, lined on both sides with
dark gloomy buildings, and at the extremity was an arch and battlement
crowned by massive towers. The street led beneath this arch and lost
itself in a broader thoroughfare beyond which itself led to the canal
touching
it not far above the net-makers' street.
He continued to walk rapidly forward through the lane, until he
approached
the arch, where was stationed a guard to protect the armory,
which was a vast structure with long tiers of stone galleries in the midst of
a vast paved court, on the left of the archway. He still held the broken
pike in his hand, though scarcely conscious of possessing it.
Ha! Montezuma! what dost thou with the head of a knight's spear?'
said the soldier, a tall and almost gigantic man, in the tone of an
acquaintance
.
`There is blood upon it, too!'
`Hist, Gila!' said Montezuma, as he came near him. `When wilt thou
be off guard?'
`Within an hour, or little more.'
`Then come thou, on the instant thou art free, privately to my house.
I would speak with thee.'
`And what with the cruel Fatziza?'
`'T is sterner pastime I would invite thee to! When my sister gave the
preference to thy brother Sismarqui, thou didst say thou wouldst abide by
her decision and forget her. I trust thou hast.'
I find a steel corslet wont keep love out of the heart after he once hath
found the way in. I would go back to embossing shields instead of bearing
them  but the captain here took such a fancy to my make and inches, he
will not let me go  but talked to day of sending me to the emperor's
life-guard
.'
`Come then to me the moment thou art at liberty,' said Montezuma,
passing
him.
`But that bloody spear-head!'
`I will tell thee, by and by. We are on the eve of revolt. Has
Sismarqui
been here to day for shields?'
`I expect him now, to bring half a score, that were ordered to be sent
home at this hour.'
If I meet him not, and he should come, tell him without delay to hasten
to me.'
With these words, Montezuma passed the tall man-at-arms, who it seemed,
had been taken into the guard from the clan of artisans, on account of his
strength and stature, and which he had joined as a cure for unrequited love.
Montezuma, on emerging from the arched passage, was proceeding at a
swift pace, when he met the apprentices of the embosser, bearing the shields
towards the armory.
`Where is Sismarqui?' he asked, stopping the first one, and addressing
him so sternly, from the depth of his feelings, that it was with difficulty he
could reply, and when he did, it was with what had been uppermost in their
minds since they had left the net-makers' street, ten minutes before.
`He hath unhorsed a knight!'
`What sayest thou?'
`He hath had a fray with a knight!' said the other, with more
self-possession
.
`Dost thou know what thou sayest?' he demanded, in the intensest
surprise
.
`A mounted knight, in passing the balcony, did give thy sister a kiss, and
young master Sismarqui, thereat, caught two of the shields and struck them
together so loudly that his horse leaped and threw him.'
`And what did the knight? what further did Sismarqui?' demanded the
young man, with breathless interest.
`The knight drew his sword, and rushed upon him '
`Yes  yes '
`And Sismarqui caught the blade on this shield  here is the dent  and
shivered it to the hilt.'
`And what then? Glorious Sismarqui!'
`The knight, after some fierce discourse, rode away.'
`And this you tell me is true?'
`Every word of it; here is the shield.'
`Let me see it. Ah! 't was well done! Liberty hath carved here her
own scutcheon,' he said, pressing his lips upon it. `I will take this sacred
shield! Pass on!'
`'T is for the armory.'
`It matters not whether it be taken now, or five hours hence. Leave it
with me.'
They continued on their way, after looking upon each other, as if
wondering
at the meaning of his words, and he remained for a minute, gazing upon
the shield.
`I should regard the tale as a dream, but that I do behold here, with my
eyes, this deep indent upon the breast of the imperial eagle. This was
no chance stroke that lighted so truly upon this emblem of tyranny. Thus
shall the eagle himself be stricken! Sismarqui, thou art my soul's own
mate!'
`What dost thou, Montezuma, speaking to that shield?' said a voice close
to his ear.
Sismarqui, my brave Sismarqui!' was the only reply of the noble youth,
and he ardently embraced him.
`Art thou mad?' asked the young man, with surprise.
`Mad! yes, with joy! Look! dost thou know
this
device?'
'T was carved there by a knight, not half an hour since.'
6
`And thou didst have words, then, with this knight?' questioned
Montezuma
,
hurriedly.
`He did from his horse lean forward to kiss Fatziza, as she sat in the
balcony
,
and I unhorsed him by '
`I know it  And he aimed to avenge himself, and thou didst defend thy
life like a man! Let me again embrace thee. We are more than brothers!
What merit have we, that the gods have so blessed us this day. I too have
resisted a knight  the Governor of the emperor's guard, who would have
slain me for being near his way  but  nay, this tells the rest!' he said,
exhibiting the broken spear.
`Tis a noble's lance!'
`This I wrested from him and broke.'
`There is blood on it!?
`Yes, for I slew with it, three men-at-arms  and they slew eighteen
artisans
,
who sought to save my life.'
`Montezuma!' exclaimed the young man, with the deepest surprise.
`'T was done within the hour, in the street of columns.'
`If this hath been done, then 't is from this moment, the people or nobles.'
`Thou hast it, brother! I did not think I should be half way met in this
thing. I have further to tell thee. Full seven thousand men saw this
contest
;
and when the procession passed on, I inflamed their breasts with a bold,
dark picture of their bondage, and at this moment, there are seven thousand
hearts in that quarter, that have your spirit and mine! I have just seen a
forest of hands lifted to the sun, and heard, like the sullen surges of the
heaving
sea, thousands of voices as that of one man, swearing to be free.'
`Hast thou, oh, hast thou?' scarcely could articulate the young armorer.
`Aye, and of the gods, too!'
`Then hath the empire of the tyrant passed into other hands from this
hour,' said Sismarqui, fervently. `Whither goest thou? What is thy
purpose
?'
`I was hastening to find thee, to tell thee that thou wert a slave, and that
it was time thou didst get thyself free. But thanks to this knight, he hath
taught thee the lesson more briefly than I could have done it. I wish each
bond-slave in Mexico could be thus taught it  it would leave me little to
do but point to the eastle, to the gates, and then to the palace. My purpose
is, now that thou hast thy lesson  to give thee one hour to bring over with
thy brother Gila, every soldier of the guard in the armory. There is not
one but hates the emperor and would side with us, were the standard of
revolt
once raised. For how many men is there armor there?'
`Suits for eight thousand nobles, and forty thousand soldiers.'
`'T will do! The signal will be a flame on the summit of the temple of
the god of war, which I shall first seize, and the light will be the sign of
success. After you have been to the armory, which you must possess
yourself
of when you see the light illumining the city, return and rouse this
quarter
,
by calling on all our friends and neighbors, and tell them to arm, for that
this night Mexico is to be made free. The conduct of the revolt in this
ward, you will take yourself.
`What hour will the signal be given?'
`If possible, at midnight. I have a few friends to call on, and arouse.
In one hour I shall have visited every dwelling in my own street. Meet me
then at my house, where I shall call together those whom I find best fitted to
take the lead in this rebellion. Casipeti, and thy father, and Inisquini,
Emba
,
and Malif, the silver-smith, are men I would trust. Besides, I have an
ally whom you little dream of. But be at the rendezvous at my house, at
the end of the hour, and you shall then hear. We will there decide on
our future course. Let us now part.'
`May the gods, in whose hands is the disposition of human events, prosper
our cause!'
`Tell Fatziza, if thou seest her, I cannot be back as I promised, said
Sismarqui
.
`Dost thou think of her?'
`I love her.'
`I love my country.'
`Nor do I love it less for loving one of its maidens.'
With a hearty embrace the two young men then separated. Sismarqui
to go to the armory, in and out of which he had free access, from his
occupation
,
and Montezuma, the young and daring leader of this fearful revolt, to
sound the name of liberty in the ears of those living in the net-makers' street
and along the bank of the canal, ere he should return to his own abode.
CHAPTER VI.
HUCHA AND FATZIZA.
Fatziza
waited by her chamber window, which commanded a view of
the street without exposing her to observation, a weary half hour, for the
return
of her lover, whose protracted absence she finally began to attribute to
the consequences of his fray with the knight. At length she heard a
footstep
in her brother's chamber, and supposing him to have returned, she
gladly
hastened with a light to open his door and speak to him. On entering
she beheld not Montezuma, but Hucha, the hunchback.
`Cousin Hucha, is it thou?' she said, half retiring. `I thought Montezums
had returned and got in by the balcony, as he sometimes does.'
I came up the same way, wishing to speak to him without disturbing you
dear cousin,' said Hucha with tenderness.
`He hath been abroad since noon, and I fear something evil hath detained
him.'
`Is  is Sismarqui here?' asked the hunchback, in a hesitating manner,
and a cold tone of voice, singularly contrasting with his recent gentleness of
address.
`Sismarqui hath gone to the armory with shields. I did expect him here
ere this, on his return. If thou wilt wait, both he and brother will be in
soon.'
`Wherefore should I wait, cousin  thou dost not like to have me near
thee,' said Hucha, with that sensitiveness characteristic of men who possess
any physical deformity.
`Nay  Hucha  do not pain me with this idle language. I did think
you had forgotten those feelings. You know I esteem you.'
`Yes  you esteem  because, when you hear me converse, you forget
that I am accursed in shape  I would the gods had made me a fool, so they
had made me an upright man. Then I might have shared thy love. For if
thou dost deny it to my intellect because of my body, thou woaldst then have
given it to my body not missing the mind. Women ever love physical
beauty. Thy sex are rarely won by merely mental qualities.'
`Hucha, believe me, you do
me
wrong, at least,' said the maiden, warmly
speaking in that softly thrilling tone which in woman conveys so much
sympathy
;
`was Gila deformed? Is every youth a maiden rejects, rejected for
some misshape of limb or feature? or is every one she accepts, alone
distinguished
for his perfect figure? You are prone to look at all things, dear
cousin, through the distorted medium of your own morbid mind.'
`Doubtless, as you say, my mind is distorted, as well as my body,' he said,
angrily. `Would to the gods I had never been born!' And he covered his
face with his hands, as if in suffering.
`Nay, Hucha, you are too sensitive! All men love you. Thou hast not
an enemy.'
`Yes, they love me because their pity begets a bastard love for the poor
hunchback, with his pale face and soft, woman's eyes.'
`
I
love you, Hucha, and 't is not from pity.'
`Oh, that it were from pity, then! Pity, in thy sex, is but holier love
love without its passion. Woman ever looks upon such as I with love's
tenderness
:
never with love's passion! Thou couldst never
love
me, cousin.'
`Do not let us talk on this theme; 't is an unhappy one! List! 't is
Sismarqui
!
Nay, 't is my father, below.'
`See, now! how the imaginary step of one thou lovest brings the quick
color to thy cheek, and modulates thy voice to a rich tremulous key it had
not before! I would give my life to be myself the cause of such change in
a woman  in
thee
, cousin,' he added, touchingly. `I am accursed. Cousin
Fitziza, believe me, I do so feel my shape, that, though by nature I am of
gentle temper and affectionate, I cannot help feeling hatred for all mankind.
I do hate, in my heart, thy brother and Sismarqui!'
`'T is false, Hucha! altogether false! Thou dost thyself injustice.'
`I tell thee, cousin, I do hate all men who walk upright, with their faces
heavenward, as the gods formed them, in stature and countenance like
themselves.' 'T is not the hatred that would make me wish their death, but
it is of such a kind, had I but my will, I have the heart to torture them, and
make them writhe with biting wit, and cutting gibes, and scorching irony.
I'd make them feel my power, and, for very fear, do me reverence.'
`This is
not
thy temper, Hucha,' said Fatziza, with indignant energy;
`I know thee better. Thou art all gentleness to all. Friendship hath not
a nobler votary than thyself. Thou art doing good ceaselessly, in some
way, to the sick, and helpless, and needy, and universal charity hath made
thee beloved and almost adored. Why dost thou wrong thyself?'
`I but speak the truth: I said it was my heart that was poisoned by
misfortune against my species. My head controls the heart, and philosophy
has sternly schooled me to keep it under, if I would live happy. All this
charity you speak of is but the scabbard that hides a poisoned sword, lest it
chance to prick the wearer's heels.'
`And thou dost hate my brother?'
`Habit hath got me into loving him.'
`And Sismarqui?'
`I do not like him  yet 't is not because nature hath made him a perfect
man  but I do not love him.'
`Thou wouldst not surely harm him, Hucha?'
`Thy love for him makes sacred his person, in my eyes. Cousin
Fatziza
!
you know not what a noble and loving heart you have flung away,' said
the Hunchback, taking her hand and speaking with the most impassioned
feeling. `Thy love, too, would have made me a better man  it would
have acted like leaven upon it. But, it matters not,' he added, hastily
turning away from her; `I will try and forget thee, and find oblivion in the
stirring scenes about to open.'
`Thou art not angry?'
`Not with thee, but with the gods.'
As he spoke a footstep was heard upon the stairs, and the same instant
Montezuma entered the apartment. He appeared fatigued, yet there was a
spirit in his countenance, and a kindling of the eye they had never before
witnessed.
`Welcome, Montezuma,' said Hucha, in a joyful tone. `I have been
sometime waiting for thee.'
`Thou art pale, brother,' said Fatziza, as she saw him cast himself upon
a settle beside the door.
`I have need to be pale, sister. He who carries the ruddy cheek of a
careless heart at this time, loves not his country, and has no manhood.'
`Ha! Montezuma, is this thy speech, too?' cried the Hunchback, with
surprise.
`We are a nation of slaves, Hucha! but light has broke in upon us
our chains are falling to pieces. The tyrant shall grant us freedom from
our servitude, or die. Man's blood shall no longer be accounted as water.'
`Hush, brother! Thou and Sismarqui are mad to day.'
`Montezuma! what hath kindled thy spirit?'
`And by thine eye thy own has been inflamed also! There is universal
inspiration.'
`What hath been done?'
Blood! blood! The same daily spilling of blood! It cried from the
ground for vengeance, and I have answered it. It was by the emperor's
orders, because I defended my life.'
`Didst thou?' almost shrieked the Hunchback, with the excited joy of
his feelings.
`'T was in the procession to the gate. Had it not been that the tyrant
is the father of the sweet princess Eylla, I would have slain the slayer with
my own hand.'
`Hist, brother!' entreated Fatziza. `Speak not so loud! Ere this thy
words have been caught up, and swift wings are bearing them to the
emperor's
ears. Alas, what aileth thee and all I love this day  that they
should court their own destruction!'
`I have whispered rebellion,' continued the young man, heedless of his
sister's words, `in the willing ears of ten thousand of my fellow-slaves.'
`And at this moment it is being breathed into the ears of hundreds in
this quarter,' said Hucha, with animation; I have been injured this day
by our masters, but knew not that thou wert also at work. Where is
Sismarqui?'
`Liberty hath anointed him when she did thee and me! Dost thou know
I have resolved to raise the standard of revolt ere the sun rise!'
`Be thou the leader in this thing, cousin! I did think I had been its
mover  but I see I am but an infant to thee.'
`I have already chosen seven leaders of divisions. They will be here
soon. Our final rendezvous is to be at midnight, at the Axuzco palace. We
shall then mature our plans, and act.'
`The Axuzco palace!'
`Why dost thou start. Come thou, then, with such chosen men as thou
canst trust in council, and thou wilt see a man there whose name will make
thy bosom throb high.'
While he was speaking, a tap was heard on the street door, below.
`There must be Casipeti!' said Montezuma.
`Casipeti! He yesterday struck a noble.'
`And, believe me, you, and I, and Sismarqui have been inspired by this
bold deed, without knowing it. My blood leaped when 't was told me,
yesterday.'
`And mine.'
`Let us give the bold Casipeti the credit, then, of striking out the first
rivet of our chains. Come with me below. I would meet him there.'
He went down as he spoke, followed by Hucha, leaving the distressed
Fatziza a prey to the most dreadful anticipations. Yet she was grateful to
hear, from her brother's words, that she had not been altogether the
instrument
,
as the object of the knight's passing gallantry, of awakening this spirit
in the minds of the people.
`Welcome, Casipeti,' said Montezuma, admitting the visitor into a low
apartment hung round with the materials of a net-maker's craft. `Thou art
punctual! How goes it with thy news?'
`I have eight hundred men, that, at the sound of my name, in the
silver-smiths'
street, are ready to follow where I lead!'
`I will go and see Ota, Inisquini, and others, and bring them hither,' said
Hucha, hastily departing.
He had scarcely left before, one after another, several persons, with arms
beneath their scarfs, came in, until fifteen men were assembled in the little
room. Not long afterwards Ota, the armorer, and Inisquini, the
sword-maker
,
joined them. Montezuma then drew from each the various successes
they had met with in rousing their fellow-citizens, and, finding the result
beyond his most sanguine hopes, detailed to them briefly his plans, and
invited
them to meet him at twelve o'clock, at the ruined palace of Axuzco,
where he would make known to them one whom they would find was no
mean auxiliary to their cause. He met with some opposition from Inisquini
and one or two others, whose wish was to attack the palace, slay the
emperor
,
and take the government into their own hands. But Montezuma,
seconded
by Casipeti, Hucha, and the rest, resolved, first, only to seize upon
the gates, bridges, and military defences, and then propose terms to the
emperor and nobility. If they were complied with he was to be permitted,
with certain restrictions, to retain the throne  if denied, the imperial palace
and the palaces of the nobles were to be attacked, and their subsequent
course to be governed by the events.
`Sismarqui,' at length, said Montezuma, when he had brought Inisquini
over to his views, `will, doubtless, soon be here. If he has succeeded in
bringing over the guard, there remains no doubt of our success. One cohort
of troops on our side will be the rallying point for the whole army, who are
as degraded as ourselves.'
While he was speaking, Sismarqui entered, clad in armor from head to
heel. All started till he spoke.
`The armory is ours,' he cried, in his excitement, seeing none but
Montezuma
,
who let him in. `Every soldier's breast beats with joy. We have
only to send the people there for arms when the time comes to strike the
blow. Ha! Casipeti here! My father, too! Inisquini! Hucha! Emba,
Xaxeti!
`We are all present, and welcome you, brave Sismarqui, to our councils,'
said Casipeti.
`There is no time to lose!' said the young armorer. You who are to
take the head and lead of the revolt, and would provide yourselves with
weapons, go now to the armory. The rumor will, ere this, have reached the
nobles. Wherever I go I see the streets alive with people, dispersed in
groups, some armed, and others impatient to get their arms, and for the
hour of midnight. At the first blaze of the signal-light, the streets will
pour forth its thousands. Never was such a universal spirit spread among
a multitude in so brief a space.'
`The rumor may reach the palace,' said Casipeti, with calm dignity;
`but the emperor will scarce dream that't is more than a street affray, and
despatch a troop of horse to quell it. But, as 't is yet confined to this side
the canal, 't will scarce have got there. But we have no fear of any united
force until the greatness of the revolt is known, and that can only be when the
whole people will be up in their might, with arms in their hands. 'T is but
four hours to midnight; and each moment but strengthens and ripenns the
cause. Let us go and arm ourselves, my friends. We meet again at the
Axuzco palace.'
With these words the chief conspirators separated, leaving only Sismarqui
behind with Montezuma. The former delayed but to interchange a few
words with Fatziza, whom, at length, he left in tears.
Montezuma paced the apartment a while in deep thought. He felt he
had incurred a deep responsibility, as the leader of the fearful revolt. He
had kindled an insurrectionary flame in a hundred thousand breasts, that
seas of blood could alone extinguish. He thought of the Princess Eylla
of her beauty and goodness. For her sake, he felt he would be willing to
undo all he had done  that she might be happy, continue to be a slave.
He shrunk at the evil that menaced her. He half-conceived the thought of
rushing forth to turn back the current he had let loose. It was then that he
reflected, painfully, yet not with regret, that he had roused a spirit he could
not lay, and that, as the helmsman is borne along with the ship he guides
and governs, he himself must become subservient to the will of the vast
power he directed.
CHAPTER VII.
THE PRINCE AND PRINCESS.
Early
on the same evening on which these events transpired, the lovely
Princess Eylla sat in her gorgeous chamber, gazing forth from the palace
window upon the serene beauty of the night. The `bright bands of Orion'
were spanning the east, and the `sweet influences of Pleiads' ruled the hour.
The last roseate tinge had long since faded from the edge of the mountains
of Ixtitlan, and on the summit of the peak of Ix, the `Star of the Burning
Stone' gleamed palely, like a planet setting upon it. Beautiful slaves, in
the richest dresses, kneeled at a distance, with their folded hands laid across
their bosoms, silently watching for the least sign of her will, or gesture of
command.
The thoughts of the Princess were not on the scence spread out before
and beneath her. Long and meditatively did she remain there, until the
moon rose, and poured the golden flood of her orient light into the open
lattice by which she sat, and falling upon her fair forehead, gave it the soft
lustre of the pearl. One snowy hand, half in the moonlight, half in the
shade, sustained her cheek. Ever and anon her young bosom would heave
and fall, and from her parted lips a low sigh escape. The light of the moon
seemed to rouse her from the deep reverie in which she had been for the
last half hour. All at once she started to her feet, and at the same instant,
her slaves flew and prostrated themselves around her.
`Tzitzis,' she said to a beautiful Peruvian slave, with flowing black
tresses, a slender waist, and limbed like an antelope, `you remain with me;
the rest of you retire to your couches. I shall need your attendance no
longer till dawn of day.'
Slowly, with their faces turned towards her, the young girls retired, and
the princess was left alone with her favorite and confidential slave.
`Tzitzis!'
`Your highness,' answered the slave, still kneeling at the footstool of her
mistress, and without lifting the heaving, slumberous eyelids that veiled her
brilliant eyes.
`You have heard that several poor men were slain to day, as we passed
through the city, towards the Temple of the East Gate, to sacrifice to the
Sun.'
`Nay, your highness, I did not. But as scarce a day goes by without
bloodshed, I doubt not this day has had its share,' replied the slave, with a
mixture of irony and sorrow in her manner.
`Hist, minion! It is my father's unhappy disposition. Yet he loves me.'
`So does the lion of Peru his whelp  the tiger of Yucatan his young,'
answered the Pernvian maid, with a degree of spirit and scorn that her favor
with her gentle mistress could only have licensed.
`Have done, Tzitzis,' said the Princess, with some sternness.
The slave beat her head low to the earth, as if humbled by the reproof,
her night-hued hair falling like a veil about her face, and her whole subdued
attitude that of gaceful humility.
`Nay  rise, and listen to me,' said the Princess, after gazing upon her
favorite a moment with a smile. The slave threw back from her face
her cloud of dark hair, and kissed gratefully the hand extended to her,
while the light of a cheerful and merry spirit once more beamed from her
intelligent face.
`I have detained thee, pretty one, to serve me with thy ready wits and
well-tried faithfulness. Listen.'
The slave gazed an instant into the face of the Princess, as if to seek the
key for her guidance and bearing, and discovering that while it was
embarrassed
it was serious, she bent her head reverently, and with a graceful
inclination
upon her bosom, and silently awaited the communication of her
will.
`There was some commotion today among the populace,' said the
Princess
,
after a moment's hesitation, `caused by an attempt of the officer of the
Emperor's guard to seize a youth who, inadvertently and from too eager
curiosity to witness the procession to the Temple, thrust himself forward
before
the others.'
`To behold thee, Princess, or I know not the hearts of the youth of the
empire.'
`Because thou knowest the heart of
one
youth, dost think thou knowest
all, chit?' asked the Princess, with a smile of raillery.
The conscious virgin dropped her head still lower upon her bosom, and
was silent, while the tell-tale carnation enriched the olive shade of her
cheek and brow. The Princess Eylla enjoyed her confusion a moment, and
then continued
`I heard this youth called Montezuma. Know you such a one by name
in the city, and his degree?'
`Was he tall and kingly in his port, your highness?'
`He looked majesty himself. Such, methinks, as a prince of the Sun
should appear. I have not in all the court seen a noble his equal.'
`Was he youthful withal?'
`Scarce the down had darkened his lip, and the scissors had never touched
his flowing locks of jet.'
`Did he smile like the sun in May?'
`Never sun shone brighter than his smile. It sparkled like sunlight upon
a fountain.'
`Were his eyes like a diamond set in jet, upon a ground of pearl, flashing
fire and speaking intelligence?'
`The same, Tzitzis. Thou hast beheld the youth, maiden!'
`Was he haughty, yet his haughtiness blent with the modesty becoming
his degree; and while he looked,
if he looked
on thee, did his eyes, as they
gazed, seem to plead thy forgiveness of the deed as they committed it?'
`Thou hast painted him to the very semblance, girl,' said the Princess,
laughing, and then blushing as confusedly as the fair Peruvian slave had
before
done, as she detected a smile lurking in the dimpled mouth of her
confidant.
The slave dropped her eyes, as if she would hide their mischievous
expression
,
and the Princess looked forth from the lattice for an instant, and
then abruptly rising, took one or two turns through her chamber. After a
few moments she stopped, and turned to the kneeling girl, in whose still
cast-down
yet knowing looks, she too plainly detected the knowledge of what she
had not yet dared to confess to herself.
`Tzitzis,' she said, laying her finger lightly across her favorite's forehead,
`be faithful and secret.'
The young slave caught her hand, and fervently impressed a kiss upon it,
in token of her devotion to her.
`Seek out this Montezuma,' continued the Princess, `and bring him
secretly to the palace.'
`Your highness!' exclaimed the maiden, with a start of surprise.
`I would see a youth for whom men so freely cast away their lives, as I
have this day seen them do,' answered the Princess Eylla, as if she would
disguise her real motives from the penetrating intelligence of the Peruvian.
`Your highness, he is a net-maker's son,' said quickly the beautiful slave,
who saw with surprise, what she could ill conceal, that a tender emotion had
sprung up in the heart of her mistress for the unknown youth  for women
can never succeed in disguising their hearts from each other.
7
`The better still,' answered the Princess, who no longer attempted to veil
from her confidant her feelings towards the youth; `the better still. If he
be not princely born, it were best he were at the other end of the degree.
Go. I would see him! Use what other instruments thou wilt to aid thee.
Let this signet be to him the token of my will. Be speedy, discreet, and as
subtile and wise as the Anaconda of thy native Peru.
The slave prostrated herself at the feet of her mistress; then rising
reverently
,
kissed her hand, and glided from the chamber. The Princess Eylla
listened to her faintest footstep, and then reseated herself by the lattice, her
virgin bosom filled with emotions all new to her, and her thoughts bewildered
with a thousand new and strange ideas, yet all tender and pleasing. Before
her lay a range of gardens, adorned with fountains, groves, and statues
beyond was the canal, like a broad band of steel, binding the city to the
enfolding bosom of the lake Alcolo  while, beyond and around her, rose
towers, domes, and columnar altars, mingled together in gorgeous confusion
all lying, like a magic scene of fairy land, beneath the lavish opulence
of the moonlight, which flooded all with such mellow radiance, that the
whole seemed to be seen by her through a medium of transparent silver.
That the lovely Eylla was suddenly in love with the low stranger who
occupied her thoughts, would be doing her injustice to assert. She felt an
interest in him, which grew out of curiosity. But interest, once awakened
in a maiden's bosom, for a handsome youth, of whatever degree, will ripen
into love, if opportunity for cherishing it offers. That this opportunity
should not be wanting in her case, she had now taken sufficient care, though
her motives, in sending for the young net-maker to appear in her presence,
were free from any thing which her maidenly delicacy condemned. And
when the idea, that her heart was interested in him, would startle her from
her reverie, she would proudly recollect that she was a princess and he a
serf, and then, as if fortified against love with delusive security, give her
thoughts again to this dangerous theme of their meditation.
While she was thus playing with love's arrows, as if they were inoccuous
to a princess, a soft strain of instrumental music reached her ear from
beneath
the lattice. She listened, and heard a manly voice mingle with it;
while she could distinctly hear the words of an impassioned song of love
addressed to her ear. These were the words:
THE PRINCE'S SERENADE.
[1]
[1]
The author acknowledges himself indebted for this and the other songs in these
volumes, to
Owen G. Warren, Esq.
, of New York.
Wake, Eaglet of Aztec! rise, daughter of Light!
List the lay that I breathe to thee now;
By the Day, that ere long shall uprise on the night,
'T is to thee, and thee only, I bow!
'T is the voice of my heart that now falls on thine ear;
Wake, Spirit of Beauty! wake, rise, and appear!
List, daughter of Love, to the breath of my soul!
Like the Thureb's,
A bird of beautiful plumage, fabled to sing
only once in its life, and that while dying.
that sings but to die;
My voice and my spirit together may roll
On the dull, heavy ear of
Iltzai!
The messenger of death.
But thou dost not heed, though that angel alone
Hear the prayer of my soul on his night-shrouded throne.
The star-gem of
Ix!
lo. I catch its proud ray,
Blazing clear on the desolate height!
But I turn from its beauty and brightness away
To a ray of more heavenly light!
Then, Eylla, look down, in the smile of thine eyes
It is day in my soul, though the sun never rise!
She rose impatiently and bit her lip, as if displeased and agitated. After
twice or thrice traversing the apartment, with a quick, excited step, she
closed the lattice through which the melodious serenade floated into her
chamber; and still hearing the faint swell of the notes, she dropped, with an
angry and excited gesture, a heavy curtain of silver tissue across the recess.
She had scarcely done so, when she checked herself in the position in which
she was, and stood for an instant like a statue.
`Wonderful  strange! Is this madness? Why has the Prince's voice
all at once become so hateful to me! Is this myself, or is it a spirit not my
own that has possessed my bosom? Last night I listened to him  to this
very song  with pleasure, though I love him not; and this evening I have
no sooner heard his voice, than I fly from the lattice and shut out the sound,
as if there were poison in the air on which it rose to my ear. I surely
cannot
hate Prince Palipan so suddenly! What hath happened to me?'
The Princess Eylla was taking her first lesson in her own heart. She
was learning the alphabet of love. The truth seemed to flash upon her.
The real cause of her sudden and strange antipathy to the Prince it required
no neeromancy to explain.
`Nay  this feeling must not grow,' she said, with forced resolution. `I
tremble at the discovery. It must down! Why has that youth's image
such a hold upon my mind! I will force myself to listen to the Prince.'
It was necessary indeed, as she strongly involuntarily expressed it, in
her present state of feeling, to
force
herself to listen. She resolutely
approached
the window, and drew aside the curtain. The music had ceased.
She could not conceal from herself that she felt inwardly pleased at this, and
laid her hand upon the lattice to open it, when she heard a light step behind
her. She turned quickly, and beheld a young man, elegantly attired, who
instantly
kneeled, as her eyes rested upon him, and laid his hand upon his heart.
`You are bold, prince!' she said, quickly.
`Sweet princess, I do confess it,' he said, without lifting his glance to
hers, and then remained silent.
`Why are you here?' she continued, with less displeasure, on witnessing
his subdued manner, and then instantly added, with a mantling smile, `did
you come to witness the effect of your music?'
`I came, fairest princess,' he answered, rising, and speaking with a serious
air, yet with the graceful courtesy becoming a prince, `witnessing the
closing
of your lattice, to ask thy forgiveness for my offence.'
`Thou hast not offended me, Palipan.'
`Wherefore, then, cousin,' he said, his voice assuming a tenderness that
caused her to breathe quicker and bend her eyes upon the tesselated floor,
`did you show such marks of displeasure?'
`Prince  do not question me,' she replied, after a moment's silence.
`Thy suit has never been encouraged.'
`Thou hast endured my presence, princess.'
`It has been endured, prince,' she said, pointedly, and the next instant she
regretted that she had so sharply marked her reply.
`Has it indeed been thus, Princess Eylla?' he said, haughtily. `Then
hast thou been trifling with thy own heart and mine. I could not believe
such duplicity lived in thy pure bosom.'
`Nay, prince,' she said with feeling, `I have never deceived you. You
have daily complained of my coldness, and accused me of not returning
your affection. I never loved you, prince. It was my father's wish that we
should be united  policy seemed to dictate it  and I have therefore
suffered
you to hope. But, as you accuse me of duplicity, I will now act
openly. We might have been united  I
might
have loved you as a wife,
but  but '
`But what?' demanded the prince, between grief and resentment.
`I cannot love you.'
`It is not
thus
,' cried the prince, `your sentence would have ended,
princess
but
you love
another!
'
`Prince Palipan! you forget yourself! said Eylla, haughtily.
`Noble princess,' he said, advancing towards her, and wholly changing
his manner to one of deep earnestness, `I beseech you trifle not with me.
My heart is devoted to you, and, unawares to yourself, you are inflicting
upon me the keenest misery.'
`Prince, I should grieve indeed,' she said, with calm irony, `if I believed
your sorrow was for any thing besides disappointed ambition.'
`Ha! dost thou believe I aim at my uncle's throne, through thy hand?'
`I believe, cousin, it is the loss of the
hand
, rather than the heart, you
grieve for.'
`Who hath whispered this?'
`Thyself!'
`Then have I been most false to myself, princess. You do accuse me
wrongfully.
`The archer's arrow may be leveled at the sparrow, but if his glance is
at the same time fixed on the eagle that sails above him, it is easy to tell in
what direction his shaft will fly.'
The prince looked confused and knit his brow.
`By the golden temple of the sun! cousin, you have misjudged me,' he
said, earnestly. `If this suspicion has had weight in influencing your
extraordinary
conduct to-night, I swear to you by the sacred eagle of our house,
I looked not to the imperial throne, though, 'tis true, thy father does! I
thought of no diadem but thy peerless beauty  of no throne but thy heart
of no sceptre but thy love!'
`Thou hast spoken it most courtly, cousin, but my heart is unmoved. You
see I am plain with you.'
The prince paced the apartment with a quick step and an angry brow.
She regarded him with a calm gaze, as if she clearly justified herself for
her conduct, from an intimate knowledge of his character. The prince was
not above twenty-four years of age, with an extremely elegant and
symmetrical
person, but a little above the middle height. He was a remarkably
handsome man, with brilliant eyes, the glances of which were most
penetrating
.
His features were finely chiseled, and of an elevated character,
with a pale, thoughtful forehead. His mouth was wonderfully expressive
of his feelings. It was well-shaped, and shaded by a mustache, but the
sweetest smile that sometimes played on it, could not altogether destroy a
lingering expression of haughtiness and cruelty, that seemed natural to it.
He looked like an imperious and passionate man, who, however, had his true
character so much under the control of that he would appear, that its darker
and less amiable shades were visible only to such as knew him long and
intimately; and these, even, were likely, sometimes, to be deceived. The
Princess Eylla, however, had much natural penetration, which, united to
years of childish intercourse, gave her means of judging of him with more
truth and clearness than was agreeable to him.
Until this evening, she had regarded him as her future husband. Her
father had commanded her to give him her hand, and she knew of no
alternative
but to yield obedience. Recently, in contemplation of a speedy
union, their intercourse had been more tender, at least, in its outward
character
,
on his side, for she was, at all times, rather enduring and passive. It
was her fate, and, besides her cousin, there was none in the empire with
whom her imperial rank would permit her to wed. But, within the last seven
hours, a change had been wrought in her, as complete as it was instant. An
unknown youth, of humble degree, for his lofty spirit and manly beauty, had
awakened an interest in her bosom, that left no room there even for a prince
of the empire, who had not the spell to touch the slumbering lute of love,
that lies in woman's heart, silent, unresponsive, till some skilled minstrel
strikes the thrilling key that awakes its melody. The chord was struck, and
harmony flowed that dissolved her own heart; yet she knew not why or how
it was done. Love had done its perfect work, and she knew not that it was
love. Love had shown her the hitherto unknown treasures of her heart,
and she felt she could never waste these riches of love upon the prince.
Love showed her the depth of her own feelings  the wealth of affection
that was in her heart; he had unlocked sealed fountains of womanly
tenderness
that she knew not were hidden in woman's heart. She trembled when
she reflected that she was about to fling away all those  all this unworked
mine of virgin gold. She shuddered, and thanked the gods for the escape.
`Oh!' she said mentally, as the prince paced the room before her, `Oh, I
knew not what I was about to throw away upon him!'
`Fair cousin,' said the prince, suddenly stopping, and taking her hand,
`hath any idle tale of the palace gossip come to thy ears, that thou dost
receive
me with such a strange mood?'
`I have heard tales enough, cousin,' she said, in an indifferent tone, `but
these have little weight with me.'
`Thou hast heard nothing to-night?' he asked quickly.
The princess smiled at his eagerness and said,
`Hath any thing recent occurred to give food for gossip, prince?
`Nay,' he said, coloring, `I did think some foolish rumor or report, from
those who would weaken my suit with thee, might have been thrown to the
palace, and so get to thy hearing.'
`I hear enough of wrong and outrage, done by the nobles of my father's
court upon the inoffensive people, prince,' she said, with spirit; but in this
thou canst have had no hand! A prince will ever be above wrong and
injustice
to the helpless.'
`Thou should'st teach this morality to thy imperial father, cousin,'
answered
Prince Palipan, with a scornful movement of the upper lip.
`Alas! thou needest not smile, prince; my father needs a better spirit,
and I pray the gods he may get one.'
`It will be when the gods take him, then,' said the prince with the same
expression.
`Thou art thinking to anger me, cousin, by this mocking of my father. Thou
dost forget he is emperor. I do see in thee exhibited a spirit, that, if thou
hadst come to the throne  as, thank the gods, thou wilt never do!  would
scarce have made justice or mercy more regarded than it is now.'
`So thou dost thank the gods!' he repeated, with an almost menacing
gesture. `Princess Eylla,' he instantly added, lowering his tone to one of
deep feeling, and speaking deprecatingly  so sudden were the changes in
the spirit of this impetuous man, `I do believe thou art mocking me.'
`Nay, prince, I do not mock,' she answered, as if touched by his distress
as if pitying his wrecked ambition, which she knew was alone the aim and
object of his intermediate wooing.
`Can I have no further claim to thy hand
`Never, cousin,' she firmly answered.
`Princess Eylla, thou hast heard of some passing love-passage of mine,
that has alarmed thy jealousy, and this is thy revenge.'
`There never existed the love for jealousy to grow out of, prince. Then
thou hast had love-passages while thou wert wooing me!'
The prince colored, and doggedly replied, `I do feel assured that this
alone has given color to our interwiew; or else thou hast fallen in love with
one beneath thee!'
`Prince!' haughtily cried the princess, though a consciousness she could
not hide gave less force to her reproof than she intended.
`Madam! you trifle with me,' said Prince Palipan angrily. `Once for
all  will you accept my suit?'
`No, sir.'
`Then by the eagle of thy father's sceptre, I will leap into the throne, and
spurn the ladder by which I would have stepped to it.'
As he spoke these ringing words, he haughtily and with contemptuous
indignity
waved her away with his hand, and, turning his back upon her, left
the apartment.
`The spirit of the princess sprung as if it would break from its tenement,
at this insult. Her eyes flashed fire, and her cheek and lip became pale, as the
blood left them to fill her surcharged heart. She followed him with her
eyes, transfixed to the spot like a statue; and thus she stood, a full minute
after he had departed. At length her lips parted, as if to speak  but
suddenly
the words of resentment and indignant wonder, that were ready to
find utterance, were changed to devout expressions of gratitude; and casting
herself before an altar of the sun that was in her chamber, she lifted her
clasped hands, and thanked the deity she worshipped, for her escape from the
danger that had awaited her from a union with the fiery and wicked prince.
This interview had unmasked his heart to her. She had suspected his
ambitious interests rather than his protested love, had most weight with
him in suing for her hand. That the prince loved her, her vanity, as a
lovely woman, would not allow her to question; but she felt that whatever
pure passion he entertained for her was overbalanced by the brilliant sceptre
which was to reward that love. The prince indeed loved his cousin as much
as he was capable of loving any woman. Her extreme beauty, her thousand
graces and charms of mind, her spirit, and altogether faultless character,
could not but have their influence over his heart.
The princess rose from the altar, and seating herself upon a pile of
embroidered
cushions by the window, strove to recover her calmness and
self-possession
.
Her heart was full, and but for the insult that kindled her
cheek, and burned up her tears, she would have wept for excitement  not
for grief  for though she regretted to have parted with the prince on such
terms, yet on reviewing her own feelings, she justified herself in taking the
course she did, and felt gratified that he had ceased longer to entertain hopes
of a union which, never so distasteful to her as it had been this day, had
never been contemplated by her but with painful emotions.
`What did that fearful threat import with which he left me?' she asked
of herself as she reviewed the incidents of the interview; `dare he attempt
no,' she instantly checked herself, as if the idea that had occurred to her
was too improbable to be contemplated for an instant  `yet there was
meaning in his words! They were not the angry words of a hasty spirit,
that are the next hour recalled or forgotten. They were spoken in a
deliberate
and most menacing manner. `Dare he attempt the throne? But two
lives stand between it and his ambition  mine and my father's! This
cousin of mine must be looked after. He has the command of half the
troops in the city, and may, if he have the wickedness to  but no, no, I
will not do him this injustice. He meant not, he
could
not mean what he
said. He has been wounded, and his temper tried. I will banish the
unworthy
thought, and forgive him what he uttered. Surely he could mean it
not  it meant
every thing
or nothing.'
With all her charity, the lovely young princess could not altogether banish
some degree of anxiety from her mind, but, as if wishing that her thoughts
should be submissive to her will, she sought to change their current by
dwelling upon the contemplated interview with the handsome young
net-maker's
son, who had unconsciously done so much mischief.
CHAPTER VIII.
THE KNIGHT AND PERUVIAN MAIDEN.
When
Tzitzis, the beautiful Peruvian slave, left the chamber of the
princess to seek a messenger to despatch on the secret errand intrusted to
her, she glided along the corridors with her finger on her lip, as if she was
fain to take that method to keep safely the great secret that filled her little
heart; the greatest secret, from its nature and the high rank of the chief
individual interested, that a discreet maiden could carry about with her.
She moved lightly along the marble halls of the palace until she came to a
staircase at the end of the corridor, which descended to a portico, beneath
which courtiers and others were lounging; it being the anteroom to the
imperial hall of audience.
`Whither art tripping now, pretty Tzitzis?' said a youth, gayly attired
in a green suit laced with gold, gallantly approaching her; `methinks thou
dost nothing but run up and down the staircase to exhibit thy neat ankles?'
`And thou, Count Arispe,' she said, with a smile, skillfully avoiding the
kiss he attempted to place upon her lips, `thou art ever here when I pass
of errands for my mistress, as if to show thy brave suit of green and gold,
and the faint mustache that hath begun to grow on thy lip.'
This retort was received with a laugh by his companions, and the maiden
wound her devious and perilous way among the gallants with an adroitness
and good humor, that gave no one offence, while she awarded none the favor
he sought from her ripe lips. When she had crossed the portico, she entered
a high, vaulted passage of stone, that, from the direction in which it run,
communicated with a part of the palace appropriated to the life-guards of the
emperor. It was hung, in its whole length, with banners captured in battle,
and with the swords and spears and armor taken from enemies. At its
extremity was standing a group of idle soldiers, and two or three officers
of an inferior grade, one of whom no sooner descried the slave
approaching
,
than he left his companions, who followed him with a light laugh and a
word of pleasant raillery, and hastened to meet her. He was very young,
but of good stature and figure, and rather good-natured than handsome.
`Elec,' she said, `do not think now, as I know you do by your
self-complacent
smile, that I am here for the third time since noon, on purpose to
see you. I do not care so much for you as that.'
`But, sweet pretty Tzitzis, thou dost betray thyself in thy very speech.
I
had not thought so,' was the reply of the youth, smiling, and attempting to
kiss her, though he blushed at his own boldness.
`No  you shall not kiss me either. I did not come to be kissed, nor to
be loved. I think you are very forward. I have a message from the
princess
,'
she said, peremptorily.
`To me?' inquired the young soldier. `What can it be?'
`Thou art ever having thyself uppermost in thy thoughts. 'T is not
to
thee, but
for
thee.'
`Does it concern thyself?'
`There, thou canst think of nothing else but me?'
`'T was of nothing else but myself just now. I would I knew the riddle
o' thy mind for one five minutes!'
`'T would puzzle thee to know any woman's so long. But this will never
do, talking with thee here, and the princess ready to die for ' Here her
fore-finger flew to her pretty mouth to stop it, and she became as silent, all at
once, as if sound had never gone forth from her closed lips.
`The princess dying!' repeated her lover, with the earnestness of alarm
`Thou art a fool, Elec,' she said, sharply.
`Thou hast sharpened thy wit upon me till, verily, thou hast worn out my
brains,' answered the somewhat dull young soldier, blushing and laughing.
`The steel worn off in the sharpening should have served to temper thee
rather, methinks. But it has not, I see. Yet thou hast quite brain enough
to do what I would have thee.'
`Why dost thou love me, if I be such a fool?' said the lover,
somewhat
hurt.
`I never said I loved thee.'
`But thou dost, Tzitzis; and thou hast said so often when thou hast walked
with me by moonlight on the battlement, as I watched.'
The maiden blushed, and said, laughing,
`Well, I suppose I have to love you, Elec, because you are so foolish
nobody
else will.'
`Thou dost not mean half thou sayest, thou mischievous gypsy; and I
will avenge myself on thee by kissing thee,' said the youth, growing bold.
`No, thou shalt not.'
`Wilt thou kiss
me
?'
`No.'
`Dost mean it?'
`Yes.'
`Then I will not anger thee by pressing thee.'
`I said yes,' she said, archly.
`I thought thou didst mean to say yes to thy no.'
`I said
no
, and I said
yes
. But thou shouldst never ask me if you may
kiss me.
`No?'
`No. For I will be sure to say no.'
`Why so?'
`Maidens must say something at such times, and they always say
no
't would be so silly to say
yes
.'
`Then thou wilt never let me kiss thee?'
`I did not say so. I told thee not to ask me; if you did, I should say
no
.'
`Then how shall I ever kiss thee?'
`In this way, my pretty youth,' said, in a gay tone, an old officer of the
court passing at that moment unobserved, taking the lovely girl's face
between
his two palms, and giving her a gallant salute. This is the way the
minx means. Thou art a dull lover to need lessons in kissing from a
grey-beard
.'
The officer, laughing, passed on through the gallery in which they stood,
while Tzitzis, after recovering from her confusion, elevated her finger and
shook it at her backward wooer.
`Now thou didst see that! But it was not my fault. He did n't ask me,
if he had I should have told him no. You are
so
slow of comprehension.'
`Then I will be so no longer. I have learned the lesson.'
With this he threw his arms about her, and kissed her so ardently, that
she was forced to slap him in the face before he would stop.
`Now thou art as much the other way. You are certainly the most
troublesome lover a poor girl ever had to get along with. Here I have been
half an hour trying to teach you a little lesson you ought to have learned long
ago  you ought  and you had to learn it at last from old Lord Vepotani.
Really, if I did not love you, I would n't have another word to say to you.'
`Pr'y thee, sweet! be not angry.'
`No  I do n't care enough about you to be angry with you,' she said,
petulantly.
The gods a-mercy! what a weathercock. It's now fair  it's now foul.'
Hold your tongue, and listen to me. Here is a signet;' and she held
up to him the gem given her by her mistress.
`I see it. 'T is an emerald.'
`'T is a topaz.'
`Beshrew me  't is a topaz.'
`Nay  now 't is an emerald!'
`I would have sworn it.'
`Sworn what?'
`'T is an emerald  nay, a topaz.'
`What color are my eyes? Dost thou know so much?'
`I could never look into them steady.'
`Look now!' and she fixed upon him a pair of the most brilliant,
laughing
black eyes Peruvian maiden ever did mischief with.'
`They are  they are ' and the simple young man looked very hard
at them.
`Well, what are they?'
`They are not green.'
8
`No?'
`No  topazes are green.'
`Emeralds are green.'
`Yes  they are not blue, I think.'
`The eyes, or the emeralds?'
`The eyes  do keep them quiet. They are not black.'
`Not black?'
`Is a diamond black?
`No, it is pure light.'
`How look they set in jet?'
`Like dark fire.'
`Such are thine eyes!'
`The diamond of Ix! thou hast made a speech will atone for some of thy
less happy ones,' answered the maiden, laughing. `By the time we have
been married one year thou wilt be another man. Take this signet now
and do as I bid thee. Thou knowest where the net-maker's street is, on the
other side of the canal, not a great way from the armory?'
`'T is nearly opposite here.'
`Take this signet; and see thou lose it not, nor show it to any human
being, save him to whom you are sent. For this is no common matter thou
art trusted on. Put it in thy bosom.'
`I will keep it as safely here, sweet Tzitzis, as if it were thyself in person,'
he said, placing it within the folds of the sash that passed across his shirt of
mail.
`Thou art improving each minute, Elec; 't is a pity I could not be with
thee more, to civilize thee.'
`Marry me.'
`Bold enough, indeed!' she replied, turning her head away over her
shoulder, with a pouting mouth. `I shall not give thee any more lessons.
It is quite time thou wast gone on thy errand. Haste!'
`Thou hast not given it me yet?'
`'T is in thy bosom.'
`But the errand?'
`You are so trying, and I have so much to say to you when I see you,
you drive it entirely out of my head.' She blushed as if she knew she had
attributed her neglect to any cause but the true one. `Go to the palace-pier
and take a boat and cross to the net-maker's street to the house of Mahco,
the net-maker, which overhangs the canal, just below the Tirovi gardens.
Inquire there for one Montezuma, his son, and tell him the princess
commands
his presence forthwith at the palace.'
`How shall I know him?'
`Dost thou not remember the day after the last festival of the new moon a
youth came here to bring a silken net to the luxurious Lord Esca, for him to
lounge upon his divan and catch gold-fish from the little marble lake in his
sleeping chamber with it?'
`I do remember it.'
`But, do you remember him?'
`He was short, with a red beard.
`No, no; that was a waterman, who stood by him. It was he who tapped
me on the cheek, and kissed me. Dost remember now? I would not have
put thee in mind of this, but you have such a memory. Short, with a red
beard! He was tall, and looked like a prince, yet was courteous and gentle.
and asked me to sing him a Peruvian ballad, for he had a sister who sang
and played the basalan, but sang no songs of Peru.'
`Didst thou?'
`After you left the court, vexed because he kissed me,  I could n't help
it, no more than I could old Lord Vepotani,  I did sing to him a little
ballad. He then told me where his sister lived, 't was in sight from the
palace, and bade me not to forget, when the princess let me go abroad into the
city, to call and see his sister, and teach her the Peruvian air he said he liked
so well. Are you jealous, Elec?' she asked, in conclusion, with the most
natural
naivete
conceivable.
`Not a bit  so thou dost not want this fine young man to come and see
thee?
'
`
I?
No, no. There is somebody else that  I shall assuredly let this
secret out if he is not soon off. Go, good Elec. This net-maker command
to accompany thee on thy return to the palace. Let no one observe thee,
going or coming, nor learn thy errand. Be speedy and cautious, and I do n't
know what reward thou wilt get from me.'
`Shall I find thee here to lead me to the princess with him?'
`You must not land here, nor must you take a boatman; but row yourself
across and back. Run the boat into the dark basin that flows beneath the
palace terrace, to the foot of the water-stairs, and there land. I will meet you
there. Good bye!'
With this parting, she bounded from him, and was flying back along the
gallery, when, seeing him looking after her from the spot on which she had
left him, she stopped, and with impatent gestures waved his instant
departure
,
and lingered till she saw him turn and quit the passage. Then,
springing to the stone shelf of one of the lofty, narrow apertures for
admitting
light into the gallery, she beheld him by the moonlight cross the
battlement
,
and descend a broad flight of steps that wound around a circular tower
that flanked that wing of the palace, to the paved terrace, the distant
boundary
of which was the bright water, with its moving city of boats. She
watched until she saw him disappear among the columns that lined the edge
of the terrace; and shortly after beheld a boat shoot out into the canal,
propelled
by a single man, whom, by his shining casque and figure, she knew,
even at that distance, must be her messenger.
`I do pray,' she said, as she prepared to bound to the pavement, `he will
deliver it properly, and bring the young man with him. My sweet princess
would never forgive me, if he should not succeed, and blame me for not
sending a trustier messenger. But then Elec is my lover; and if he is a
little dull, he is good-hearted, and loves me. I do n't think I would give
him, as a lover, for any knight in the palace.'
`Wouldst thou not, pretty bird?' said one, who at the same instant
received
her form in his arms, as she sprung from the elevated shelf of the
window to the floor.
Tzitzis half shrieked, and then disengaging herself, hit the individual
smartly in the face.
`What art thou ever in the way for, Sulukis?' she demanded, in a
half-displeased
tone. `Now go and gossip what thou hast listened to all over the
palace.'
The individual addressed was a very fat little man, with a bald head, and
a broad, farcical countenance. His costume was most singular for its
absurdity
and motley hues. Every article he wore seemed to have been made
expressly to reverse the usual fashion of men's habits, and to display a
perverse
contrast of gay colors. He wore a rich scarlet cap of velvet, which
was shaped like a shoe, with the sole uppermost; and his sandals were
ornamented
,
on the top of the foot, with very small brazen helmets, which
tinkled like bells.
`What art looking after i' the window, sweetheart?' he asked, with the
ogle of a buffoon.
`I did get up there, seeing thee coming, to get out of thy way, fool.'
`Now I will swear by the beard o' the princess thou didst get up there to
jump into my arms as I came by! I hav n't been a court fool all my life
not to know what women are?'
`What hath thy folly, Sulukis, to do with thy knowledge?' she asked,
with a frown.
`Doth it not take a wise man to measure wisdom? Answer me that.
`Yes.'
`Then doth it take a fool to measure folly?'
`Thou art ever speaking against women, because thou never didst find
favor in their eyes.'
`Not a lady i' the palace but looketh with a sideling eye on me when I
walk about in my holiday attire. I tell thee thou art ignorant. I am in
favor. The princess hath laughed at my jests.'
`She hath laughed at thee, fool! Go aside and let me pass on.'
`Nay, if she laugh, I care not, if she laugh at, or with me. Half the
world is laughing at the other half since 't was first made. I would not be
out o' the fashion o' it.'
`Thou art most strangely so in the wardrobe, fat Sulukes! Thou art
enough to frighten any one!'
`Is not my cap green velvet, and hath it not a diamond to glitter in it?'
`'T is a sandal  't is no cap. Why dost wear it on thy head?'
`To show where my wisdom lies. Other men wear their sandals on their
feet, in which, verily, without word-play, lieth their understandings. Mine,
the gods have put in my head side, and I do wear o' the outside the
indication
o' its presence. I will tell the a secret, sweetheart.'
`What is it?'
`I am in love with thee.'
`Thou hast told that secret to every maid in the palace that would give
thee a two minutes discourse with them. Go to, fool!'
`'The emperor saith I have more wisdom than all his court. He doth
never undertake any matter of moment, but after consulting his wise
counsellors
,
he finisheth by asking me for my opinion. Because, says he, there are
but two ways of doing a thing  a wrong and a right. The right he calleth
a spear with one point  the wrong, he likeneth to a star with divers points
shooting every way but the right.'
`He getteth the right way  that is the spear, from his counsellors, and
that he may know which of the points of the star point most opposite to it,
he asketh thee, knowing thy answer will be to that point which is most to be
shunned. Thy folly is the index which ever pointeth to the mischief.'
`Nay, but he doth oftentimes ask my opinion ere he ask that of his
wise-men
.'
`That first, knowing of thee the wrong way, he may discern the right.
Doubtless he doth truly say of thee thou hast more wisdom in thee than all
his counsellors. But 'tis only folly thou hast at last.'
`Nay  may not a finger-board that pointeth out to the traveller the
precipice, be as good a finger-board as that which pointeth him back from
it. Give me a kiss, sweetheart.'
`Nay, I never have let fools kiss me.'
`I did see Elec kissing thee but now, which made me hasten from t' other
end of the gallery, while the humor was in thee.'
`Humph! What is Elec to thee, witless? He hath more wit in his
finger-nails than thou in thy whole body. Wouldst thou make him thy
fellow in folly?
`Nay, fellows in wits, but not in folly. This is the difference, look ye,
between wit and folly. Wit causeth a man to know when he is hungry, and
when he hath eat enough; when he is dry, and when he hath drunk enough;
when he is sleepy, and when he hath had sleep enough. But it giveth him
nothing better than black bread for his hunger, water for his thirst, and,
a naked board to sleep on. Folly causeth him to know how to find dainty
things for his palate, and to wash his dinner down with generous wines  to
choose down to sleep on, instead of boards, and to sleep when he chooseth
to lie down. Wit is common to man and brute beasts  folly hath her home
only in the breasts of fools. Elec, therefore, hath not folly, but wit. We
are diamond and flint to each other.'
`And thou art folly  the flint; and he, wit  the diamond.'
`True, sweetheart! I emit the spark that kindleth the flame 'neath the
crucible which burneth thy diamond of wit to charcoal. I wonder he left
not thy mouth black!'
`Out upon thee, Sulukis! I never knew thee so rude of speech!
`I learned it from the knights  they are enough to corrupt one even more
virtuous in his morals. The emperor hath forbade me keeping company
with them.'
`My mistress forbade me to hold discourse with thee.'
`She showeth her wisdom. Princesses should never let their confidants
go in the way o' temptation.'
`If thou dost not move thy fat body out o' my way, and let me go  I will
call to yonder young knights, and have them pommel thee.'
`The emperor hath bade me avoid their company. So if such be thy
humor, sweetheart, I will not delay here. Good bye, pretty Tzitzis! Do
not forget the distinction I have taught thee between folly and wit. When
thy lover, Elec, kisseth thee again, remember he is but charcoal, and wipe
thy lips after.' With these words he stood aside from the recess and let
her pass.
`I will pay thee this, fool!' she said, as she flew past him.
`There goeth a woman who hath common sense ' soliloquized the
corpulent
jester, looking after her with dignified gravity. `I cannot away with
it! 'Tis troublesome enough in men, but I ha' no mercy on 't in a woman.'
`Flying back again! as if thou wert a hare, and a brace of hounds were
after thee!' said, in a lively tone, one of the young courtiers, as Tzitzis was
re-crossing the portico to return to the wing of the palace she had left. And,
the young man caught her hand.
`Nay, detain me not; I am on the princess' affairs.'
`It is of the princess I would speak to thee.
`Quick, then, for I have been long detained by the prating Sulukis!'
`Thou needest not haste, pretty Peruvian  I saw the prince passing
but now to pay a visit to her rooms.'
`Poor princess!'
`Why dost thou sigh?'
`I am sorry she hath been troubled by him.'
`'T is of this I would talk with thee. I think she loves him not?'
`He is to be her husband.'
`The emperor hath decreed it  but not the fates!'
`Nor hath love! I did suspect it. 'T is true she loves him not, maiden?'
`I dare not speak my mind to thee, sir  I am a slave.'
`I would not betray thee, by the gods! Dost thou not know the lord
Cuiri well enough to trust him? Come aside a little!'
`I know thee but slightly, sir,' she said, with deep respect, `but I know
the good opinion my mistress hath of thee.'
`I am glad I have such favor with our beloved princess. Alas! I feared
she loved not Prince Palipan.'
`Whoe does, my lord?'
`Truly, do not I. Look, then, Tzitziz!  I know thy devotion to thy
mistress, and will now tell thee, that, if the princess like not this union, she
shall not sacrifice herself. The emperor himself shall not urge her to it.
The empire were better without an emperor, than such an one as Prince
Palipan.'
`Dost thou think thus, my lord?' she exclaimed, with surprise and
pleasure
on her bright face.
`Not only I, but many other men,' answered the young noble sternly.
The maiden stood silent and reflecting for a moment, and then said:
`This devotion to the princess' happiness, by the noble gentlemen of the
court, will make her happy. But she will give countenance to no act such
as your bold speech darkly hints at.'
`How dost thou understand me?'
`That the will of the emperor and the ambition of the prince must be
resisted, with arms, if need be.'
`Thou art quick. I did mean this.'
`The princess will never save herself and sacrifice her father.'
`Nay, you mistake. The emperor will not come to harm. It would be
only to place the princess
alone
on the throne. She hath wisdom to govern
us. The emperor hath proclaimed his intention to abdicate. Let him
resign
to her alone.'
`This is a deep matter, my lord. I tremble.'
`I would have you broach it to your mistress, ere she have gone too far
in encouraging the prince.'
`Thy father is the first noble of the empire  what saith he?'
`He is imbecile. I am only recognized as the Duke of Cuiri  I am
alone answerable for my conduct. The princess is beloved, and must not
be sacrificed, if the true hearts that beat around her can save her.'
The maiden fixed her large eyes penetratingly upon his face for an
instant
,
and then dropped them in silence.
`Maiden, I read that look, I think, aright.'
`My lord,' said Tzitzis, impressively, `I pray you pardon me, but I fear
thy passion will be as fatal to the princess' happiness as the haughty prince's
ambition.'
`Thou art a fearless speaker.'
`Because I love my mistress. My lord, she hath ever spoken well of
you  because she never suspected what I have now, for the first time,
discerned
,
that, under your modest and respectful demeanor in her presence,
was concealed love.'
`It
was concealed
, maiden,' said the youthful noble, with feeling; `I have
never breathed to mortal ear what thy woman's eye hath now discerned.
I do love your mistress with a consuming passion. But, like a faithful
subject
,
I have let it secretly prey upon my life, ere I would she should
know it.'
`She hath never known it. Let her still be ignorant of it, my lord! If
there had been a kindred feeling for thee, in her own bosom, it would long
since have betrayed itself  for love in woman cannot be hid as in thy sex.
She hath ever spoken of thee in the even voice of common discourse. If
ever she praised thee, 't was in such terms as become a virgin princess
speaking of a brave noble of the realm  a part of her empire, not of her
heart.'
`I would she should not know it,' he said with ill-suppressed emotion.
`Thou art herein wise, noble duke, and showest thy devotion to the
princess
by this denial. I will not speak of it. Yet,' he said, detaining her as
she was leaving him; `yet, maiden,' repeated he earnestly, `wilt thou, for
pity of my love, speak to her of me, as if by accident, when thou art next
in her presence, and by her manner of discourse, and by watching her cheek
and eye, as thou dost skillfully, try the gauge of her heart  judge if
there be room for thought of me in it.'
`I will do it for pity of thy passion. But thou dost trifle with thy
noble-hearted
feelings, my good lord, to let them waste thus in hopeless love.
Thou knowest a princess may not espouse beneath her rank.'
`A princess  but not an empress.'
The maiden started, with a mingled look of astonishment and fear. `My
lord!'
The noble smiled, and then said, in a low tone of confidence, taking her
hand
`Thou hast my life in thy hands. Serve me faithfully, and I will be thy
friend.'
`My lord,' said she, with embarrassment, withdrawing her hand, `I will do
what I can for thee. But, alas! I fear thy ruin from this thing.
I
would
rather thou wert emperor than Prince Palipan. If the princess could but
love thee!'
`She hath not been wooed. Love will beget love, maiden. What dost
thou think?'
`She will never love thee, my lord,' said the Peruvian, firmly.
`I do fear so. Take, sweet angel, my suit in thy hands, and let me hear
from thee if there be hope.'
`If not  thou wilt give her to Prince Palipan in revenge; wilt not?'
she asked, with an arch smile.
`Nay  I can never, whatever the issue, seek other than the happiness of
the fair and gentle princess. If she love me not, I will die to secure her
happiness in her own way.'
`Even to placing Prince Palipan on the throne beside her?'
`Even this  even
this!
should she command me.'
`Then thou art worthy of her love. I will aid thee with all a woman's
wit. I did think jealousy of the prince, and not my mistress' happiness,
had influenced thee.'
`Thou didst most deeply wrong my love and honor, maiden.'
`My lord,' said a gay voice near him, at which the maiden took flight, and
disappeared beyond an angle of the gallery; `thou art a successful suitor, if
I may judge by the attention of ear of the fair Peruvian. She hath flown
like a frighted bird. I shall ne'er get near her again for another favor, if
such be already the fruit o' thy ear whispering.'
The young noble colored, and then laughed, as he passed his arm through
that of the old Lord Vepotani, and led him, in deep discourse, towards a
distant
part of the palace.
CHAPTER IX.
THE EMPEROR AND HIS NEPHEW.
When
the prince quitted the apartments of the Princess Eylla with such
menacing language on his lips, he strode through the range of gilded saloons
that led to his quarter of the palace, with the quick, fiery tread of an enraged
man. His hand was firmly grasped upon the hilt of his sword, as if he
would have avenged his wrongs with it, yet felt he could not; while his
brow was lowered and stern, and his lips compressed, with the struggle of
the strong passions the decision of the princess had let loose. The attendant
slaves that stood in the galleries trembled, as they fell submissively before
him, with their faces to the pavement; while one or two courtiers that
advanced a step as if to address him, retired from his path again in silence,
and let him pass on uninterrupted. At length, as he was crossing a small
court that separated the princess' apartments from his own scarcely less
magnificent suite of chambers, a slave stepped forth from the shadow of a
statue that had concealed him, and throwing himself on one knee, caught the
fringe of his cloak. The impatient prince would have spurned him with his
foot, and passed on, when his face arrested him.
`Is it thou, slave?' he demanded, in a tone as if his anger had found a
suitable victim on which momentarily to vent itself.
`Gneicha, the Tlascalan,' answered the slave, with mingled boldness and
submission.
`Why hast thou lingered? Thy head shall pay for it.'
`I have news.'
`Stand; and I would hear of that on which I sent thee. Didst thou get
it?'
`'T is here, my prince,' he said, taking from the folds of his scarf a single
white flower, of the most exquisite beauty, and presenting it to him.
`What didst thou call it?' asked the prince, gazing upon it with
admiration.
`The otol. There are but seven trees in the empire, and each tree bears
but a single flower.'
`The odor hath already filled the palace. Hath it surely the power thou
didst promise for it?'
`It hath, prince.'
`If it fail, thy head shall answer it. I know thy race are skilled in magic,
and are children of the Demon Mechoa. Who doth know of it save thyself?'
`The gardener.'
`And he is a Tlascalan?'
`He is my father, and a priest of Mechoa.'
`Thou art of an accursed race,' said the prince, with loathing; `
nevertheless
thou hast skill, and I must make use of it when love fails me. I would
thou hadst brought it an hour since. But,' he added instantly afterward, `it
may be best as it is. Take it to my chamber, and there await my coming.
The fragrance is wonderful. Hath it no danger?'
`To none but maidens, prince. This flower the gods created for their own
pleasure, and forbade the first man and woman to touch it, as it was sacred
to them. Yet the woman, tempted by its fragrance, lingered about the otol
tree till the Spirit Mechoa bade her pluck it, and place it on her forehead,
promising her it would make her immortal. Forgetting that she was then
immortal, she did so, and from that instant became mortal. The flower has
ever since been sacred to Mechoa, and fatal to every virgin who, tempted by
its beauty, places it in her bosom.'
`And placed on her heart, it creates irresistible love?'
`Yes, my prince,
or death
.'
`I have heard of the wonderful properties of the otol, but did hold it,
as I half do now, but an idle tale. I will have present opportunity to test
its peculiar virtue. Take it with thee, and await my coming.'
`I know not what relentless maiden, prince, you wish to punish '
`Nay  silence! Thou hast had full license already.'
`I would tell thee, noble prince, of a maiden, fair as the brightest virgin
the sun ever bore from the altar of sacrifice to his bridal chamber.'
`I have no humor for thy tale,' said the prince, though not so decidedly
as to defeat the Tlascalan, who continued
`She is the loveliest virgin in the empire. Her eyes are like stars, when
the evening dews are falling; her cheeks like the roseate tinge of the
summer sky that lingers when the sun hath set. Her lips are like the
flower of the Fatziza tree, and the matchless statue of the goddess Vichu
hath not more symmetry than her person. If thou hast heard the tsi
singing
to its mate in the groves of thy Hontal gardens, thou wilt best judge of
her voice; and if thou hast seen the dark flow of the river Itsima at midnight,
thou wilt know something of the hue of her wavy hair.'
`By the goddess Vichu! I must see this maiden. Who is she, and what
is her degree?'
`A serf's daughter. She lives by the water, in the net-makers' street,
and hath a lover who hath hot blood enough in him for a noble.'
`I did half guess it,' said the prince to himself. `Where hast thou seen
her?'
`Within the hour, upon her balcony.'
`'T is the same! Why didst thou note her? What purpose hast thou in
view here? I see the glitter of thy restless eye. Out with it.'
`I did, on discovering her charms, but offer her a flower of a bunch I had
also gathered in the garden, when a youth, who was in converse with her,
rudely seized me by the throat, and thrust me from the walk. I did then
swear to avenge myself on both!'
`Tlascalan! I do find no man, not even a slave, doth good service for
another
unless self-interest lie to the bottom. I see that thy wrong will bind
thee truer to my own purposes. I know this maiden, and love her  for
never have my eyes looked on such beauty.'
`Not even the Princess Eylla,' said the slave, in an under tone of raillery.
9
`Name the Princess Eylla, vile slave, and I will slay thee,' cried the
prince, angrily.
He walked away a few paces, as if under the influence of the feelings the
words of the slave had rekindled. `This haughty princess,' he said to
himself
.
`Yes, yes! I would have tried the virtue of this flower, which she
hath never seen, and placed it in her bosom to kindle her cold affections into
love for me! But that is past  that is past! She shall die! Then the
throne! But the Emperor! He, too, shall cease to live! Then,
then
am
I monarch! I will let this course be first tried ere I draw the sword of
treason with which I menaced her. I might, if this otol have the power
attributed to it, make her love me. But I scorn her love. She shall die!'
The last words were spoken aloud, and in so determined a tone, that the
Tlascalan started with surprise and fear.
`Thou dost mean the youth, prince,' he said, referring the words to
another
.
`
She
is too fair for death.'
`Thou knowest not what thou art saying, Tlascalan,' said the prince,
pleased that the eunuch was at fault. `But I need not thy service in this
matter at present. I have already sent one to manage it for me. So, on
thy life, meddle not with it. Nor dare avenge thy own wrong on this young
bondman who seized thee by the throat. Higher revenge than thine hath
appropriated this victim. Go, see to it. Go, now, and bear the flower to
my chamber. I shall soon be there, and command thee further.'
The Tlascalan made a low obedience, and passed the prince in the
direction
of the entrance to his apartments.'
`There goes a useful villain to me! When Casipeti, the mascal of the
palace, shall have brought the maiden hither, he will then do me good
service. 'T is strange, now I think of it, this mascal should undertake this
matter so readily; I knew not he was so ready to serve me, having himself
some daughters, I am told, that are growing up to womanhood.'
`Save you, prince,' said a stout-built person, in a rich dress, half military,
half civie, who crossed the court at the instant; and pausing as he went in
front of him to make a dignified reverence, he was continuing on his way to
an opposite door, when the prince, looking up, fixed his eyes upon him
steadily, and then cried
`Sir mascal, is it thou?'
`I am Casipeti, the mascal of the palace, at your service, your highness,'
said the individual.
`When didst thou return to the palace, and wherefore hast thou delayed
to visit me?'
`Return! your highness,' repeated the officer, with surprise.
`Nay, come aside, where the splashing of the fountain will drown our
voices. I did forget we might be overheard, and do prejudice to thy
character
.'
`I do not understand your highness,' answered the officer, with some
alarm.
`Art thou not Casipeti?'
`Yes, your highness.'
`Is not thy office that of steward of the palace?'
`It is, your highness.'
`Then why dost thou presume to trifle with me, fellow?'
`Nay, my noble prince,' cried the man, falling on his knees before him,
and trembling; `I do not trifle with thee.'
`Did I not see thee, disguised at a waterman, in the square of the temple,
at evening sacrifice?'
`No, my prince.'
`Didst thou not propose to me a scheme for my own pleasure and revenge,
and proffer thy services?'
`Never, noble prince.'
`Didst thou not receive from me my signet, villain?' demanded the
prince, laying his hand upon him.
`Never, merciful prince, never! I have not left the palace in three
weeks.'
The prince gazed on his face for a few moments, with the penetrating
and inquiring glance of suspicion, and then released him.
`Some one hath imposed on thee, my prince,' said the steward, rising, and
shaking with fear.
`I do see it plainly, now I have looked at thee well. The man I took for
thee had an eye thine would quail beneath. He had thy height and breadth
of shoulder, and something of thy air; but thy slavish spirit and his bold one
were not kindred, I'll be sworn. Go.
Stay!
Is there another of thy
name in Mexico, who hath thy air and step?'
`One, I have heard, called Casipeti, the waterman.'
`It is he,' said the prince, decidedly. `Go about thy business  nor
speak of what hath now passed.'
The mascal hastily availed himself of the permission to escape. The
prince stood thoughtfully gazing upon the sparkling waters as they fell in
the glancing moon-beams like showers of silver drops, into the basin near
which he stood.
`I have been betrayed!' he cried, after a few moments' reflection. My
signet is in a traitor's hands, and mischief will come of it. He hath some
plan to save this maiden and her lover, and hath thought to keep me quiet
until he had effected it. Yet why should he speak of an insurrection, in
which, being a serf, he must of course bear a part. It was done, doubtless,
to keep me near my troops. I see I have been a tool of this waterman.
But nay, it may not have been the waterman, Casipeti, the mascal hath
spoken of. It may be some noble who hath taken this means to beguile me
of my beauteous prize. Whoever it be, I will defeat his schemes by
under-taking
,
if not too late, my own affair in person. By the gods! I have just
conceived a scheme that will punish this haughty princess! It shall be
carried
out, or I know not how to avenge myself on a disdainful woman.'
With these words the prince was proceeding towards his apartments, when
a page, who had been sometime waiting at a distance, met him, and said
hastily,
`The emperor begs leave to speak with your highness.'
The prince muttered an impatient word or two, and then followed him to
the right, across the court. They descended a magnificent flight of marble
stairs, every step adorned with the statue of a god, to a vast central rotunda
below, the lofty roof of which was supported by three score columns of
polished
marble, seventy feet in height, while the architraves and compartments
of the ceiling were adorned with beautifully sculptured imagery, interspersed
with exquisite paintings, in the most brilliant and ever-during colors.
Crossing
this rotunda, the page led the prince to a low flight of semi-circular steps,
that led to a pair of ivory doors inlaid with silver. These he threw open
by the slightest touch, and then retired behind the prince, who entered and
found himself in a large chamber of the most dazzling splendor. Its sides were
lined with plates of Itzli, that multiplied his person a thousand times. Every
panel was set in a gold border, and supported by two pillars of silver. The floor
was laid with precious stones and the ceiling was covered with pearl. At
the extremity of this room was a throne of solid gold, supported by two
gigantic
black eagles of polished ebony. Above the throne was a golden sun
with rays composed of diamonds. On the left of the throne, which was
vacant, was a couch or divan, of the most sumptuous description, covered
with a canopy of azure silk, and hung with curtains of silver tissue. The
emperor was reclining upon this couch, in a rich evening robe, a silken
scarlet
cap covering his white locks. Beside him, within reach of his hand, was
laid his crown, which literally blazed with jewels. Upon it was laid his
ivory sceptre, distinguished by a diamond of great size and wonderful
brilliancy, playing in the lights with the most dazzling prismatic splendor.
At a respectful distance around him knelt slaves in rich dresses, and on his
left hand stood his prime minister, and two or three of the upper officers of
his household. The emperor himself, appeared about sixty-five years of age,
of commanding stature, and an aspect kingly. His features had been shaped
by nature to wear a benevolent expression; but absolute power, and the
unchecked indulgence of will and passion, had added to them a refined
expression
of cruelty, to the existence of which in his breast, his oppressive
government but too well bore testimony. His eyes were stern and imperious
in their character and sparkled black and fiercely beneath the gray, thick
brows that shaded them. His lower lip was the least disagreeable feature of
his face; it always seemed to wear a gentle smile, as if the lingering spirit
of natural kindness, driven from point to point, had retreated there. His
upper lip was ever curled with haughty imperiousness; so that his mouth
seemed constantly to wear a double expression, which, save those diplomatic
courtiers who had studied his face well and closely, was dangerously
deceptive
,
as well as perplexing, to every one else who sought to guide his conduct
from the temper of mind it seemed to indicate. And often was the cruel
disappointment of a victim, whose hopes looking to the better, rested only
on the smile, who was doomed to endure the bitter woe of a sentence he
dreamt not of.
The prince entered with a free, careless step, as if he had purposely
assumed
it to disguise the sterner feelings of his bosom, and, approaching the
emperor, half kneeled on one knee in the form of reverence, kissed his hand,
and instantly resumed his erect attitude.
`I have not seen thee to-day, nephew,' said the emperor, with a smile;
`doubtless Eylla hath made large claims on thy leisure.'
`I have seen the Princess Eylla but once to-day, your majesty, and then
but for a brief space,' answered the prince, with a frown.
The emperor looked up sharply at this reply, and observing that his
nephew's brow was disturbed, he waved those about him to retire. When
he was alone with the prince he said gravely,
`I did send for thee, nephew, to talk with thee respecting this union I have
so much at heart. When the cycle of my reign ends, I would have the
throne at once receive its legitimate emperor and empress.'
[2]
[2]
It would appear from the Aztec annals, that their monarchs reigned, each, exactly
fifty-two
years. But this singularity arose from a provision of their law, by which no monarch
was suffered to reign for a greater or less period. If he completed the cycle upon the
throne, he immediately resigned the crown, and another was elected; but if he died before
the cycle expired, the nobles assumed the government, which they administered in the name
of the deceased, during the remaining years. Ulyd ascended the throne at the age of
fifteen
,
and being now nearly sixty-seven years of age, his cycle would shortly expire.
`There need be but short conference then, your majesty,' said the prince
bitterly. `The princess hath already settled this matter of espousal to her own
liking, I doubt not.'
`Ha! is this thy humor?' said the emperor, laughing; `so thou hast had
a lover's quarrel. Heed it not, prince! Matrimony will soon heal all such
trifles. What hath the minx done to anger thee?'
`Your majesty,' answered Prince Palipan, with a kindling eye; `I do not
feel that I can jest upon this subject. It may be mirth to your majesty, but
it hath little that is merry in it for my humor.'
`By the gods' sceptre! then thou art in truth vexed! So, I am sorry.
What hath come to pass?'
`The princess can best tell your majesty herself. I care not to speak of
my own shame.'
`Now, by the black eagle of Aztec! I will know this matter from thy
own lips,' cried the emperor imperatively. And he half rose from the couch
to his feet.
`The princess, then, hath declined my suit.'
`And thou art making all this matter,' he said, sinking back again upon
his pillow, and speaking in an indifferent tone, `because a silly girl hath said
she cannot love thee. If thou wilt let a woman rule thee now, thou art not
fit to rule an empire, nephew.'
`Your majesty, the Princess Eylla hath shown a strong and
unconquerable
dislike to me. She hates me, and hath this evening told me she will
never consent to wed me.'
`And who asks the girl's consent, nephew,' said the emperor, in the same
unmoved tone that so irritated the prince. `Thou hast
mine
.'
`She scorns me.'
`Pay her back with love.'
`She hath insulted me.'
`Avenge thyself upon the lips, then.'
`By the sacred Temple! your majesty is inclined to be facetious,' cried
the youth fiercely. `I crave permission to take my leave.'
`Nay, stay, boy! There is something deeper in this than I had thought,'
cried the emperor quickly. He then said in a serious tone,
`Tell me just what hath happened?'
`The Princess Eylla hath just said to me, in a way not to be
misunderstood
by any man in his senses, that she will never share the throne with
her cousin, the Prince Palipan.'
`Doth she say it in truth and earnest? demanded the emperor with
impetuosity
.
`Did you mark her eye, as well as her voice; for they sometimes, in
woman, play at countercheck?'
`I did, your majesty,' answered the prince calmly, now that he had moved
the emperor.
`And parted you thus?'
`We did, your majesty.'
`'T is passing wonderful. What did you, to anger her, prince?'
`Sing beneath her lattice a song, in praise of her beauty.'
`That's it. These are times when pretty women will anger at praise of
their charms, as if, like the overloaded bee, they get sated with their own
sweetness. Thou didst take her in this mood. Go to her while she is
soured
with her displeasure, and, my crown, she will listen to you, and be as well
pleased as but now she was ill-pleased.'
Thus spoke the emperor, whose passionate fondness for his child would
lead him to seek palliation for her treatment to the prince. He would not
at once make up his mind to exert towards her that authority which he felt
he held securely in reserve, and desired, if possible, to bring her to obedience
to his wishes, without severity.
`May it please your majesty,' answered the prince decidedly, `I fully
acquiesce
in the princess' decision, and shall no longer trouble her with my
presence.' And he paced the floor moodily.
`Say'st thou! By the gods! I have two of ye to deal with! Thy words
rung well, but didst thou mean them?'
`I did, your majesty,' said the fiery prince. `The Princess Eylla hath
wounded me beyond forgiveness. If she would now come forward, and
plead for my hand, I would give it to her Peruvian slave Tzitzis first.'
`By the bright sun! young man, this speech had lost thee thy head, wert
thou other than thou art. As it is, I have a mind to send both of you to
prison, till you come to your senses. This hath become a serious matter!
Treason in my own palace. My daughter and nephew traitors!'
`Your majesty, I am no traitor.'
`Thou dost refuse the hand of the princess.'
`She hath refused mine.
`She hath no power to do it. It is
mine
. And though thou dost not
deserve
it for thy hasty spirit, yet lest the empire fall to pieces for want of a
head, I do give it to thee. She shall obey me.'
`The Princess Eylla, may obey thee, but the Prince Palipan is his own
master.'
`Ho, guards! seize the traitor!' shouted the emperor.
Instantly issuing from a hitherto invisible recess in the rear of the throne,
half a score of the emperor's body guards stood in his presence. Their
captain looked silently at him and at the prince, and looking round and
seeing
no one else, asked,
`Whom, your majesty?'
The politic prince had, in the meanwhile, thrown himself upon one knee
before the emperor, and said in a low tone, `pardon, uncle.' The emperor
made no reply to the officer, but remained a moment silent and thoughtful.
At length he waved his hand to the guards to retire.
`Go  not now! But shouldst thou hear me call again, delay not to ask
who
, but seize him, whoever he be, thou findest present with me.'
`Thy rank, prince, hath saved thee! Had they not hesitated, and laid
the first finger on thee, thou shouldst have known the comforts of our imperial
dungeon, and the cost of an emperor's anger. Thou dost repent, then?'
`I do.'
`Then leave me, for I am little in the mood for thy company. I shall
send for my daughter, and have this matter put to rest. Beware how thou
darest to trifle with me or her, as thou hast done this night. I would be
alone.'
The emperor waved his hand impatiently as he spoke, and the prince took
his leave, without offering the usual homage of the knee.
The emperor looked after him as he strode from the audience chamber, and
shook his head.
`He will make a good monarch, but I fear me a bad husband for my poor
Eylla. But the sacrifice must be made, both by herself and me. I would
save her from it. But I cannot let the imperial line of the Aztecs end in
my person. No  the princess must wed her cousin. I will send for her!
Nay  I will visit her alone, in her own chamber. I would see her without
the face she will make up to meet me with, if I send for her here. I would
find her in her mood.'
With these words, the emperor rose from his couch, and leaning on the
arm of his prime minister, who re-entered as soon as the prince departed,
bade him proceed by a private gallery towards the apartments of the
princess
.'
CHAPTER X.
THE STORY OF THE NET-MAKER.
Montezuma
remained sometime in deep and perplexed thought, after the
departure of the conspirators, endeavoring to foresee the ultimate tendency
of the revolt. His mind was vibrating between his regard for the princess,
who he felt must be involved in the consequences, whatever they might be,
and his love for his country.
`Brother,' said the soft voice of Fatziza, who, descending from her room,
had stolen to his side after having for sometime tenderly watched the dark
aspect of his countenance. `Brother,' was a second time repeated in still
tenderer tones, before he looked up.
`Sister,' he said with a smile, touching her cheek playfully.
`Thank the gods for that word and smile!' she said, fervently. `I did
believe
another spirit than thine had possessed thy bosom. Thou art my
brother
again.'
`I am ever thy brother, dear Fatziza,' he said affectionately. `What dost
thou wish?
`I scarcely know. Strange events are ripening all around, and evil seems
to threaten those I love. Sismarqui hath come in and gone forth, hastily,
and is mailed like a knight. The house has been thronged with deep-voiced,
stern-looking men, and I have heard fearful talk of bloody contests, death,
and conflagration. What hath happened, brother, and how art thou
involved
?'
`I will tell thee, sweet. Sit by me on this settle. Thou shalt hear, for
thou art a sensible woman, as well as an affectionate sister, and will one day
be a loving wife. Nay, blush not so quickly. I did speak of what should
be each maiden's pride. Here is our father. He hath waked from his
afternoon nap, to be in happy ignorance of all that hath transpired. Let him
not hear it bluntly. He shall tell thee now what else I would have
explained
.
I got it from him in my boyhood.'
As he spoke a venerable and dignified man, in the full vigor of green old
age, with an erect figure and a firm countenance, entered from the shop in
the rear.
`Good even, children!' he said kindly. `Thou hast had many of thy
young friends in to see thee, son, judging by the noise of voices that at
length drove sleep away. But 't is time I were up to supper.'
`'T is ready, father,' said Fatziza.
`First, sir,' said Montezuma, `tell Fatziza the tale of the origin of our
empire. She hath heard it not from thee. I would she should hear it now
for a certain reason.'
`'T is what thou shouldst know, daughter, that thou mayest worship
rightly
.
Our race is descended from the Great Spirit, the sun, the creator of all
things. After the world was filled with inhabitants, the people became so
wicked, that Avandu ordered Tezpis, the only good man living, to build a
ship on the mountain of Colhuacan, and dwell in it.'
`Nay, father, I am impatient. Speak of the Aztec,' said Montezuma,
interrupting
him.
`I will, son, I will, when I come to it. When Tezpis had got safely into
the ship with his wife,' continued the old man, who related his story in his
own way, `the sea came up suddenly over the whole earth, drowning every
soul, and floating the ship upon the top of the mountain. After drifting about
many months, Tezpis saw the sun appear, and heard the voice of the Great
Spirit from it command the waters to withdraw. He then sent a vulture
forth to see if he could find land. But the bird, finding dead bodies to feed
on, did not return. He then sent an eagle; and then a humming-bird, which
returned, holding in its beak a small branch covered with leaves. Tezpis
then looked forth, and saw that the earth was verdant, and left his ship and
sacrificed to the gods. After this he had fifteen sons, who, quarrelling one
with the other, a dove brought them an olive branch having fifteen leaves,
saying, if they plucked those they should never quarrel more. Each of the
sons plucked a leaf and ate it, when, finding they spoke no longer intelligibly
to one another's ears, they dispersed, each man his own way. The eldest
of these sons was called Cohuala, and he spoke the only tongue of the fifteen
the gods could understand. He grew to be a great nation, and, wandering
over the earth, came into this country of Mexitla, and founded an empire.'
`And is the Emperor Ulyd descended from him?' asked Fatziza.
`No; but thou art, and all the Mexitili,' answered the net-maker. `The
empire flourished under the favor of the Great Spirit for nearly a thousand
years, and so peaceful and happy was the land, `that war and the art of war
had been forgotten. Not a sword nor armor of offence or defence was
known. We were a blessed nation, and the sun was our father and our
benefactor. At length, an intractable nation of warriors, clad in steel, and
whose trade was war, hearing of our happy country, poured from the north
upon us, under their prince, Aztec, and conquered us, slaying our kings and
all the royal family. This fierce conqueror was Aztec the First. His race
has sat on the throne seven hundred years, and the descendants of his
steel-clad
warriors are our nobility.'
`And what became of the original, happy race of Mexitili, father?'
asked Fatziza, with interest.
`They became slaves to their new masters, and remain so to this day. I
am one of them, daughter,' said the old man, with some feeling.
`And
I am one
,' repeated Montezuma, suddenly rising, and speaking with
stern impetuosity. It is this I would have had my father tell thee, sister,
that thou mightest know wherefore my brow is dark and my thoughts heavy.
`This night,' and his voice was deep and solemn, `our ancient race are to rise
in their strength, as one man, and throw off the yoke of their masters.'
`Son, what is this thou sayest?' cried the net-maker, with surprise, his
eyes shining with delight.
`It is as I have told thee. Within the three hours thou hast been
sleeping
,
old man, a nation has awaked from a sleep of centuries.'
`Brother, thou hast not roused the people?' cried Fatziza, laying her
hand upon his arm.
`I have not, but the gods have! I am but their instrument.'
`And Sismarqui?' she gasped.
`Is another. We are banded together, we and those thou hast seen here,
to deliver our country.'
`Son, dost thou speak truly?'
`In three hours thirty thousand Mexitili will be in arms. The revolt
hath ripened into full fruit from the seed, without stalk or leaf.'
`I would I had a good sword!' cried the vigorous old man. `I would not
be behind the best youth among ye.'
`Thou shalt have one, father. Sister, quell this rising fear in your bosom.
Remember you are my sister, and for my sake be firm. Neither Sismarqui
nor I will come to harm. Thou must wait at home here patiently the issue.
Father, I am now going forth to mark the spirit of the people. I will return
with arms for thee.'
`Do my old senses dream this? Am I awake? Hath it come at last?'
he cried, as he embraced his son. `The gods go with thee, noble boy! Thou
art worthy of the celestial race from which you sprung.'
Montezuma left the dwelling, and at the threshold met Casipeti entering.
`Casipeti, how goes the city?'
`The different quarters are well organized, and the most surprising unity
and discipline seems to pervade all hearts. Every man will be at his post
at the first glare of the signal light; and so well instructed are they, that if
no signal should be given till dawn, not a foot till then would stir forth. I
have in person visited each quarter.'
`I was going now for this very purpose. I do feel a new spirit burn in my
bosom at this intelligence. I feel anxious about the citizens of the quarter
of the Lapidaries. I have had no communication with them since the sun
set, and fear they are indifferently organized. I will go thither now.
Accompany
me, good Casipeti? On my return I will look in upon the band
of brave youth whom I have chosen to take possession with me first of the
hill and Temple of War.'
`I would go with thee, Montezuma; but I came hither now but to tell
thee,  what I forgot at our meeting,  take heed to thy fair sister.'
`Wherefore, Casipeti?'
`The masked knight who saluted her cheek is none other than the prince.
`How knowest thou this?'
`I will tell thee. I was witness to the fray, and followed the knight,
inventing
in my mind the while some plausible scheme to serve him, and my
purpose to learn who he was, for twice hath the same knight, in different
guises,  but I knew him by his steed and air,  been to my own dove-cote.
I found occasion, after the sacrifice in the court of the temple, to draw near
him, scarce with any formed design, save that I did intend to offer him my
aid in prosecuting his amour.'
`With my sister?'
`Pardon, good youth; 't was to feel his pulse where I thought it throbbed
the truest. He confessed his love and passion, and at once entered into my
plans. Unskilled in deceit, I unintentionally gave him my name, Casipeti,
10
when he demanded it, and he instantly asked if 't was Casipeti, my
name-sake
,
the mascal of the palace. I stammered, yes, and he then frankly
gave me his confidence. I promised to favor his views here, and the better
to deceive him as to my person, for I thought he once suspected the cheat,
I hinted of insurrection, and advised him to be on his guard.'
`This was rash.'
`I did not then think insurrection so near at hand, though hoping for it, or
I should have been more guarded. But he will scarce heed it. At length
I promised to bring thy sister captive to the palace; and he, to give me
admission
to his presence, took from his finger this signet and gave it me. He
then lifted his mask, and I saw, to my surprise, what I had not suspected,
that 't was the prince.'
`'T is indeed the prince's crest,' said Montezuma, surveying the gem.
`Thou hast taken great liberties with my sister's name,' added the young
man, in a slight tone of displeasure.
`Pardon me, for the honesty of my purpose toward thee and her. I did
but practice with his own weapons, the better to foil him.'
`I see thy intention, Casipeti, and thank thee. This signet will be of use
to us.'
`I have thought so. Its possession is the key to the palace.'
`Such was my thought, when you placed it in my hand. Take it,
Casipeti
,
and use it as the night's events shall dictate.'
I have brought it hither to give to thee, as thou art our chosen leader,
and should hold the power this gives thee.'
`Casipeti!' cried Montezuma, so suddenly as to cause his companion to
start.
`I pray thee, what?'
`A thought has struck me. Hast ever seen this Casipeti of the palace?'
`Often  but not to speak.'
`Thou shouldst resemble him, to deceive the prince?'
`I do think so in height, and manner something. I once, in sport, tried
on his captan, left at his tailor's near my shop, and it fitted me bravely.'
`Canst thou find, then, an entire suit of such garments as is worn by that
officer?'
`I can, I think.'
`Then thou wilt serve our cause best by at once getting admittance to the
palace with this signet, under such guise. There, in the best way thou canst,
bring all the servitors over to our side. Methinks, were I a half hour within
the palace under a safe disguise, I could get possession of it without striking
a blow. This I desire to do, if possible. Go and see what thou canst do,
and if in thy power play the mascal till the signal blaze.'
`If I meet the mascal himself?'
`Then trust to the gods and thy own wit. This signet was not given thee
to no purpose. 'T is the key of the palace, and I intrust it to you. Haste,
good Casipeti. If thou dost corrupt enough of the palace slaves to answer
thy end, send me word.'
`If thou leave thy sister another day beneath thy roof, she is lost. The
prince, trusting to me, will rest easy till to-morrow,' said Casipeti, as he left
him.
`Another day,' said Montezuma, proudly, `Fatziza will be beneath
protection
,
in the grave or above it,  surrounded by a hundred thousand
brave patriots, who dictate to emperors and nobles.'
He was about to renter the dwelling to speak to Fatziza, and warn her
to remain within, when the shadow of a man darkened the side-walk.
He looked hastily up, and beheld a soldier approaching the house from the
water, with the faltering step and inquiring air of one who is seeking some
particular place to which he is a stranger. Montezuma awaited him, with
his hand still upon the latch of the door.
`Is this the abode of Mahco, the net-maker?' demanded the soldier.
`It is. What would you with my father?' answered the young man,
haughtily.
`Then thou art Montezuma, his son,' said Elec, quickly. `If thou art, I
have an order to guide thee to the palace.'
`To the palace?' repeated Montezuma, with astonishment.
`Yes, master. But not to make love to any of the princess's pretty maids,
ah, oh, ah!'
`What dost thou mean?'
`I suppose you do n't think it much matter to kiss a maiden what is
betrothed
,
and so do n't mind such trifles.
I
mind 'um.'
`Pray, what is your business with me?' demanded Montezuma, sternly.
`I have a message to thee from the princess  not from her maid.'
`What know I of her maid?'
`Thou hast kissed one o' them, by my buttons!'
`Thou art drunk with new wine, fellow. Take care of thy life, if thou
proceedest further up the street, unless thou canst cry tyrant, down! to
those who challenge thee.'
`Nay, master, I am not drunk,' said Elec, doggedly; `but I am jealous.
I will settle this matter with thee another day. Come with me now, for I
must hasten back.'
`Go, then.'
`But I must take thee with me?'
`Hath the princess sent for me, sayest thou?'
`She hath, master.'
`What proof have I of your truth?'
`This signet, which I was commanded to show you.'
The young man examined the gem by the light of the moon, and then
seemed to deliberate for a few moments. At length, his thoughts were
audible.
`There are nearly three hours to midnight. I will see the end of this.
'T is strange the princess should send for
me
. There may be treachery in
it. Yet, should it be true, I dare not refuse to obey. Soldier!' he said,
turning towards him abruptly, `lead on to the palace. I follow you. But,
I warn you against treachery. You yourself will be the first victim.'
`There is no treachery on my part, master,' said Elec. `If there be
treason any where, it be between thee and my sweetheart.'
`Lead on, to the bridge.'
`I came by a boat.'
`Then to the boat. I have little time for delay,' said Montezuma,
imperatively
.
The two men were soon seated in the boat, which shot swiftly on its way
across the canal in the direction of the palace stairs.
CHAPTER XI.
THE EMPEROR AND HIS DAUGHTER.
The
princess Eylla remained seated thoughtfully at her lattice, long after
the prince had left her, with her eyes often turned towards the moonlit
waters, with anxious expectation. She had quite forgotten him in the
contemplation
of her interview with the young man who had so singularly
interested her. At length one of her female slaves entered from the
anteroom
,
and said, in a low tone, as she stood at a distance:
`The emperor, princess.'
`My father!' she involuntarily exclaimed, in the deepest confusion;
`doth he come in anger, child?'
`He is now here,' answered the slave, disappearing; and, at the same
instant
,
the emperor entered alone. The princess hastened towards him and
affectionately kissed him on the forehead.
`Dearest father, I do feel honored with this kind visit. Thy cheek is
pale. Art thou ill?'
`Nay  girl! I am better,' he said, with a smile, observing her anxiety.
`I will sit with thee by thy lattice. 'T is long since we have conversed
together, with the affairs of government drawing so largely upon the time I
would else devote to thy sweet society.'
The princess conducted him to the seat which she had just vacated, and
sat beside him, with her hand held in his. She was embarrassed. She felt
that this visit was untimely, and had a deeper object in view than mere idle
pastime. Her thoughts flew to the Prince, and then to the young citizen,
for a solution of it. She could not fix upon any conjecture, and sat silent,
and not without alarm, waiting for him to speak. She stole a glance at his
face, and saw that, beneath all the paternal kindness his love for her had called
up, there dwelt a seriousness that foreboded an interview the character of
which she felt she could anticipate, and which she feared to encounter. If
possible she determined to divest his mind of any thing touching herself and
the prince, which she began to feel convinced weighed upon it, and said in a
lively tone:
`Father, shall I send for my dancing slaves, and let them entertain thee.
They have learned some new and graceful steps since last you saw them.'
`Nay  daughter. I would rather be alone with thee,' said the emperor
gravely.
`Wilt thou that I shall sing to thee. I know thou lovest to hear the song,
composed by the lord Cuiri, to the evening star. See, it shines with a gentle,
smiling beam, as if inviting our adoration.'
`Another time, another time, daughter. Why choosest thou songs of the
lord Cuiri? where are those I did hear thee sing, composed by thy cousin?'
`I have not sung them of late,' answered the princess falteringly.
`Come, then, I will hear a song from thee of the prince's making. Thou
didst once know many.'
`Indeed, father, I do confess I have forgotten them. I was a child then.'
`Forgotten them! Didst thou learn them as a child, to forget them as a
bride? How is it the Duke Cuiri hath more favor with thee than the Prince
Palipan?' demanded the emperor, something sharply.
`He hath not, father,' answered the princess sincerely.
`Then why dost thou bear his compositions in thy memory, and
voluntarily
offer to sing them to me, when thou canst ne'er recollect a line of the
prince's, when I command thee to sing? How is this of Lord Cuiri?'
`Indeed, father,' cried the princess with pain, `I do not hold the Lord Cuiri
in better favor than other nobles of the court. I did but think of his song
at the moment, among many others of other knights. It was yonder star,
to which it was addressed that brought it to mind.'
`So thou canst remember songs of Cuiri and other knights, but, when thou
art asked for one of the prince's, who hath written many in thy praise, thou
hast lost thy memory;' said the emperor with irony. `This, methinks, is
passing strange, and thou betrothed to him, and now to become his wife.
But, doubtless, fashions have changed with virgin princesses, since I wooed
the empress, your mother.'
`My dear father!' cried the princess, casting herself at his feet. She
tried to speak further, but utterance failed her, and burying her face in her
hands, she laid her head upon his knee, and wept passionately, for a few
moments, while he gazed down upon her in silence, with a countenance
expressive
of mingled sorrow and displeasure. At length she lifted her face
to his, and said firmly, yet imploringly:
`Father, if you love me, sacrifice me not. I can never love the prince.'
`I pray thee, child, calm thyself!' he said, taking her hands kindly.
`Save me, father!' she cried, still kneeling.
`Nay, rise up, my daughter. Let me talk with thee?'
`Not of
him
no  no!'
`I command thee, rise up and listen to me,' said the emperor, in
displeasure
.
`I love thee, and will do thee no wrong. I would talk with thee on
this subject, which seems, all at once, so hateful!'
`No, not all at once; I have
never
loved the prince.'
`Yet thou hast endured him, and wert passive, at the least. Wherefore,
then, all at once, this bitterness against him?'
`I have no bitterness towards the prince, father. I do honor him as my
cousin.'
`This is folly. What hath occurred to-day between you? What hath
he done, to make thee of thy present mood? What hath changed thee?'
he interrogated.
`I cannot love him, father,' answered the perplexed and distressed
princess
,
earnestly; for she could scarcely answer to herself the question.
`Dost thou love me?' he asked, in a tone of sudden tenderness.
`Indeed, I do, dear father.'
`Then, if thou canst not love him, and dost truly love me, as thou sayest,
love him for the love you bear to me.'
`Father, I implore thee, do not make me miserable! I can never love
the prince.'
`Be it so. Keep thy heart, and let him have thy hand. He will be
content
with even that, such is his love for thee.'
`He would be content without me altogether, sir, could he but get the
throne,' answered the princess, with spirit.
`How mean you, child?'
`That the prince regards me but as the step which he must press beneath
his foot, ere he can ascend to thy seat.'
`Thou dost judge thy cousin falsely, daughter! Some prejudice hath
been placed in thy mind against him, and thou wouldst believe him guilty
of every wrong!' said the emperor, with angry feelings. `Thou knowest
my heart is set on thy union with thy cousin. The stability and
preservation
of the empire demand it. There is a prophecy, that when a female
shall become heir to the Aztec throne, the sceptre shall pass into the hands
of a slave.'
`Is there such a prophecy, father?' asked the princess, with surprise.
`It hath hung over our house for centuries;' answered the emperor,
solemnly
.
Thou art the first woman of our race on whom the crown hath
descended. It becomes me, therefore, to save the kingdom by the '
`Sacrifice of thy child,' she said with feeling. `Father, 't is an idle tale!
I love my country, but I love it too well to give its destiny into the hands
of my cousin.'
`Daughter, will not thy love for me lead thee to obey me?' he asked,
with affectionate entreaty.
`My dearest father,' she answered, fervently, while the tears flowed fast;
`the gods know how much I love thee! Night and morning my prayers
ascend with the smoke of the sacrifice, for blessings on thee. I willingly
will lay down my life for you. Give the throne to thy nephew, if thou wilt,
and offer me up a sacrifice on the altar of our deity, and I cheerfully yield
myself the victim. But ask me not to wed prince Palipan.'
The emperor listened to this eloquent and painfully-thrilling appeal, and
seemed to be deeply moved, while he wondered at the unconquerable
aversion
to the prince, which had suddenly taken possession of her soul. He
saw that she was too firm in her purpose to be pressed further upon the
subject now, and too full of feeling upon it to render it safe. He looked
upon her a few moments in silence, while she kneeled before him, awaiting
his decision, with a drooping head, flushed cheek, and tumultuous heaving
of the heart, as if prepared to hear from his lips the sentence of the doom she
had chosen. At length he bent over her, extended his arms, and lifted her to
his heart.
`My dear Eylla,' he said, in the tenderest accents of sympathy, `I will
not vex thy wounded spirit longer with this hateful theme. I could wish
thy cousin dead, ere the mention of his name had given thee such sorrow.
Kiss me.'
The maiden, who had been waiting for a burst of wrath from a displeased
parent and angered monarch, was wholly overcome at this unexpected
kindness
,
and fell, weeping, upon his neck.
`My own dear father, how can I repay this forbearance?'
`Ask thy own heart, my child,' he answered, in a low voice of tender
reproof.
`Let me be a few days, sir  I know not what may transpire  it may
be  that  that ' and tears checked her utterance.
`I will speak to thee no more of it,' said the emperor, with a smile of
success. `I do leave all my heart's wish to thy filial love. Thou mayest
sing to me now  that song of the lord Cuiri?'
`Indeed, father, I cannot sing.'
`Then go to bed, love. I will leave thee to repose.'
The emperor rose to go, when she caught his hand, and said, earnestly and
solemnly:
`Father, I feel thou dost hope too much. If any thing could win me, it
would be the kindness I have this evening experienced. I have only bid
thee wait, but not to hope.'
`I shall both wait and
hope
, sweet daughter,' he said, playfully. `But,'
he added, confident that her love for him would overcome her dislike for the
prince; `I do promise thee I will never mention thy cousin's name to
thee again.'
With these words the emperor bade her good night, and quitted her
apartment
.
As he returned to his own chamber, it was with confidence in the
good sense and filial obedience of his daughter, and through these, of the
ultimate success of his hopes. His knowledge of the avenues to Eylla's
heart had led him to suppress his displeasure and indulge her when he
deemed the severest censure and punishment were due. And he rentered
his apartments, assured that a few days' reflection, on the part of both the
prince and the princess, would bring them to regard each other with more
favor than ever, and ultimately, by their union, realize the long-cherished
hopes he had formed for their happiness and the prosperity of the empire.
Eylla had scarcely time to collect her thoughts or compose her sad
features
,
after the departure of her father, ere Tzitzis entered. Without a
word, she stole softly to the feet of her mistress.
`Well, Tzitzis?' asked the princess, eagerly.
`He is without.'
`Whom didst thou send for him?'
`Elec.'
`Thy lover?'
The Peruvian colored, drummed on the floor with one of her pretty feet,
and was silent.
`What said he, when bidden?' asked the princess.
`I asked not what he said to Elec; but when I received him at the
court-stairs
,
I asked him if he knew who had sent for him to come to the palace?'
`And what answer made he?' demanded the princess, with quickness.
`He had come by the command of the fair princess, Eylla!'
`Said he
fair?
'
`He did, and much more words of praise of thee than it becometh me to
repeat, or thee to hear. But I asked him, if the emperor had sent for him,
if he would have come?'
`Thou wert forward? What answered he?'
`With much spirit, that he feared not to obey the emperor's commands,
and so did speak some other words I would not the emperor had heard for
any thing.'
`Go, bring him hither. I would speak with him at once.'
The Peruvian left the room, and the princess, who had seated herself upon
a divan, arranged her robes in a more graceful manner, and with a palpitating
heart, and an air of mingled majesty and condescension, prepared to receive
the young man. The next moment the slave ushered him into her presence.
CHAPTER XII.
THE SERF AND PRINCESS.
After
Montezuma had entered the palace, he began to suspect treachery
might be concealed beneath all this form of a message from the princess;
and the light question put to him by the Peruvian, as to the supposition of
having been sent for by the emperor, strengthened this idea. The part he
had taken in the fray occurred to him then for the first time, so much had
the thought of the princess filled his mind, and before he entered the wing
occupied by her, he fully believed he was about to be led before the emperor.
He made up his mind, therefore, to act with fearlessness, and to let his
courage and self-possession retrieve his error in putting himself, the leader
of the revolt, at such a crisis, in the power of his foe. As he entered the
apartment of the princess, therefore, his port was haughty, and his eye
flashed round defiance, as it seemed to seek out the person of the emperor;
but seeing instead the lovely form of the princess before him, his whole
bearing changed. The eye lost its fire and assumed a softer light; the lip
its curl of haughty defiance, and his whole stern aspect and lofty port were
converted into an air of devotion and gentleness; and he knelt reverently
before her. The princess marked the instantaneous change, and a blush of
gratified pleasure added to her loveliness. For a moment both were silent,
he, awed, as it were, with her wondrous beauty, and with the dignity of her
presence,  she, bewildered with her own feelings. At length she
summoned
calmness, and said, in as cold a tone as she could assume, though her
voice trembled,
`Thou art called Montezuma, the son of Mahco, the net-maker.
`I am the low-born slave thou hast named, lovely Princess Eylla,' he
answered, with bitterness.
The princess marked his manner, and instinctively interpreted the feeling
from which it sprung.
`Methinks,' she continued, in a voice that she meant should partake of
indifference in its tones, `methinks thou wert the cause of certain tumults in
the streets to-day.'
`Noble princess,' said Montezuma, lifting his face to hers, and addressing
her in a firm and respectful tone, but in which she detected something of
sadness, `inasmuch as
you
judge me to have done wrong, I do confess my error.'
`Nay  but didst thou not do wrong?' she said, gazing with admiration
upon his fine, manly countenance, and again experiencing the same thrilling
emotions in her bosom that the first sight of him from the chariot had
caused.
`Pardon me, Princess Eylla,' he answered, firmly; `but neither I nor
they who died to protect my poor life have done wrong against the tyrant.'
`Tyrant!' she cried, starting nearly to her feet.
`Forgive me, princess. I had forgotten, looking on thy gentle face, thou
wert his daughter. But if I offend thee,' he added, with tenderness, `thou
hast only to order me to the block. Death from thy hands were far better
than life with thy father's foot upon my neck.'
`You are over-hasty, Montezuma,' said the princess, with a slight reproof.
`I would ask of thee how, so young and of thy degree, thou hast now gained
such influence over the hearts of men as I have this day witnessed? Who
would die thus for the emperor? None.'
`The emperor, when he needs men's lives, takes them. Many men have
died for the tyrant Ulyd; but not of their own will.'
`Ha! this to the daughter?'
`It should have been said to the sire.'
`Thy spirit is too quick. It becomes not thy station. If my father has
injured thee, let me atone,' she said, in a touching tone of voice. `What can
I do for thee? I can and do sympathize with thee.'
`Nay, speak not to me so gently,  I cannot bear it,' said the young man,
with emotion.
The princess was moved, and looked on him with the deepest interest, as
he buried his face in his hands, for the moment wholly overcome by the few
kind words of sympathy she had uttered. The whole plan of conspiracy
against her rushed like an overwhelming flood upon his mind. Suddenly he
fell at her feet and cried,
`Your gentle sympathy, noble princess, has saved your father's empire,
perhaps his life.'
`Speak quickly  what mean you?' she cried, with the intensest alarm.
`I will confess all to thee, and avert the calamity, if possible, and
then die, happy in the consciousness of not having struck the blow that would
have made you wretched.'
`Speak, I implore thee!'
Montezuma glanced at the Peruvian, who remained near the door.
`Tzitzis, wait in the anteroom!' commanded the princess; and the next
moment she was left alone with the young conspirator. Montezuma was for
a few minutes silent, and paced the room several times, as if forgetful of her
presence. At length he stopped before her and said:
`Gentle Princess Eylla, your image has ever been present to me in this
matter, and bidding me spare the empire for thy sake. I had well nigh
listened to it, and lived on a slave. To-night you have conquered. It may
be too late to avert the blow, but I shall feel happy in having confessed to
you my part in it.'
`I do pray you to speak, and let me learn the worst,' she intreated.
`Listen, princess, and forgive, for we have borne much from thy house.
Thou knowest the wrongs,  yet do the twentieth part of them come not to
thy ears,  that we endure from the nobles, and, pardon me, from the
emperor.'
`I do; and my heart hath bled for the innocent.'
`There is not a Mexitilian slave of thy empire, that knows not thy
sympathy
.
But, even thy gentleness could little avail us. We have endured
until endurance is no longer a virtue, even in bondmen.'
`What new oppression hath fallen upon thee?'
`None other than is common to our condition, and to each passing day. I
have long felt keenly the degradation of my race. Thou knowest, noble
princess, that we once were a free and happy people; that we are now slaves
to conquerors, and these are your father's house.'
`I know all this; but methinks this government should be regarded as
thine own  't is of many centuries standing.'
`Time can never sanction wrong. If your emperors had given us a
portion of civil liberty, we should have been content, perhaps, to have
endured
their rule. But they have kept us in bondage. We hold no rights,
not even that of our lives. The insolence of the nobles, and the
blood-thirsty
tyranny of the emperor, have at length roused the people to
resistance
.'
`To revolt?'
`At this moment, princess, there are thirty thousand men disciplined and
marshalled, under daring leaders, who wait but a signal from me, to rise and
overturn the present dynasty.'
`Traitorous slave!' cried the princess. `Ho! thou shalt die for it! Ho!'
And she was hastening towards the door to give the alarm, and call upon
11
the palace guards to seize him, when, with gentle firmness, he caught her
hand, and restrained her.
`Be angry with me, but hear me,' he said. `I swear to thee, princess,
one word from thee will have power to allay this rebellion,' he said, boldly.
`Name it,' she said, suffering him to detain her.
`It is a promise.'
`Name it!'
`That you will not wed thy cousin, the Prince Palipan, but reign alone.'
`Ha! Is this the promise thou wouldst have, sir rebel?' said the
princess
,
between pleasure and surprise.
`It is. The people, then, will hope to obtain from thy clemency what
now they would have at the steel's point. And he loves thee not.'
`Thou art bold, sir.'
`It is thy goodness and my country's fate that makes me so.'
`What wouldst thou have beside my father's head?' she asked, sternly.
`No. I have told thee, lady, the elements of rebellion are in motion.
Within two hours, the signal of revolt is to light the summit of the Temple
of War, and before dawn half the city on the other side of the canal, with
gates, armor, and military towers, will be in our hands.'
`Thou dost both terrify and fill me with resentment. What dost thou
here, rebel, in the presence of thy princess? Wilt thou make me the first
victim of thy rebellion?' And she stood before him with a proud and
kindling
eye.
`Nay, princess, I am here by thy command. I have heard thee speak,
and thy voice has melted my soul. From the rebel chief,  who, two hours
hence, was to shake the throne of the empire with the vast flood I was to let
loose against it,  I am thy slave, obedient to thy slightest wish.'
He bent his knee before her, and seemed to await her commands. The
princess walked the chamber rapidly, and was for some time silent. She
then stopped and spoke. Her anger was gone, and grief, rather than
displeasure
,
marked the intonations of her voice.
`I know, young man, thou and thy race have borne much. I have
trembled
at the contemplation of this very result. I had a prophetic intimation,
that one day the injustice of the nobles and  and  I will be frank  and
of my poor, misguided father, would fall back upon their own heads. This
hour has now come. You are the instrument chosen by the gods to guide
the event. I should be false to my own feelings,  to my own heart,  did
I say I could do less than admire the noble spirit that burns in your bosom.
I should feel like you were I in your condition. Though born a princess, I
can feel with my subjects. But,'  and now her voice became firm and
solemn,  `this evil must be stayed. `'T is not too late. Thou wilt, oh! thou
wilt avert the destiny that hangs over my father's head!'
She clasped her hands together and implored him, with the silent eloquence
of her tearful eyes. Montezuma was deeply affected. He pressed the
princess's hand to his lips, and said fervently,
`I do call the gods to witness that, if in the power of mortal man to stay
this revolt, it shall be done. I did purpose this, from the moment the
sympathy
of thy tone fell upon my heart. But, noble and dear princess, the
people are in arms for privileges. My voice alone will not stay them.
Let me bear to them the promise that what they seek they shall have,
the day you ascend the throne.'
`What do they ask?'
`Liberty of lives and property. To be freemen, and not slaves.'
`How can I rule a nation of freemen?'
`By justice, gentleness, and mercy.'
`I do promise. Fly, and save the empire! Oh!' she cried, with
eloquent
distress, `avert this stroke, and I will bless thee!'
`It may be too late to suppress the revolt in every quarter, but I will try,
or lose my life in the attempt.'
`Nay,  I beseech you, risk not your own life rashly,' she cried,
earnestly
.
`Dost thou care, then, princess, for the life of one so humble as I?' he
asked, deeply moved.
`Thou art no longer humble. Thou art a leader of a nation seeking its
freedom. The gods have ennobled thee.' And the eye and manner of the
princess bore testimony to the existence of the feeling in her breast, to which
she gave utterance.
`Alas! alas! what wrong have I been wilfully plotting against you?' he
said, bitterly. `Oh, that I had met thee yesterday  had but known that so
bright and glorious a spirit dwelt beside the throne of a tyrant. I do feel
I have been warring against heaven.'
`'T is not too late to retrieve thy error, noble youth!' said the princess,
unconsciously laying her hand upon his arm under the influence of the tender
and pleased emotions his impassioned words had awakened. `I will at once
send news to the emperor of this fearful storm ready to burst upon his head,
and have him march troops at once to all parts that are immediately
menaced. This will intimidate the insurgents, and perhaps prevent the
revolt
.
What sayest thou?'
Montezuma turned away and walked across the apartment, and stood by
the window, in deep and anxious thought. Conflicting feelings struggled for
the mastery in his bosom. At one instant, his country's degradation held
the upper place in his mind; the next, the beauty, gentleness and sympathy
of the princess, governed him. He felt that this moment was the crisis of
his life. It was either his country or the princess. There was no medium.
He balanced his honor against his  love. Yes! the heart of Montezuma,
of the serf and bondman! of the net-maker's son, was enslaved by the
charms of the princess. He felt it, but dared not confess it to himself. But
he felt that for her he was ready to make any sacrifice. `Shall I sacrifice
my country?' was the naked question his honor put to him. `No,' was the
faltering response. `Shall I sacrifice the princess?' `Never!' came
strongly
from the depth of his heart. He stood a moment like a statue, with his
eyes fixed upon the floor, and her suggestion remained unanswered. `Shall
I be a traitor to my friends and country?' His conscience thundered in his
ears, `shall I be branded with infamy for my daring ambition, in presuming
to lift my thoughts to the princess? Am I mad? Let me remember that I
am Montezuma, the net-maker  a serf  a slave  a low-born bondman!
What have I to do to let a princess, who would scorn and laugh at my
feelings
,
did she know them, weigh against the love of the thousand hearts that
are now beating with warm affection for me! Shall I be false for a
phantom
?
Shall I be a traitor, because yonder fair star smiles upon me? Shall
I dare woo it? Fool, fool! 'T is a temptation of the evil spirit! I will
be true to my country, and strike the first blow for her liberty.'
`Montezuma!' spoke a sweet reproving voice near him, and he felt a soft
hand gently placed within his own.
The blood rushed from his heart, and the strong man trembled like a leaf.
He buried his face in the drapery of the window, and his chest heaved
strongly and violently. That single word, like the charm of some skillful
sorceress, had revolutionized his whole feelings. The princess had read
rightly his thoughts, and she had obeyed the impulse of feelings she could
not herself control, in approaching him. Her heart, she felt, had become his;
and she felt that it was in vain longer to attempt to disguise from herself its
condition. She knew, too, with all a woman's skill in reading the heart of
man, that the youth loved her. She knew that love, the deepest and most
worshipping, unknown to himself, governed every motion, every movement
of his eye, every expression of his countenance. She therefore obeyed
unhesitatingly
the promptings of her own heart  for love knows no reasoning
but its own impulses.
`Montezuma,' she repeated a second time, in tones that went to his heart.
They were irresistible.
He fell down at her feet and cried, with the strongest emotion,
`Princess, I can but confess my daring passion, and prepare my mind for
death.'
`Thou art forgiven, Montezuma,' she said, in a voice that made his heart
leap with life. He lifted his bowed head and she met his glance of
wondering
delight, with a smile that told him he was loved.
`Do I dream? or hath my mad ambition turned my brain?' he said,
pressing to his lips the hand she resigned to him.
`Nay, fair youth,' she said smiling, `if thou dost know not whether thou
art sleeping or waking  'T were best '
`Pardon me  forgive me  this bliss is too exquisite to be real.'
`Montezuma,' she said, with a sweet dignity that became her. `I
discovered
thy love, closely, as you sought to hide it from yourself, beneath
reverence
and duty  but I had not detected it unless I had first felt a kindred
interest in you.'
`In me, lady?'
`To-day,' she continued, with ingenuous frankness, `when I beheld thee in
the conflict, in the street. Thy manly resistance to oppression, and thy
proud spirit, kindled my own, which scarcely less than thine, spurns wrong
and tyranny. I met thy grateful glance for my intercession, and, brave
Montezuma, I felt from that moment, Heaven had formed us for each other.'
`Sweet Princess Eylla,' said Montezuma, with modest dignity. `I am
unworthy.'
`Nay  thou art worthy,' she said, proudly and touchingly, `or the
emperor's
daughter would not have felt an interest in thee. When I look upon
thee,' she said, surveying his noble person, `and remember thy courage and
spirit, I do feel that it is not the princess that hath stooped to thy rank, but
that the gods have elevated thee to hers. From this moment, let there be
confidence between us. Those whose hearts are united by the will of the
gods, should be but one in feeling. Whatever we may appear to each other
in outward bearing before the world, Montezuma, from this moment we
ourselves
know no inequality. Forget thy birth and condition, for from this
hour, my love ennobles thee.'
Montezuma listened to the spirited address of the lovely princess, and
caught the spirit of her independent mind. Well worthy had nature made
him, in face and form, to win a princess's regard, and richly had she filled the
noble casket with the jewels of all that is bright and elevated in the human
character. No sooner did Montezuma find that his love,  for such it was he
now felt, that had from the first inflamed his regard for the princess,  was so
singularly reciprocated, than his soul,like the young eagle, which, nurtured
by a water-fowl, all at once feeling his power and strength, suddenly expands
his pinions and soars to his native skies, to burnish his wings in the sun,  rose
with the first feeling of its original powers, to the native dignity of its true
station. He was changed by her love, as if a spell had passed over his spirit.
He rose freely to her regal height, and stood beside her  her equal. He
forgot
that he was a slave  he only remembered that her love had made him
a prince. She saw the instant change that followed her words, and felt that
she
had not indeed descended from her station, but had placed her love on
one most worthy to receive it.
`Princess,' he said, with a tone and manner singularly becoming the moral
elevation to which love had raised him, while the deepest and most
reverential
love beamed in his eyes, `I knew not what bliss was in store for me.
From this moment, my heart and life are yours. It shall be my study to
make myself worthy of your regard. From this hour, I do identify myself
with thy truest happiness  and should death tomorrow be the penalty of
my ambitious love, I shall welcome it with joy, with the recollection that I
have been loved by thee.'
`Nay, Montezuma,' said the princess with tenderness, `there will, I trust,
be a better crowning to our love than death. Save to thyself and me, 't is
secret and sacred. It should be thus, until the hour arrive when I shall call
thee to my side. Let us in the meanwhile be happy in our mutual regard.
From this hour I live only for thee! Thou hast won a true woman's heart,'
she said, smiling upon him, `and thou wilt find love makes even a maiden
bold, where her heart is given.
Montezuma, encouraged by her smile, and emboldened by his accepted love,
pressed her unresistingly to his manly heart. For a moment both were silent
under the weight of the feelings that naturally rushed upon their minds at
such a moment. For an instant the princess' head dropped upon his shoulder,
and tears of feeling started to her eyes. The thought that her woman's
heart had found a refuge from the persecuting love of the prince, nearly
overcame her. The lover pressed a light kiss upon her pure forehead, and
truly felt himself above all men favored of the gods. Here was indeed a
singular and most extraordinary spectacle to human eyes  a princess and a
peasant, vowing to each other, love unchanging, love undying, love eternal!
Here were two noble and congenial spirits that nature and fortune had
sundered
widely, brought together by the magical power of love. Well hath
Maria del Occidente sung
`Nature never formed a soul
Without its own peculiar mate.'
The princess was the first to speak.
`We have forgotten, in ourselves, noble Montezuma, the dark cloud ready
to burst upon the empire,' she said, releasing herself blushingly from the
support of his arm, and speaking with the spirit that became the startling
theme.
`It shall be stayed,' he said resolutely.
`How?' she demanded eagerly.
`By my own influence, and the use of thy name.'
`Dost thou mean my promise to grant them all they desire?'
`I fear nothing else will save the empire,' he said, decidedly.
`Use it, then. Go! Shall not the emperor be told that he may
strengthen
the threatened posts?'
`It were best not. The troops, once in motion, would not rest until their
thirsty swords were slaked in blood. Leave it to me, dearest Princess Eylla,
nor be alarmed at any signal lights or uproar you may hear in the city.
Some lives will doubtless have to be sacrificed, but it shall be quelled.'
`I do fear they will hold thee as a traitor, with the first word you utter,
and sacrifice you to their vengeance,' she said, with anxious alarm.
`Fear not, dearest princess. I know the temper of my countrymen well.
I pray thee be at peace, and trust all to me,' he said, preparing to go.
`The gods aid thee! I will indeed redress their wrongs when I have the
throne! Oh that I could speak to them in person. My presence  my
voice! it might allay the upheaving of this human sea!'
`Nay  believe me, princess, thy name alone shall appease it.
Farewell
.'
`Come hither, if thy life is spared, as soon as you can assure me the
empire
is safe. Alas, what evil hath my father's severe rule brought upon his
own head! Take this signet. It will secure your readmission to the palace.
Fly, now, ere it be already too late. 'T is within an hour of midnight. Oh
that Heaven would return thee safely. My place will be at yonder altar, till
thou come back and tell me the throne of my father's house is saved.
Tzitzis
!'
The Peruvian entered and knelt before her mistress.
`Rise, and reconduct this youth to the water. See thou address him not;
and hasten thy return.'
Montezuma respectfully pressed to his lips the hand the princess extended
towards him, and instantly left the apartment with his guide. The princess
flew to a little altar near the window, and cast herself on her knees before it,
and for sometime, gave indulgence to the rush of strange and new thoughts
that agitated her bosom, rather than to devotion. How much had transpired
since she knelt before that altar in the morning! How wonderful the
revolution
in her feelings. How sudden, bold, and effectual, had been Love's
victory. A glance, interchanged with a peasant, had kindled admiration
into tender interest. A few moments' interview had ripened interest into love,
and her heart was no longer her own! How wonderful the power and
dominion
of love! No rank is too high for his daring aim; no degree too low,
to which he will not stoop to launch his arrow.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE TWO CASIPETIS.
Only
a few minutes had elapsed after Montezuma had been taken in
charge, on his first arrival at the palace with Elec, by the fair Peruvian
slave, ere another boat appeared at the palace stairs. A single individual,
richly dressed in some official costume, with his face carelessly half-concealed
in his short cloak, leaped on shore, and, ascending the steps, crossed the
moonlit court, to a gate, at the extremity, which led into the body of the
palace
.
A sentinel was at the gate, who merely said as he passed by,
`Ah, master steward! Thou art abroad late.'
`I have great business on my hands, friend,' answered the officer; `mine
is a weighty occupation.'
`It is, if I may judge by thyself. Methinks thou dost gain a pound of fat
a day.'
`And thou dost lose a pound. This standing by the hour on cold stones,
locked up in steel, is, methinks, no pastime. How, think you, the nobles
would like it?'
`The nobles have no need. I am but a poor man-at-arms, and like must
like with me.'
`Art thou an Aztec by birth?
`Ah, mascal, thou art merry. Am I a noble, forsooth?'
`Wouldst thou change places with one?'
`Aye, that would I.'
`Who bade thee stand here from morning till night, cased in armor?
`The captain, surely.'
`Who bade the captain hold the guard here?'
`His noble.'
`Who gave the noble his power?'
`The emperor.'
`And whence had the emperor his?'
`From the gods.'
`Thou dost lie, there, Huri,' boldly spoke a soldier, from a recess near him.
`He got it by conquest, and has held it by tyranny.'
The stranger started with an exclamation of surprise and pleasure.
`It were well the emperor got not wind of thy speech, Baqueti,' said the
soldier. `Ever since one of his guard took up on his spear-point thy little
boy, because his shout had started his horse, thou hast been growling.
Thou wilt have a spear thrust through thy tongue, yet.'
`Soldier, give me thine hand,' said the stranger, approaching; `I and
thou are of one mind. When thou seest a flame rising on yonder hill of the
temple, know that the days of the tyrant are ended.'
`Who art thou?' asked the soldier, drawing him aside to the moonlight.
`Thou art not Casipeti, the mascal.'
`No. I am Casipeti, the slave.'
`I have heard of thee. Thou wert in my thoughts that moment you came
up. What dost thou here?'
Casipeti saw he was to be fully trusted, and in a few words explained to
him the conspiracy. `Now,' said he to him, `I leave you to persuade your
comrade, and such of the guard as hold this gate, to join us.'
`I pledge my life to the cause,' answered the man firmly. `Whither go
you now?'
`Into the palace, to feel the pulses of all its inmates that I fall in with.'
`Thou wilt find many that throb rightly,' said the soldier, as Casipeti
passed
on and entered upon the inner terrace of the palace.
He passed leisurely along the corridor, not forgetful of his assumed
character
,
towards the battlement, where Tzitzis had met Elec. Ere he reached
the winding steps, he was accosted by two or three servitors passing to and
fro, and once or twice, from his ignorance of the affairs upon which they
addressed him, he was in danger of betraying his true character. At length
he reached the platform of the tower, where the sentinel was stationed. It
was Elec himself, who had but a short time before relieved the post. A
group of soldiers were near him.
`Bless me!' said one, `if here is not the mascal climbing the stairs for
the first time in a twelvemonth.'
`Hast thou come up to shoot skylarks for the princess's dinner?' asked
another, laughingly.
`Elec, he hath seen thy sweetheart here an hour since, and hath come up
to make love to her,' added a third.
`Casipeti, an' thou hast come up hither for that, I will hold a quarrel with
thee,' answered Elec, stoutly. `No man hath aught to say to her, but I
have something to say to him.'
`Nay, good youth. I did come here but to hold a moment's discourse with
thee and breathe the cool air, ere I went to bed for the night. A good bed
for thee were better than a long night-watch. Nevertheless, I would I wore
a soldier's sword for one good hour.'
`Wherefore, stout mascal? wherefore?' asked several, in tones of
raillery
,
crowding around him as he stood, his features indistinctly seen in the
shadow of the battlement that towered above their heads.
`Wherefore?' repeated the disguised waterman, stoutly; `that I might
lay it down at the emperor's feet and say,  take that thou gavest me not.'
`He would be sure give it thee in thy body, an' thou didst,' answered
Elec.
`How is it he gave it to thee not?' asked one of the soldiers.
`How can a man give that which is not his to give?'
`But,' said one of the soldiers, `the sword is the emperor's, with which he
arms you  the power is his  you are his. Methinks you are in a fair
way of cutting your own weasand with your sword.'
`These are dangerous words?' said another.
`Dangerous words!' echoed Elec; `shall I put him under arrest,
comrades
,
for speaking such words against the emperor?'
`Nay,' said the first soldier. `The maseal hath taken wine, and come up
here to cool himself. I advise thee, Casipeti, if thou keep thy mouth open
the while, keep thy tongue still. These are words that it will do to talk to
the thoughts, and not to the winds, to be borne on their wings to the ears of
our masters.'
`What is thy name?' asked Casipeti of this man, eagerly, and speaking
in a tone only to be heard by him he addressed.
`Hast thou forgotten Thenul?'
`Then thou art he I seek. Dost thou know a fellow-soldier called
Baqueti?'
`Well.'
`Dost thou know well the mascal?'
`I could not paint thy face on canvass, sir steward, but I have seen it oft.
Let me look at thee again, and I will know thee better, if thou desirest it.'
`Look at me well,' said Casipeti, advancing a step into the light of the
moon, where it shone down upon the battlement between two turrets. He
then threw back his cape, and looked the soldier steadily in the eye.
`By the beard of Hapu! thou art not the mascal?'
`No  hist! I am a friend of Baqueti. He bade me say this to thee.
Dost thou understand me?'
`I do. But what is the fruit of this?'
`It matters not, if he and I and you have been wronged by the tyrant.'
`We shall be wronged again; and wherefore should we grieve? We are
slaves, and must endure. 'T is dangerous to speak of this, and Baqueti hath
been foolish to make the noise he hath done. He will lose his head.'
`There is redress for thee and him and me,' answered Casipeti,
impressively
.
`Who, then, art thou?' demanded the man, starting at the depth and
earnestness of his voice.
`I am Casipeti, the waterman.'
`The same who struck the noble?'
`I am.'
`Thou art not safe here,' cried the soldier, with anxiety for his safety.
`I venture my life here for my country's good. Listen to me, for I see
thy soul is rightly prepared for what I would pour into it.'
With these words, he led him further from the group of soldiers, and
opened to him, as he had done to Baqueti, the whole conspiracy. Thenul
listened to the spirited relation, and when he had ended, embraced him.
`Learn, brave Casipeti,' he said, impressively, `that my spirit, I know not
how, hath had some intimation that liberty would yet visit us. It may have
been the spirit of my twin-brother, who was wantonly slain by a displeased
knight, that hath whispered it.'
`Wilt thou be answerable for this post,' asked Casipeti, `that it shall give
admittance to such as Montezuma shall appoint to take possession of the
palace?'
`It shall be on our side to a soldier. They need but little to bring them
to turn their swords against the throne. Alas! the princess Eylla.'
`Alas! the sweet princess, indeed,' echoed Casipeti. `If she were alone
upon the throne, she would grant her people liberty. Not a sword would be
drawn against her. But there stand two between her,  the emperor, and
the scarcely less tyrant, Prince Palipan.'
Thus speaking, Casipeti, feeling sure that two of the gates of the palace, and
its principal entrances from the water-side, would be held by friends, to give the
insurgents admittance, left the soldier, and assuming the gait and air of the
steward, proceeded towards the interior of the palace by the vaulted
corridor
,
through which the lovely Peravian slave had come to diliver the
message
of the princess to her lover. At the opposite extremity he beheld the
courtiers Tzitzis had seen, still lounging in the central portico, through which
it was necessary for him to pass to reach the head-quarters of the
palace-guard
beyond, one or two of the soldiers composing which were known to
him. Covering more of his face with the ruff of his silken cloak, and
pressing
forward with the busy pace of one not wishing to be interrupted, he had
got near the end of the gallery, when Sulukis, the jester, beholding him,
hastened to meet him.
`Ah, good Casipeti, I am glad to see thee! The knights yonder will none
o' my company, and ha' bid me go seek fools to talk with. The gods ha' sent
thee to their bidding.'
`Nay, good sir fool, I am in haste.'
`Thou shouldst never be in a hurry, gossip,' said Sulukis, taking him by
the cloak. `If thou art fat,  as thou art,  it maketh thee lean; if thou
art lean, it but worketh the bones through the skin. It is bad before dinner,
in that it taketh in wind upon the stomach; it is bad after dinner, in that it
hindereth digestion. 'T is bad of a morning, because one should never
12
begin the day in a hurry, lest he hurry through it; it is bad at night, as now,
because '
`I do pray thee, let me pass, good friend; I have business of moment,' said
Casipeti, anxiously.
`Therein again thou showest thy folly. Thou shouldst have no business
left undone at this hour. If't is business of moment, it should ha'been done
earlier, and by neglect of it thou hast forfeited thy stewardship, and I will
apply for it. If '
`Do not detain me, fool!' said Casipeti, sternly, thrusting him aside, and
endeavoring to pass on.
But Sulukis was too securely fastened to the waterman's cloak to be
shaken off.
`How! gossip Casipeti! dost thou treat the emperor's friend and council
thus? If thou hadst not lost thy wits thou wouldst keep friends with him
who hath the emperor's ear,' said Sulukis, importantly. `Two words in it,
and I'd hang thee. Say thou didst evil in thrusting me aside. Did not
yonder knights bid me come and talk with thee?'
`If thou wilt talk, then come with me,' said Casipeti, desirous to get
beyond
the portico, into which the gallery led, trusting that in crossing it he
should get rid of his annoyer in the crowd.
`Art thou going to give orders to the butler about the emperor's wine,
to-morrow
?'
`Yes, yes!'
`Then I am with you, gossip,' said the fool, delightedly. And thus saying
he passed his arm familiarly through Casipeti's, and walked along with him.
The waterman hastened as they came among the courtiers, and strove, by
keeping behind the columns, to avoid their notice. But Sulukis had no such
motive in view, and as he came among them cried,
`Gramercy! gentle knights! I ha' caught a fool, an' he hath turned out
a wise man.'
`How so, good fool?' asked the very nice and very youthful Count
Arispe
,
whose gallantry had been defeated by the more skillful Peruvian
maiden, walking up towards the pair, and gently, the while, fingering his
incipient mustache. `Resolve that for us.'
`First, he is a fool, in that I found him making haste, and no wise man
doth make haste, for reasons I have but now laid down to him for his future
profiting.'
`And how turned he out a wise man? Have us that?'
`Not as thou art likely to do, gossip,' said Sulukis, pertly.
`How is that, Sulukis?'
`He said he would nothing with me, nor would he listen a word; and I
had to hold him by his cloak to get the point o' his ear. Therefore hath he
proved himself a wise man, by not earing to listen to a fool.'
`Go to, knave. Thou art more saucy than witless.'
`And there be knights o' the court more witless than saucy,' answered the
jester, sharply.
`By the head of my father! I will lay my sword upon thy shoulders,'
answered the youth, angrily, half unsheathing the weapon.
`Wouldst know, gentle knight, asked Sulukis, adroitly getting Casipeti
between himself and the youth, `why he doth swear by the head o' his
father?'
`Wherefore, fool?' cried the young nobles about him.
`Because he hath no beard o' his own to swear by.'
Sulukis had no sooner given utterance to this than, to escape theire of the
fiery young man, he let go his hold of Casipeti, and made a leap in the
opposite
direction, but at the same instant bounded back with a yell of terror
and surprise. Before him he had beheld advancing a second Casipeti, in all
points the counterpart of the Casipeti he had just sprung from. He stood
midway between the two, his head turning with the rapidity of lightning,
from one to the other, while he seemed bewildered between ludicrous terror
and the most perfect wonder. The waterman, whose situation before this
had been sufficiently critical, was not much less surprised, though he had
been in a degree prepared for such a
denoument
. The surprise of the
surrounding courtiers was great, but the thorough astonishment of the mascal
himself, who it was in proper person that chanced to cross the hall at
that instant, may not be pictured. He stopped as if converted into a
statue, and held up both his hands in speechless amazement. The other
Casipeti did precisely the same thing, and betrayed equal amazement.
Sulukis
,
at this, was thrown into an ecstasy of astonishment, and began to caper,
first to one and then to the other, bowing and gesticulating in the most
extraordinary manner. His little remaining wit seemed to have left him,
and he appeared perfectly bewitched. The knights conceived it to be some
privately understood masquerade, but were puzzled to distinguish which was
the true Casipeti, the mascal. At length the fool found his tongue.
`Two fools, masters! Sulukis hath company! Two fools! Hi, hi! ho,
ho! Are you gossip, or are
you
gossip? Was it you going to see the
butler
,
or
you
going to see the butler?' And he turned, as he spoke, from one
to the other, alternately, in the most ludicrous manner, while his face
expressed
mingled humor and fear.
`He is an impostor,' said the mascal, trembling with fear and rage.
Thereupon Sulukis ran up and shook his fist in the waterman's face.
`He is an impostor,' repeated the other in the same tone. Sulukis
returned
and shook his fist in his face, with a menacing look.
`He lies!' cried the mascal, advancing a step.
`He lies!' cried his counterpart, also advancing a step.
`I am the true Casipeti,' said the mascal of the palace.
`I am the true Casipeti,' said the waterman.
`He hath stolen my robe and cloak,' cried Casipeti, the steward,
approaching
two steps nearer.
`He hath stolen my robe and cloak,' cried Casipeti, the waterman, also
approaching two steps.
`What is this?' demanded an old nobleman, approaching; `a broil within
the emperor's hearing! How is this? Is it thou? What art thou here
for, sir mascal?'
His eye, as he spoke, rested alone on the waterman, the other being partly
hidden by a column and the intervening persons of the amused and puzzled
courtiers.
`The gods, having forgot to give Casipeti brains when they made him,
have made another, and now neither know which is which,' said the jester.
`Put me to the questioning o' them both, and I'll prove you the new one,
and show if the gods ha' bettered their work.'
The noble beheld then the counterpart, and gazed from one to the other,
with surprise. `What is this mummery?' he asked, sternly.
`My Lord,' said Casipeti, the waterman, `I know not, save that this good
fool and I were walking together across the hall, when we encountered this
impostor.'
`Yes, I'll swear to it. We were going to get the emperor's wine,' said
Sulukis, decidedly.
`'T is false! my Lord Vepotani,' cried the other, with indignation. `I
was coming from my own office to '
`Listen not to him, my Lord,' said the waterman, in a bold tone. `I pray
you have him punished.'
`He should be hanged!' cried the mascal. `I will appeal to the
emperor
.'
`Now, by mine honor, I do not know which of ye is the true man,' said
Lord Vepotani, with perplexity.
`Leave me to test it, gossip?' said Sulukis; `I will show thee which is the
ass, an' they be not both asses.'
`It is my opinion, my lord,' said one of the knights, pointing to the
water-man
,
`that this is Casipeti, the true mascal.'
`Indeed, my Lord,' said the mascal, intreatingly, `I am the true Casipeti.'
`Friend,' said the waterman, who felt his situation had become by no
means safe or pleasant, and who knew that only the most finished address
and boldness could release him from it; `friend,'  and he approached close to
his counterpart,`I know that you think you are the true Casipeti, the mascal
of the palace. But indeed you are deceived. You labor under one of those
delusions that sometimes afflicts men's minds. Although you have, under
this idea, assumed my dress and office, I will let it pass; and, as the injury
is only mine, trust these noble knights will overlook it, if you will retire in
peace.'
`But I
am
the mascal,' said the steward, faintly, actually beginning to
question his own identity, seeing the cool decision and honest assurance of
the other.
`I tell thee thou art under an illusion. If thou wilt go  go in peace. My
Lord, I beg you will let him go unpunished. I do assure you he will in the
morning come to his right mind. It is an unhappy hallucination, by which
he mistaketh himself for another.'
The steward appeared perfectly bewildered. He looked down upon his
habit, then examined one sleeve of his caftan, and then the other, surveyed
his fingers, stroked his beard, and finally, as if perfectly satisfied of his
proper
identity, shook his head with a decided air.
`My lord, I
am
myself,' he said confidently.
`Wilt thou hang thyself,' said the fool, going up to him. `Hath not
gossip
convinced thee thou art a hallucination, which is something between a
fool and a wise man?'
`Surely thou dost know me, good Sulukis,' said the mascal, coaxingly.
`Was I going with thee to the butler's just now to get me a cup o' the
emperor's wine?'
`No.'
`Then thou art a hallucination. Condemn him, righteous lord Vepotani.'
`By the black eagle! I would not swear but both should be condemned.
Who here present knoweth truly Casipeti, the mascal of the palace?'
While the latter part of this scene was passing, Montezuma, on his way
from the princess, conducted by Tzitzis, had approached the head of the
marble flight of stairs leading down to the hall. He at once detected the
true position of affairs, and saw the imminent danger in which his friend and
compatriot had involved himself.
`Tzitzis,' he said, pointing beneath to the group, `I pray thee, do me and
yonder man a service. Go down and mingle with the crowd, and if
opportunity
offer to bear testimony to the true Casipeti, bear it against him
thou knowest to be the mascal of the palace, and in favor of the other. Do
me this service, and I will not forget thee. I trust to thy wit to get him free
from the dilemma in which he seems placed.'
`It will be a falsehood,' she said, hesitating.
`Thou must use deceit to save his life, which else is forfeit.'
Tzitzis obeyed, and the next instant was standing, silent and unobserved,
within a few feet of the old noble.
`If any one know the face of the mascal,' repeated he, `let him decide
between the two.'
`I do know Casipeti, the mascal, as well as any one in the palace,'
answered
Tzitzis readily, presenting herself.
`Wilt thou abide by her decision?' asked the noble of the steward.
`Indeed I will,' said the steward, cheerfully. `If Tzitzis, whom I have
known from a child, cannot judge between me and yonder impostor, I will
believe I am under an illusion.'
`What sayest thou, pretty maiden?' asked the nobleman, pointing at the
mascal. `Is that the steward of the palace?'
Tzitzis advanced towards him, and deliberately surveyed him from head
to foot, Sulukis precisely imitating her. She then shook her head
doubtingly
,
and approached and took off his green silk bonnet, and looked him
long and earnestly in the face. She then replaced the cap, and again shook
her head gravely. Sulukis made the same scrutiny of his features, jammed
his cap down over his eyes, and also shook his head dubiously, though it
was plain, from the peculiar expression about his mouth, that the fool knew
well that he was the genuine Casipeti.
`My Lord, it is not Casipeti, the emperor's steward,' she said decidedly, and
with a sober air of certainty that was irresistible and convincing, even to
those who had thought they had really recognized the steward.
`My lord, there is not a hair o' his eye-brows that is the same color o' the
true Casipeti,' said the fool, in his turn.
The wretched mascal clasped his hands together in despair, and seemed
ready to fall to the ground; but his anxiety to learn the decision in the other
case sustained him.
`Now, Tzitzis, approach this fellow's counterpart, and see if he be the
mascal  for neither may be what he professes to be.'
The maiden advanced towards the waterman, who, after the judgment
passed on the real official of the palace, began to feel a degree of confidence
that enabled him cooly to prepare for the scrutiny. Though the resemblance
between the two was sufficiently striking to render it easy, in similar dresses,
to mistake one for the other, even by those in the habit of passing the
mascal
daily, yet when the two came to be compared, there was little trace of
the general likeness. The mascal was very portly, with short gray locks
and a full gray beard  while his face was exceedingly red, or of a bright
ruby color. The waterman, who was similarly built, and broadly shaped
about the shoulders, was far less portly, and had light brown hair, but
slightly
mixed with gray; while his complexion was browned by exposure to the
winds and waves.
Tzitzis surveyed him from head to foot, as deliberately as she had done
the counterpart to him, and then nodded her head very assuredly. Sulukis
made the same careful survey, and also nodded his head with approbation.
She then came up close to him, as he had done to the other, removed his
silken cap, and looked closely in his face. She then turned to the nobleman,
and said confidently and unhesitatingly,
`This is the mascal, my lord.'
`I will swear to him, cousin Vepotani,' said the jester, stoutly.
`Then let this fellow be seized,' cried the nobleman, sternly.
`My lord, my good lord,' cried the steward, falling on his knees, `I do
beseech
thee, mercy.
`Thou art an impostor. Away with him!'
`Send for my wife,' he added, in despair. `If she do not know me,
then I were better hanged.'
`It were no test, my lord Vepotani,' cried the jester; `an she be a woman
she will swear to him who is not her husband, that she may get a new one.
Ne'er trust to a woman in such a matter, gossip.'
`Why art thou lingering here?' said Tzitzis, in an under tone, to the
waterman. `Haste and leave the palace! All are now regarding the
steward
!
Haste!'
The disguised waterman, taking advantage of the diversion she had created
in his favor, slipped from the crowd, and following her, she conducted him to
where Montezuma stood.
`Art thou here?' exclaimed Casipeti, with surprise.
`Come with me,' said Montezuma quickly and cautiously. `Lead on,
maiden. It were time we left the palace.'
She conducted them by a private passage, to a small postern, opening into
the court by the water side, and letting them forth, was closing it, when
Montezuma arrested her hand.
`Sweet maiden, I will not forget thy good services to-night. Commend
me to thy mistress, and tell her thou hast seen me safely to the portal, and
that I go without delay, to obey her commands. I pr'y thee, show me the
secret of this postern.'
`I dare not,' she said, laughing. `'T is known only to the princess and
myself, and the emperor.'
`I have to return again to the palace to-night,' he continued, in a gently
entreating tone.
`Then be it so. If the princess blame me '
`I will take the censure, and shield thee.'
`Thou hast confidence in her grace, methinks,' she said, archly.
`Thou art too forward, pretty maiden,' he answered, in a similar tone.
`Wilt comply with my wish?'
`I am afraid to  but I will.
She then showed to him a private slide, that covered a secret bolt shutting
into the lintel, and explained to him its use. Then closing the postern upon
them, she disappeared within.
`What hast thou done in the palace, Casipeti?' asked Montezuma, as
they crossed the paved court in the shadows of a row of lime trees. `I
have much to tell thee.'
`Why art
thou
here?' demanded Casipeti, in reply.
`Listen, my brave friend,' said Montezuma impressively, stopping beneath
a tree that shaded the stairway to the water. `The Princess Eylla sent for
me on account of my affray to-day, and her messenger conducted me
secretly
to her apartments, and was reconducting me to this spot, when I saw your
difficulty with your counterpart, the mascal.'
`And did you thus, and at such a time, venture yourself in the palace?'
asked Casipeti, with surprise.
`I did. I anticipated something, I knew not what, would grow out of it,
favorable to our cause.'
`And what is the result?' asked the conspirator quickly.
`She received me with that sweet urbanity that hath won all hearts.
Then spoke of our oppression by the nobles, and said she grieved at it, and
mourned over her father's cruel and vindictive disposition.'
`And yet she is ready to betroth herself to a man no less cruel by nature,
and whose breast is burning with a thousand imagined wrongs, to revenge
upon the people.'
`Casipeti,' said Montezuma, solemnly and decidedly, `the princess will
never wed with her cousin.'
`No?' exclaimed the conspirator with surprise and doubt. `'T is said,
indeed, she loves him not. But the emperor hath commanded it. It is as
settled as the throne itself.'
`If it be then by the emperor's command, and she love him not, good
Casipeti
,
censure her not. But I tell thee that the princess hath said to me, she
will never wed the prince.'
`To thee?'
`To me, who am unworthy to speak in her presence. Listen, but hold thy
feelings. I unfolded to her the whole of our conspiracy.'
`Betrayed us?' cried the insurgent leader, with fierce surprise. `
Traitor
!'
`No, Casipeti,' answered Montezuma, calmly. `The princess spoke of our
wrongs, and said she would redress them, when she came to the throne. I
reminded her of her husband, the prince, who would then hold the power.
Her eye flashed, and she said in the most spirited and decided manner, she
would never espouse the prince; that the happiness of her subjects was
too dear to her, and she would reign for them. At these words, Casipeti, I
remembered what we were contemplating, and filled with remorse, and
subdued
by her gentle virtues, I cast myself at her feet, and told all.'
`Go on,' said Casipeti, who seemed to be struggling with the strongest
emotion.
`She was overwhelmed with grief and terror. She demanded what we
wanted. I told her  to be free.'
`What answered she?'
`That if I would stay the revolt in its birth, she would grant all we asked.'
`All?'
`Every thing that human liberty contends for.'
`Save her sceptre and her throne, her body-guard of nobles, and her
whole imperial power,' answered Casipeti, with irony.
`Wouldst thou overthrow the throne, Casipeti? Was it not understood,
that the empire should remain in unity, and only the chains that bound us to
its wheels, be broken. Thou wouldst not live in anarchy?'
`No, Montezuma. If the power of the throne could be checked by a
balance of power with the people, it might stand. This proposition of the
princess should be considered.'
`There is but little time. It is either revolution and anarchy, or freedom,
with a healthy government, Casipeti! I trust to your patriotism and wisdom
in this crisis. If I get not your influence on the side I have espoused, I
shall deeply grieve, and give up my country as lost: for I shall fear, indeed,
that you love a dangerous power of your own creation, better than the true
happiness of your country.'
`Montezuma,' cried Casipeti, embracing him, `you are right. I am with
you in heart and hand. But I fear 't is too late to turn back the tide. 'T is
near midnight. Let us hasten and see what can be done. If the gods give
us bloodless liberty, then it will be far dearer to us. How shall we
proceed
?'
`Let us every where proclaim the princess' promise, and be ready to offer
ourselves hostages for its performance. We have kindled the elements of
conflagration  we must do our best to smother them, ere they burst into
a blaze. What have you done in the palace?'
`Obtained many willing ears. I will hasten to the gates and battlements,
and but whisper, we are discovered, and bid them keep all quiet. I will then
follow you to the other side. I fear there will be more difficulty there than
we imagine. Depend upon my faithfulness, and life, if need be  for I am
convinced I should sacrifice it as much for my country in seeking to suppress,
as if I should lose it in leading on the revolt. Farewell. The gods be with
us.'
The two chiefs of the insurrection parted, and the next moment,
Montezuma
was in a boat on his way to the scene of revolt. It was now within less
than an hour of midnight, and all the city seemed to be buried in deep
repose
.
But as he approached the opposite shore at the foot of net-makers'
street, he distinctly heard a low deep murmur, like that of bees disturbed in
their hives. The waterman hastened towards the gate, to seek, by giving
the alarm of the discovery of the conspiracy, to render harmless the seeds of
it, he had there scattered.
CHAPTER XIV.
THE OTOL.
As Tzitzis, on her return towards the apartments of the princess, came
to the end of the gallery of the postern by which she had conducted
Montezuma
from the palace, the Tlascalan glided from behind a column of the
corridor and confronted her.
`What dost thou want with me, Gueicha?' she said, shrinking with
disgust
and fear.
`The prince would speak with thee, pretty Peruvian!' he said, in an
unpleasant
and repulsive tone.
`Is it of moment?' she said, hastening to obey.
`I have but delivered his commands,' said the Tlascalan, gliding away
with the noiseless step peculiar to his race, and disappearing in the shadows
of the corridor beyond.
`I do tremble at meeting this fierce prince. He perhaps has heard or
suspected something of what hath transpired to-night. Or it may be for the
hundredth time to ask me of the state of the princess' heart, and why it is
she loves him not. Indeed
I
could not love him.'
While these thoughts were passing through her mind, she was following
the Tlascalan, and soon came to a door of polished ebony leading from the
extremity of the corridor to the first of the suite of rooms occupied by the
prince. Gueicha was waiting for her upon the step, and as she came near,
entered first and held the leaf of the door open for her to pass in.
She found herself suddenly amid a resplendent blaze of lights reflected
from panels of silver, that surrounded the ante-chamber. The floor was of
ivory, curiously inlaid with ebony, and the arched ceiling overlaid with
mother of pearl. On the farther side of the room was an alcove, the sides
richly hung with silken tapestry, on which were pictured the conquests of the
first Aztec king over the Mexitili. The Tlascalan silently pointed through
this alcove into a larger apartment visible beyond, the walls of which were
hung with rich armor and banners; while from the centre of the dome
blazed a sun of virgin gold, supported by the extended pinions of the black
eagle of the House of Aztec. The floor was overlaid with rich rugs to
protect
the feet of the occupant from the cold, polished marble.
The prince was reclining on a sort of divan of piled cushions, when she
entered. He immediately rose as if expecting her, and smiling, advanced a
step. But his smile was forced, his face was flushed, and his eye restless
and stern. From the moment he had left the emperor, and reached his own
room, he had been sternly pacing his apartments, thinking over his reception
by the princess, and also his interview with the emperor. Schemes of
guilty ambition floated uppermost in his revengeful thoughts. At one
moment
he burned with the fiercest resentment against the princess, and vowed
her death. At another, his love for her overcame this feeling, and he again
dwelt upon the union which the emperor had so much at heart. The idea
of seizing the throne, and establishing himself upon it by the power he could
summon as commander of half the imperial army, at length, after various
struggles, got, and seemed likely to maintain, the ascendency. The
beauty, and virtues, and the hereditary rights of the princess, pleaded to
his generosity, to his honor, and to his heart; but he had only to remember
that she had scorned his love, to make the tottering fabric of his vicious
ambition settle more firmly upon its base. The age and paternal kindness
of the emperor, and his dearest and long-cherished hopes for the union of
the cousins, and, through it, the perpetuity of the empire, also pleaded loudly
for a hearing. But he excused his treason by accusing the emperor of
wishing to make him emperor only as the tool of his own imperial ambition,
and not for any love he entertained for him. At length, he conceived and
matured his purpose. It will develop itself.
`No, no,' he cried, casting himself, wearied, upon the divan; `I will
neither be the father's tool, nor corner-stone of the daughter's throne. My
haughty cousin shall repent her scorn of my true love. The blood of the
Aztec race throbs in my pulse as well as hers. It
shall be done!
By
tomorrow's
dawn the Aztec blood shall flow alone in
my
veins. Gueicha!'
`Your highness.'
`Thou hast that otol flower?'
`It is in yonder vase, prince.'
`Let it remair. Come hither, closer.'
The slave knelt at his feet, in an attitude of the most servile submission to
his will, and his glittering eye burned with the native evil lurking in his
heart. He anticipated being the actor in wickedness, and his eyes, as he
listened, wore unconsciously the look of a serpent's, as he prepares to uncoil
his folds for the deadly spring.
13
`Gueicha, thou hast hitherto been faithful to me. Hadst thou not been,
thou well knowest thou wouldst not be here to hear it. I now need
subtilty, secrecy, and wisdom, as well as faithfulness. May I depend on
thee?'
The Tlascalan bent his neck to the floor, and passed his hand across the
back of it, in token of his willingness to lose his head if he proved otherwise.
`It is well,' said the prince; `but if thou fail me, sirrah, thy miserable
life would not atone for the evil. Know, Gueicha, I have been scorned by
the princess,' added the prince, as if accustomed to speak unreservedly to
his slave.
The Tlascalan smiled inwardly, and a faint gleam of secret pleasure shone
in his eyes. The prince detected it, and said,
`I know thy wicked spirit rejoiceth at this. Thy race are not like others.
You alone feel delight in human woe and evil. Look less fiendish, I
command
thee!' he cried, fiercely, and with a half shudder, as he met a darker
expression in his face. `I loathe thee, villain!'
`What of the princess?' said the unmoved slave, adroitly.
`Thou hast it. She hath refused my hand. She is lost to me forever.'
`Thou dost mean, thou hast lost the throne.'
`Thou art deeper than I took thee to be.
If
I abide by the princess'
decision, I
have
lost the throne. But I do not intend to, worthy Gueicha,' he
added, in a deep, sardonic tone. `Dost thou understand me?'
`No, prince.'
`Then thou art duller than an Ottomitish swineherd.'
`Thou wouldst not compel the princess to espouse thee?'
`Compel her? No, no! I would not wed her, slave, did she kneel at my
feet as thou now art doing, and implore me to accept her hand and throne.
Canst thou not divine my purpose?'
`Wouldst thou harm her?'
`Why dost falter? out with it.'
`Death?' whispered the Tlascalan, fearfully.
`Now thou hast it.
Death!
'
`And the emperor?'
`
Death
!' repeated the prince, in a low, stern voice.
`And the empire?'
`Will become mine,' cried the prince, with vindictive animation.
The Tlascalan was for a moment silent, under the weight of this
disclosure
,
and then said, quietly.
`'T is well conceived, prince.'
`And shall be well executed. Thou must now know thy part in it. For
the emperor, prepare me forthwith a subtle and invisible poison; I will
mingle
it with his wine. For my fair cousin, I have a less rude death.' And the
prince cast his glance towards the vase of water that contained the otol in
freshness and bloom.
`I did think it was but to excite affection,' said the Tlascalan.
`I sent for it for this purpose, Gueicha. But these later events with my
haughty princess, have transpired since the sun set, and I now shall make
use of it for its more fatal virtue. If it fail me, you lose your head.'
`My head, prince, is not mine, but thine. The virtue of the otol flower
can never fail,' said the Tlascalan.
It shall be tested.'
In what manner?' asked the slave, alarmed.
`On the person of one of the princess's female slaves.'
`It exerts its virtue but once,' answered the Tlascalan.
`Is it so, ha?'
`So saith the legend.'
`It must be tried. I will pin my faith on no legend at such a crisis,'
answered
the prince, decidedly.
`I shall have to get another flower, then, for the princess,' said the slave.
`It cannot be got before morning.'
`But, noble prince, I told thee not how it was that it contained the
principle
of death.'
`Thou didst say,' said the prince, `that, placed but for
one
moment on a
maiden's bosom, it would produce love,  laid there for awhile, death. Is it
not thus?'
`It is, your highness.'
`Then, what mean you?'
`Permit me to bring the flower, and I will show your highness.'
`Go, and bring it hither,' commanded the prince, with curiosity.
The slave crossed the room, and carefully removed the otol from the vase,
and brought it to him.
`'T is true, noble prince,' he said, `that this flower produces both love and
death; but the principle of love is only inherent in the flower. Behold, coiled
within the petals, like a green and gilded cup, a small, delicate, and
wonderfully
beautiful serpent.'
`I do,' exclaimed the prince, with admiration.
`This is the principle of death. Each of these flowers contains one such
serpent. It appears to the unobserving a portion of the inner flower.'
`Wherefore didst thou not tell me this, villain? Wouldst thou have had
me risk the princess' life, had I given it to her?'
`Pardon, your highness. I did believe you knew this property it
possessed
.'
`Not that there was a serpent in it.'
`This serpent, your highness, is harmless as the petal of the flower until
warmed to life by contact with the bosom in which it is placed. It then
becomes
lively and most venomous, and in an instant strikes its needle-like
sting into the breast that has warmed it into life. Instant languor ensues,
and the victim falls insensibly into a sleep that knows no waking.
`Wonderful!' exclaimed the prince, gazing upon the beautiful and torpid
animal. `Alas! the poor princess,' he said, in a light, bitter tone, which his
words best describe; `thou wilt pierce a bosom, fair serpent, that my love
has tried for years to penetrate. 'T is a rocky bosom, and thou must strike
deep! Take back the flower, Gueicha! Thy hands will warm it into life
too soon.'
`None but the warmth of a virgin's bosom hath the power to awake it
from its lethargy.'
`It may be; but take care of it, and then come hither. Dost thou know
the princess' Peruvian slave, Tzitzis?' he asked as the Tlascalan returned
to him, after again depositing the flower in the vase.
`I do know her, and wish her as well as thou dost the princess.'
`Vile slave! dost thou name thyself with me, or her with the princess?
cried the prince, angrily. `My free communication hath made thee forget
thyself. By the gods! I will slay thee with my own hand.'
`Mercy, prince. I will not offend again,' pleaded the Tlascalan. `I do
know the Peruvian.'
`Go and seek her; and if she can be found out of the apartment of her
mistress, bid her come hither. Be speedy and secret.'
The Tlascalan left his princely master, and hastened to obey his
commands
.
`Ha! thou art come, then, pretty slave?' he said, rising from the divan,
as he beheld the Peruvian maiden enter. `Come hither,' he added, returning
and placing himself upon the seat from which, under the impulse of his
feelings, he had involuntarily risen to meet her. `I have a word or two to
say to thee. How fareth my royal cousin, thy mistress? I trust she is in
her usual health and beauty. She was a something pale, when last I saw
her.'
`She hath been sad of late,' answered the maiden, diffidently.
`What hath made her sad? Not love, I'll make oath, pretty one,' said
the prince, lightly, and with a shade of irony in his voice.
`She is doubtless thinking of her bridal, sir,' answered the Peruvian, with
much simplicity.
`Humph! Do maidens look sad at such times?'
`When they love not the one they are to wed, your highness?' replied
Tzitzis, with such a just blending of artlessness and audacity in her voice
and look, that the prince, after gazing fixedly upon her face for an instant,
was undecided which to give credit for her speech.
`So, you think the princess hath little favor for me, Tzitzis?' he said,
speaking in his usual tone.
`She hath never said a word to me, your highness,' answered the maiden,
who had scarcely taken her large black eyes from the floor since she first
entered the prince's apartments.
`You are an artful minx,' exclaimed the prince, petulantly. `Hath your
mistress told you I honored her with a visit this evening?'
`She did not, my lord. I have been little with her. But I do remember
I saw she had been weeping when I came in,' answered Tzitzis, with
boldness
so tempered by diffidence and real fear of the prince, that he knew not
whether to get angry, or smile. He did both, however; and then, under the
waning influence of the latter, said:
`Doth your mistress always weep after I have visited her?'
`Not always.'
`Not always. Does she sometimes?'
`Yes, your highness.'
`Come here; I would speak to you nearer. Hath the princess any one
for whom she keeps her smiles?'
`She smiles on the emperor, and sometimes laughs with her pet birds,
when they sing merrily.'
`You are as cautious as the prime minister. He feigns deafness, and you
feign the most finished simplicity. Plainly; hath my cousin a favorite
among the nobles of the court?'
`Among the nobles, your highness?' repeated the Peruvian, with an air
of extreme surprise.
`Yes. The Lord Cuiri, for instance? I learn she hath called him once
the court laureate.'
`She hath never thought of him, I can assure your highness,' replied
Tzitzis, firmly.
`He hath writ her madrigals, and sung them to her as she walked the
gardens, like a rustic swain?'
`A woman may hear songs and not much favor the singer,' said the
maiden, dryly.
`Thou hast ne'er spoken, in thy life, truer word than that, Peruvian,'
said the prince, quickly.
Tzitzis had unintentionally, and without aim, sent a shaft true to the butt.
She made no reply, and the prince continued. `But she hath sung them,
maiden?'
`So hath she sung thine, sir,' answered the slave, naively.
The prince bit his lip, and was for a moment silent. Tzitzis stole a glance
to his face, and trembled at the expression that she saw at the instant
upon it. He looked up, and caught her observing him, and instantly
banished
the dark aspect that had alarmed her, and said with a smile,
`I wonder no longer at the duplicity and art of the mistress, now that I
have interrogated the maid. Pr'y thee, Tzitzis, doth my cousin love flowers
when she is sad?'
`She loveth some flowers, sir.'
`What flowers doth she not love?'
`The llea and the colula, I believe.'
`The llea is crown-shaped, and the symbol of princely love; the colula
signifies ambition, and is my maternal device, embossed on my shield. Thou
art disposed to be witty, pretty one,' said the prince, darkly.
`Pardon, your highness,' said Tzitzis, with fear; `I meant no offence.
But she would never have such flowers in her lattice.'
The prince forced a calmness of voice, and said,
`I would send my cousin a present of a rare and beauteous flower, if I
thought she would accept it. I have sent for thee to bear it to her. We
parted somewhat roughly this evening, and I would fain send her this in
token of reconciliation. Thou wilt bear it to her with these words?'
`I will, your highness.'
`Tlascalan!' said the prince, and glanced with his eye towards the vase.
The slave brought the fatal flower, and, kneeling before the divan,
presented
it towards his master.
`Thou seest it. It is a beautiful flower, an emblem of her own unsullied
purity.'
`It is, indeed,' said Tzitzis, gazing upon the pure, bell-shaped otol.
`With an outside like snow, its petals, thou seest, continued the prince,
are lined, on the inner side, with delicate green, and deep within lies a fair
circle, like a zone of gold bestrewn with emeralds.'
`It is, indeed, lovely,' cried the Peruvian, with delighted surprise.
`And its sweet fragrance, thou perceivest, is with the least motion wafted
through the chamber.'
`I think the princess will accept this, your highness, if ' here she
hesitated
.
`If what? Speak it out.'
`If I tell her not it came from thee.'
The eyes of the prince betrayed the pleasure this thought gave him; for
it harmonized most perfectly with his desire, if possible, to escape the
princess' suspicion. But he was too politic to let his gratification be plainly
seen.'
`No, no, Peruvian. Did I not say it was a gift of reconciliation? How
can it be such, if she knows not that it was I that sent it?'
`I will tell her of it afterwards. It is a sweet and beautiful flower, and I
would have my mistress see it; but, indeed, my lord prince '
`Wellfear not.'
`She will not enjoy it if she knows it came from your highness.'
`I am flattered, truly,' said the prince, sarcastically. `Well, then, bear it
to her, and tell her what tale thou wilt. But, Peruvian, thou hast incurred
my displeasure this evening, and  nay, kneel not, nor turn pale  hear me.
As the princess must not know from whose hand it comes, it is but fair I
should know where it is to be placed.'
`How does your highness mean?'
`Place this flower, when the princess sleeps, in her bosom, for my sake.
She will, I fear, never let the unhappy donor rest there. I desire, at least,
that his little gift should lie there. It, perchance, will have the charm to
convert her hate into love.'
The prince spoke with real or well assumed feeling, and Tzitzis' tender
heart was moved.
`I will obey your highness,' she said, with warmth. `How long shall I let
it remain?'
`Ten minutes will do,' said the Tlascalan.
`It shall be done, prince,' she said, hesitatingly.
`Then thou hast not only my forgiveness, but my favor. But beware
thou take it not from the vase till she sleeps. Dost thou well heed me?'
`I do, your highness.'
`Then take the flower, and hie thee to my cruel mistress.'
`What is it called?' asked the maiden of-the prince, as the Tlascalan
replaced
it carefully in the small alabaster vase, and placed both in her hand.
`It hath no name,' answered the prince, hastily.
`It is called Curiosity,' answered the slave, with ridicule.
The Peruvian made no reply, save by an indignant flash from her dark
eyes, and received the vase with the beautiful and fatal gift.
`See thou stay not on thy way, nor take it from the vase till the princess
hath slept. Then lay it upon her bosom.'
`I promise to do so, your highness,' she said, hastening from the
apartment
.
The prince attended her to the farther door of the anteroom,
repeating
his command; and after she departed, followed her with his eyes as she
hastened along the corridor, until she was no longer visible.
`If that fail, there is the dagger, at last,' he said, returning to his room,
not so much addressing the Tlascalan, as giving audible utterance of his
thoughts to himself. `I think the Peruvian will do it. Gueicha!'
`Your highness.'
`I will not assassinate the emperor.'
`No?' cried the Tlascalan, with surprise.
`If the princess die, I take the throne as the next heir. My uncle stands
not in my way to it.'
`If he suspect you of her death, he will gather the strength of the empire
about him, even if his cycle be ended, and destroy you.'
`The secret is with me, and thee, and yonder Peruvian.
She
I leave to
you. Let her not live to return from the princess' chamber. Thou must
go, after midnight, and stand watch in some lurking-place near by, to wait
the event. See to it. But, my uncle! I do not like his blood on my head.'
`Thou wilt not have a head three days longer, prince, if thou hesitate,'
said the Tlascalan, boldly.
The prince stood reflecting a moment, and then said, in a decided voice,
`Be it so.'
`How canst thou, then, take possession of the throne?'
`The instant he is dead I will fill the palace with my own life-guard, and
proclaim myself emperor. Men may talk, but all their talk will never bring
the princess or the emperor back to life. I shall then be their monarch, and
they must yield obedience.'
The prince remained some time indulging the reflections this bold
expression
of his purpose gave rise to. At length a new subject suddenly entered
his mind, and he turned to his slave, and said quickly,
`This beauteous maiden of the net-maker's street. I have leisure for love
till the princess' fate be known; the emperor I shall leave till then.'
`I did say I would seize and convey her hither.'
`Stay. I need thee to wait and keep watch on the princess' apartments.
I will e'en have the winning of this lovely virgin in person. Let my secret
chambers be ready to receive a guest.'
`And the lover?'
`He is beneath my regard, Tlascalan. I leave him to thee, inasmuch as
I think you hold him some ill-favor.'
With these words the prince threw a mantle, woven of green feathers,
over the rich undress he wore; put on a low, drooping cap, adorned with the
plumes of the royal eagle, and placing a short sword beneath his arm,
opened a side door hitherto covered by a large shield, and quitted the
apartment
.
CHAPTER XV.
THE PRINCE AND FATZIZA.
On
his way from his apartments through the palace, the prince glided
within the shadows of the corridor with his cloak partly drawn over his
features, as if to elude the observation of any one whom he might meet.
His step was light and quick, and his whole air determined. He carefully
avoided the rotunda, where the courtiers were in waiting before the door to
the emperor's chambers, and by a circuitous route approached the stairs of
the battlements, where Elec was on guard. As he came near him he saw
that a group of soldiers, not far from his post, seemed to be in close and
earnest conversation with the mascal of the palace. They instantly
separated
,
on seeing a stranger advancing, and Casipeti, the waterman, having
effected his purpose in smothering in its birth the treachery of the soldiers,
would have hurriedly passed him, when he caught him by the arm.
`Ha! what dost thou here? Art thou the true mascal Casipeti, or an
impostor? Methinks thy step is quicker, and thy bearing more decided than
an hour ago.'
`I pray thee, my lord prince,' cried Casipeti, who immediately recognized
the voice, and falling on his knees, as he felt sure his counterpart would have
done, `be not angry with me.'
`Why art thou here with the soldiery?'
`Huitzil, the sergeant, is to marry Ana, my youngest daughter, and I was
but settling the matter with him.'
`I do believe thou liest, and that thou art he, at last, to whom I gave my
signet. But I will see to this to-morrow, and if thou hast been trifling with
me, thou wilt rue it. Go into thy own apartment, and there remain the
night. On thy life, tell no man thou hast seen me abroad.'
The waterman rose from his knees, and passed on a few steps, and then
turning round, with a light laugh, cast something at the prince's feet, and
fled. The prince sought for it a moment, and when he had picked it up,
saw at a glance, by the light of the moon, that it was his own signet, which
he had given, in the square, to the man in the guise of a waterman. With
an exclamation of surprise and indignation, he grasped his sword, and turned
in pursuit of the individual whom he was now convinced was not the
mascal
.
But the waterman was already out of sight in the winding galleries of
the palace; and recollecting, at the instant, his own desire to remain
unknown
,
he replaced his sword beneath his arm, and, love and intrigue being
paramount to curiosity and revenge, he kept on his way towards the stairs
of the battlement leading into the court below.
`Stand!' challenged the sentinel, as he came up to him.
`An officer of the palace,' replied the prince.
`The countersign!' demanded the young man, resolutely, presenting at
the same time his pike at the stranger's breast.
`The emperor.'
`Pass,' said young Elec, who showed himself to be a bolder soldier than
wooer.
`Sentry?' asked the prince, in a low tone, `has the mascal of the palace
been forth to-night?'
`He has, my lord,' answered the young man, supposing himself to be
addressing
one of the nobles.
`Are you sure it was he who just left here?'
`Yes, my lord.'
`How is it, that such as he has the countersign?'
`He gave no countersign, but showed me the prince's signet, saying
he was on duty for his highness,' answered Elec, who had known nothing of
the conspiracy divulged to his comrades.
`'T is as I believed,' said the prince, thoughtfully, to himself. `There is
some treachery meditated, of which I am the intended victim. Soldier!'
he said, sternly, and disclosing his features, `I am Prince Palipan. This
man is a traitor, disguised. Arrest him, if he attempt to repass your post.
If he escape from the palace, your head shall answer for it. And, hark you!
Keep secret, that you have seen me to-night.'
With this warning and menace, the prince hastily descended the winding
steps of the tower, and gained the court below. It was bordered by
lemon-trees
,
which, with their thick branches, formed so dark a walk around its
sides, that, although the moon poured a flood of unclouded light upon the
court and its glittering fountains, one walking beneath them could not be
seen. His object being secrecy, he turned to one side on reaching the area,
and glided along beneath the trees with the stealthy step of an assassin. The
path wound round an angle of the wing occupied by the princess, and as he
came beneath her lattice he paused an instant, and, though it was thirty feet
above his head, looked up, as if he could learn by the eye something of the
result of his design through the mission of Tzitzis. A faint ray of light
streamed through the casement, but all was still as the death his soul wished
would soon reign there.
`At length, he was passing on with the same light step as before, when,
within a few feet of him, on the opposite side of the buttress, he heard the
low, thrumming of a
zitzil
, one of the sweetest stringed instruments known
to the Aztee nobles, and the instant afterwards the deep, rich voice of a man
singing a song of love. It was addressed to the princess, and every tone
was full of the devotion and tender passion of the singer.
SONG OF LORD CUIRI TO EYLLA.
I dreamed, in morning's slumbers,
That in the heavens afar,
Glowing with beauty, bright and clear,
There was a queenly star,
That from its vaulted canopy
Looked kindly smiling down on me.
That virgin star! to view it
My frame and spirit fired
With passion's maddening extasy,
And all my soul aspired
To gain that gem on Night's calm brow,
When, lo! it changed, and it was
Thou!
The bosom of the prince burned with mingled jealousy and rage. The
voice, he thought, was not unknown to him; and, drawing his sword from
his cloak, he turned back, and noiselessly approached the spot. Beneath a
tall, graceful atl tree, the feathery top of which shaded her casement, stood
a youth, with his face uplifted to the window as he sang, the moonlight
streaming between the branches full upon it. It was the young Lord Cuiri.
The prince gazed on him for an instant, with the fiercest passions kindling in
his breast. At length, maddened by the words he sung, he leaped from his
covert, and, with his sword levelled at the noble youth's heart, ran against
him. The weapon met a coat of mail, and shivered in his grasp. The
noble staggered back a few paces, then recovered himself, drew his sword,
and looked around for his antagonist. But he was gone.
The prince, seeing that his attempt on the life of his rival had failed, had
instantly retired within the impenetrable shade of the lemon-walk, and hasted
on his way towards the water-side with flying speed. He did not desire, by
open contact, unarmed too, as he now was, to expose himself to his rival at
such a time, inwardly resolving on the morrow to take his revenge in his
own hands.
`It is for this noble, then, that the false princess has slighted my love,'
were his thoughts. `It is for one beneath her rank she rejects one of her
own blood. That she loves him, and has given him encouragement, is
plain, or he would never have had the boldness to do what he hath done this
night. Pray the gods she live till I cast this into her teeth. My Lord Cuiri,
you and I have somewhat to do with each other on the morrow,' he added, with
the bitter irony of tone in which he was accustomed to express the darker
passions
of his soul. As he came to the side of the bright water, its shores of
palaces and temples casting vast shadows into the flood, its silvery bosom
covered with a thousand still barges, save here and there a solitary one
moving
up or down the stream, he paused an instant, to see if he were observed,
and then approached a small boat, shaped like a swan, in which, hitherto
unobserved, reclined four men.
`It is he,' cried one, rising up in the stern. Instantly two others were
at their oars, and a fourth sprung on shore, to receive the prince. This one,
14
who was a stout, heavily-framed man, was habited in steel, like a soldier, as
also was he who stood up in the stern. The other two were in the common
blue and crimson-colored coarse garb of boatmen.
`We did begin to think you had missed us, your highness,' said the man,
with equal respect and boldness.
`I have been detained, good Mictlan. Push off at once.'
The prince sprung into the boat, and in a few seconds, was moving swiftly
across the water, towards the quarter of the net-maker's street.
Fatziza, the lovely bondmaiden, whose beauty, and indifference to his
love, had inflamed the breast of the licentious prince, was alone in her
brother's chamber. He had called in a moment, after his return from the
palace, to bid her remain within, nor whatever commotion she might hear in
the streets, to venture forth or to look abroad. He had just now parted
from her, and left her in tears. The two dearest objects of her heart's
affections
,
her brother and her lover, she knew, however they might attempt to
disguise it from her, were in the greatest danger.
`He hath told me,' she said, `that the revolt will not take place  that
the princess will grant all we desire, on her accession to the throne. Indeed,
the sweet princess would do every thing for the happiness of her subjects
but Montezuma hath told me this to calm my fears. Alas, alas, why hath
heaven so ordered it, that our hearts' dearest affections ever become the
instruments
of our greatest and bitterest sorrow! Deep love is but the arrow
of deep grief, when the object of our love is endangered! My poor
brother
!
my beloved Sismarqui! May the gods protect you both!'
She leaned her head upon her hand, and gazed sorrowfully upon the
water. A boat gradually emerged from the shadowy line of the opposite
shore, and approached towards the foot of the street. It filled her eye, and
grew larger and more distinctly upon her vision; yet she saw it not. Men
were in it, and their number and forms became visible, yet the object made
no impression upon her brain. Her eyes were on vacancy, and her thoughts
were sad, and with those she loved.
At length the boat darted from her unobserving gaze, into a recess of the
shore, shaded by trees overhanging from a garden wall, and disappeared in
the black shadows that obscured it. A single individual landed from the
boat, and came into the street, near the house. It was the prince. He
cautiously
surveyed the dwelling, and approached the balcony, where he had
seen the maiden seated in the afternoon. The moon shone down coldly and
brightly aslant into it. It was silent and deserted. The street itself was
quiet; but occasionally he would start at distant sounds within the town, that
caused him to pause and listen. But as all was still about him, he continued
his observation of the house. He placed his hand upon the low door
beneath
the balcony; but it was fast and resisted his strength.
`There is precaution here. I must scale the balcony! Ha! what sounds
as of the roaring of the sea are there, in the distance! They have subsided.
Perhaps it is the wind, mourning among the trees. There it is again!
There is no wind! It sounds like the suppressed voices of a multitude!'
He listened attentively, with his face towards the quarter whence the deep
sounds came, and in a few seconds all was silent again. As he was about to
place his hand upon the light column of the balcony, his man-at-arms,
Mictlan
,
came hastily from the boat.
`Your highness,' he said, in a low voice of surprise and alarm, as he
reached the prince, `do you not hear strange sounds?'
`I did just now, but they are hushed,' answered the prince, again
listening
.
`I fear some tumult among the people.'
`They will have only each other's threats to cut,' said the prince,
laughing
.
`There are no troops there to employ them. Yet,' he added, more
seriously; `from what I have seen and heard this day, I should not be
surprised
if there were some attempt of the serfs to attack the garrisons. I
hear it no longer. Be within call, and be ready to receive my charge, and
push off at an instant's warning. There is something in those sounds more
than I dare believe; nevertheless, I must not be driven from my purpose.'
He spoke in the prompt manner of one who suspects, but is indifferent to
danger, and the soldier lounged slowly towards his boat, but keeping within
sight. The prince then, taking another survey of the silent abode, assisted
by the column, lightly ascended the balcony.
`I am within the works. Now to find my fair foe!'
He instantly dropped its curtain around it, to conceal himself from
observation
,
and placed his hand upon the narrow door that led from it into the
maiden's chamber. He gently pressed against it, but it resisted his steady
strength.
`I would not break it in, lest I alarm where I wish to soothe,' he said,
looking about for some other means to effect his object.
As he did so, he saw that the balcony communicated by a narrow terrace,
with the water-side of the humble dwelling. He stepped lightly along it,
and was passing around the angle of the building, when he suddenly
arrested
himself with a suppressed exclamation of delighted surprise. In the
open casement of the room on that side, he beheld a round, white arm,
shining in the moonlight, like turned ivory, supporting the cheek of the
maiden. Her face was turned partly from him, presenting the outline of
her profile, in all the softness of its exquisite finish. Her face was pensive,
her eyes downcast, and he thought he could detect a tear, glittering on her
check. He gazed with pleasure at the anticipation of success in his passion,
but his heart was not untouched by her tender and gentle sorrow. He felt
that she was far more lovely than he had imagined her to be, and that in the
possession of her, he should be well repaid for any sacrifice. Twice he
moved to approach her, but there was a holiness in her tearful beauty  a
sacredness in her sorrow, that he dared not profane. His feelings, as he
irresistibly
lingered and gazed upon her, became still more and more
interested
,
and love, or something tenderer and purer than the voluptuary's passion,
that heretofore alone reigned in his bosom, was awakened in it. He
continued
to observe her for a few moments, and then drew back, as if intending
to pursue a course in relation to her, different from that which he had at first
contemplated. Casting his cloak upon the railing, and appearing in the rich
and graceful dress he had worn in his own rooms, he placed his hat beneath
his arm, and leaning forward to observe her, commenced, unseen by her, a
song of the most touching tenderness. The air most sweetly harmonized
with her feelings, and the words seemed spoken from the heart.
SERANADE.
The sweet-voiced
huonla
*
*
A bird that watches for the dawn,
and then flies and sings unceasingly till noon.
watches
The long and weary night,
In sad and silent solitude,
Till breaks the morning's light;
Then with untiring pinions,
Till noontide, borne along,
He pours upon the enraptured air
The gushing flood of song !
Thus, like the huonla watching,
My heart has waited long
To pour its love upon thine ear
In the sweet breath of song!
I watch, love, for the breaking
Of morn from those bright eyes
Then o'er my weary, lonely watch,
Day of my hope, arise!
The maiden slowly raised her heavy eyelids, and seemed, at first, to
listen
as if the sounds were a part of her waking dream. But by degrees she
became
conscious of the reality, and started with pleased
alarm--for there
was too much tenderness in the tones--too much gentleness in the
words
that fell so sweetly upon her enraptured ear, for real terror to be
associated
with them. She nevertheless trembled with the surprise; the quick
color
came to her cheek; while, with startled eyes, she looked in the
direction of
the sounds. She thus stood, half-flying, half-lingering, like a startled
fawn,
until the singer had ended, when the charm which had bound her was
broken,
and she turned to fly from the lattice. As she did so, the prince, who
had
observed these effects, appeared and cast himself-at her feet.
Sweetest maid, I implore you, fly not from the presence of one
who
adores you.'
He caught her hand as he spoke, and gazed up into her face with
such
passionate, yet persuasive eloquence, that although terrified beyond
measure,
she hesitated an instant, and suffered her eyes to rest upon his fine
face
upturned
to her, in the full moonlight. It wore the expression that
few
maidens could resist, seconded as it was by the voice that the moment
before
had acted as a spell upon her senses. She struggled nevertheless, to
release
her hand, and cried, alarmed,
Pray, sir, release me.'
Loveliest Fatziza, do not be thus cruel! Do not break a devoted
heart!'
I may not hold discourse with thee, sir,' she said, resolutely. I The
hour
is late, and I am far beneath thy degree.'
'Beauty ennobles woman! Do not fly, I beseech thee,' cried the
prince,
with a deference and warmth of feeling that surprised himself. I But if
thou
wilt go, cruel virgin, thou hast thy liberty.'
As he spoke, he released her hand, and bent his head despondingly
upon
his breast. She retreated a step or two, and then looked upon him with
a
glance of mingled surprise and pain. His manner awakened a feeling in
her
woman's heart that was most favorable to him. Few maidens can
behold
unmoved, a young and handsome man bowed at her feet with the weight
of
unrequited love. She regarded him with painful interest. Her
impulse
was to fly; but his lowly attitude, his deep depression of manner, restrained
her, though no longer detained by him. His releasing her operated also in
his favor. She stopped, and from that instant the prince felt that his power
over her was secured. He had at first determined to bear her off rudely to
the palace; but the attitude in which he had beheld her first touched his
heart, and changed his determination. He felt an interest in her that caused
him at once to reject any thing like violence. This interest, as it ever does,
made the object of it now sacred; he therefore resolved to try the power
of gentleness, and to operate alone upon her heart, feeling, that if he could
for an instant win her sympathy, he might awaken in her bosom an interest
for him that would be most favorable to his views.
`If I can but make her
feel
,' he said within himself, reasoning like all
successful wooers, `I shall afterwards find it easy to make her love me.
Methinks
her pure
love
were as well worth the seeking now that I have seen
her again, as that of my proud cousin. But I shall have time to woo her
only in my own halls. Once make the impression, and she will forgive me
after. But take her away ere she feels awakened any interest in me, and
I can never hope afterwards for aught but indignation and hatred.'
Such were his thoughts as he kneeled before her, with his head fallen
upon his breast, like a suppliant for life awaiting the answer of his judge.
She was evidently struggling between fear and feeling. At length the
former prevailed, and she moved further from him, as if to quit the room.
He lifted his head, and extended his hands silently and earnestly towards
her. Her retreat was arrested by the silent appeal, and she came back a
step. That step, the prince imagined, fixed the seal to the consummation of
his fondest hopes.
`Noble sir,' she said, with dignity, `it is difficult for a youthful maiden,
like myself, to witness, unmoved, the deep admiration of a noble youth. But
I may not listen to you or remain with you. If I were free in heart and
hand, the difference in our stations would make it crime in me to listen to
you. As it is, I am a betrothed bride; and therefore it makes me doubly
guilty.'
`Nay, leave me not, fairest virgin,' he cried, impassionedly, rising to his
feet, and taking her hand, ere she was aware or could prevent it; `leave me
not. I swear to you no man hath deeper or more devoted love for you than
I have. You shall be my bride  my wedded wife.'
`Talk not thus, my lord; you know it cannot be,' she said, firmly.
`It shall be,' he said, imperatively.
She started at the stern tones of his voice, and became suddenly pale. The
hand he held trembled like a frighted bird imprisoned in his grasp, and she
seemed to be overcome by some sudden and fearful recollection. She nearly
sunk to the floor, but by great exertion of mind sustained herself.
`What means this, trembler?' he asked, in a tone of tenderness as much
unlike his late harsh ones, as his voice had been from the first moment she
heard it on the balcony.
`My lord, my lord, I have been deceived,' she said, faintly. `Alas! why
did I not suspect thee?'
`So you have discerned in me, pretty one, notwithstanding all my caution,
the masked cavalier of this afternoon?' he said, playfully.
`My lord, you have come hither to render me miserable,' she cried. `I
knew not your face. I recognized not, till now, your voice, or I should not
have lingered.'
He smiled at the artless energy of her avowal, and said,
`So, if I had been another knight than what I prove to be, you would
have received me with becoming grace. Now then, sweet, I am no
longer
the bold cavalier of thy abhorrence, but the knight thou hast been so
gracious
to. By my honor! you are dearer to me than ever was lady to
knight
on earth. If you will forgive my rudeness to-day, and receive my
homage,
I swear I will love you with my whole heart. A false maiden, whom I
offered it to, this day cast it away, and I have it in my hand, ready to
give
to her who is fairer than she.'
`Nay, my lord. It is no credit to a maiden to receive the homage of
a
heart already broken,' she said, with spirit, yet with slight
playfulness. 'But,
my lord, were your heart whole, it can never be of value in my eye. I
thank
you for your attentions, and shall ever remember you with
gratitude.'
He looked sharply at her face, to see if she were not speaking with
irony,
which he suspected, and not being able, from the faint light, to detect
its
nicer shades of expression, said, somewhat seriously,
`You are prudish, and, for a serf's daughter, treat a knight's love
full
lightly. Now, by mine honor, fair virgin, when I beheld thee this day
in
thy balcony, I felt for thee the deepest admiration on account of thy
charms.
I discoursed with thee, and found thy mind equalled thy person. I left
thee,
'tis true, something rudely, but a noble's hiss would not have hurt thee
but
for the boor, who afterward chose to resent it. Nay - nay ; be not
angry,
nor try to get away. I am but telling thee the progress of my love.
I
thought of thee continuully after; and when, some four hours since, my
own
lady-love discarded me, I swore I would give to thee the love she
scorned.
I came hither and saw thee in thy window weeping. My heart was
touched;
and what before was light passion, the sight of thee softened and
hallowed
into love. I now, therefore, notwithstanding thy coldness and scorn,
offer
thee my heart.'
`I Noble sir,' said Fatzizas who had listened to his relation with
impatience;
but not without interest, I I do believe it to be as you say. Your
manner
and voice seem to be the expression of truth. But I cannot listen to
you.
My heart is another's.'
`And,' he exclaimed, quickly and angrily, I that other is--'
`My equal, my lord,' she replied, firmly.
`Maiden, he is a serf,' and such will always remain. Thou art noble
already, by thy beauty, and will degrade thyself with such an alliance.
Think
no more of him. He offers thee a hovel, and a drudging life of
degradation
and toil; I offer thee a palace, and wealth, and a life of luxurious,
indolence.
All the return I ask, is your love.'
`My lord,' she said, touched by his earnestness, I have no heart to
give.'
The next instant she added, with resentful irony, r it is in the hovel,
with
Sismarqui.'
`There, then, shall your person never be, without which, little were
worth
your heart!' cried the prince, stung at the tone she assumed, and
feeling,
that now that he was identified with the masked cavalier, there was
little
hope of impressing her with the tender sentiments he at first sought
to
inspire.
As he spoke, he seized her, and bore her to the balcony. The man-
at-arms
,
who was within hearing, immediately appeared at his call, and
received
her from him. The suddenness of the act dad deprived her of speech,
and
she was in the arms of the soldier before she realized her situation.
Instantly
she filled the air with a loud shriek, and cried aloud,
`Oh Montezuma! Sismarqui! help!'
The prince cast her scarf over her face, and, leaping to the ground, bade
him bear her to the boat. The men were at their oars, and, as soon as she
was placed in it, the boat shot from the land towards the opposite shore with
velocity. The maiden had fainted before reaching the boat, and they crossed
the water in silence, the prince folding her in his arms, and gazing upon her
marble brow with mingled pity and pleasure.
`Mictlan,' he said to his man-at-arms, `take a little water in thy hand and
pour it on her temples. She may die.'
`Never fear, your highness,' said the man, bluntly; `I have seen 'um lay
that way for hours. It's as nat'ral as sleep for 'um. Besides, if she come
to, she'll give another alarm with her sweet voice.'
`It is very true. Row on, and reach the steps as soon as possible,' said
the anxious prince, fanning her with his bonnet.
`Did you not hear a low, deep shout just now, as we were putting her in
the boat?' said Mictlan. `It seemed as if a thousand men were growling at
once.'
`I did hear it. There it is again. There is something in progress in the
quarter of the armorers, from which direction it seems to come.'
`Do you see the diamond stone on the peak of Ix, your highness?' said
the man, pointing over the city to the west, where the dark line of
mountains
that walled in the vale of Alcolo was distinctly visible.
`I do,' answered the prince, without lifting his gaze from the sweet, pale
face that fascinated it.
`It burns red and bloody to-night. I noticed it an hour ago. It is a
sign of wars. I should not be surprised if something were to happen soon.'
The prince looked up, at these words, and glanced his eye towards the
peak of Ix. The blazing stone that reflected the moonlight did indeed seem
to shine with a sanguinary hue, its color resembling that of a pale ruby.
`It is as you say,' he said, after watching it an instant, and then returning
to survey the features of the maiden.
`It bodes something, your highness,' said the man, gloomily.
`Thou art superstitious, Mictlan. See, we approach the land. Guide the
boat within yonder shadow,  then take up this lovely burden, and follow
me.' The boat was soon at the palace steps, and the prince, taking his way
by a different route from that by which he came forth, skirted the battlements
by a narrow terrace, until he came quite to the rear of the palace, on a close
street composed of courtier's lodges and pavilions, each adorned by marble
porticos, and encircled by gardens of fruit and flowers. At the termination
of the terrace was a small gate, that led into a court surrounded by a high
wall. This gate he opened with a private key, and crossing the court, came
to a door on the opposite side in the wall. This he unlocked also; but
instead
of leading through the wall, it opened upon a narrow staircase, that
wound within it. Carefully closing it behind the man-at-arms, he led him
to the top, where a second and more spacious door admitted them into a
private gallery. This they traversed, when the prince stopped before a
panel at the extremity, and pressed his hand against it. It rolled slowly
aside into the wall, and exposed the interior of an elegant apartment, softly
lighted by invisible lamps, which shed throughout the room a delightful
fragrance
.
The prince pointed to an ottoman, upon which the man-at arms
laid his lovely burden, and then retired by another door, with which he
seemed familiar.
Fatziza was no longer insensible, yet for the purpose of planning
escape,
she still feigned to be so. The fanning, of the prince had restored her
to
consciousness, and from that, moment she was. collected, and conscious
of all
that passed around her. She soon ascertained ,lie was carried towards
the
palace of the emperor; and, though greatly alarmed, closely observed
the
doors and passages through which she was boric. When the man-at-arms
left the apartment, the prince came and knelt beside her, and for an
instant
gazed upon her with such pity and tenderness, that she could not but
be
satisfied that he loved her, and felt, that if she escaped in safety she
could
forgive him. He took her hand in his, and after pressing it between them
a
moment, as if to communicate the warmth of his heart to it, pressed it
to his
lips, and sighed.
`Ah, sweet maiden! did she know how true a heart loves her, she
would
not treat me thus cruelly. I would have had it otherwise than it
is,--borne
her hither by her own will, rather than by force, as she has compelled
me to
do. I must seek her forgiveness, and woo her where no favored rival
shall
come between. 'Tis wonderful, my passing passion for a net-maker's
daughter should have turned to love. But 't is said a, wounded heart
is
tender, and by mine honor! the princess bath made mine full sore
to-night.
I must, I see, get this sweet virgin to bind it to her bosom, and make
it
whole. I would she loved not another. How her hand beats! 'T is time
she were restored. I will bathe her forehead with ice.'
`My lord prince,' she cried, rising, and casting herself, to his
surprise, at
his feet, ` I have heard your words, and do believe you love me. Oh,
release
me then, by your regard for me.'
`How know you me to be the prince?'
`By your allusion to the princess. I feel now that my fate depends
wholly
on your generosity. As a noble, your deep love, had my heart been
disen
gaged, might have been honorable. As the prince, I can be regarded
by
you only with crime. My lord--my gracious prince! I appeal to your
honor. Save me!'
She dropped her head upon his hand, which she had seized, and wept
till
it was bathed with her tears. He was affected by her sorrow, and
said
gently, believing at the moment that he felt what he said,
`Lovely Fatziza, be not alarmed. If I cannot win your love, I will
restore
you to your home.'
`Nay--nay--detain me not, prince. You can never win what I have
not to lose. Permit me to return this night. One hour beneath thy
roof,
and my heart and love were worthless.'
`You are safe here, sweet maid. Content yourself to remain until
certain
events I look for on the morrow, transpire. Till then this and the
adjoining
room are sacred to you. No one besides myself holds access to them.
I
have an inducement to offer you by-and-by, which I think will tempt
you,'
he said, with a smile.
`No--no; nothing but freedom. Prince, I implore you! Your hopes
are in vain. Save me!'
He had disappeared. She flew into the adjoining room--it was empty.
She sought around the gorgeous chambers, cast aside the silver arms,
and
lifted every hanging that could conceal a door, but in vain. In silent
despair
she cast herself upon the ottoman, and wept.
CHAPTER XVI
THE TEST.
The
Peruvian, on quitting the apartments of the prince, with the otol flower,
flew swiftly towards the chamber of her mistress, from whom she had been
so long absent. She liked not the manner of the prince, nor the tone of his
voice, when he presented her with the gift to bear to the princess; and,
though unsuspicious of danger lurking in the flower itself, she could not
banish the suspicion that he meditated evil towards her mistress in taking
so much pains to obtain a reconciliation with her. Nevertheless, she
resolved
to fulfil her promise, and afterwards warn her to be on her guard
against future favors or advances from him.
`If he were my cousin and lover,' she said to herself, `I should be afraid
to take any thing from him. I would n't show him the least favor. I should
do more than the gentle princess has done; I should tell him roundly I did
not like him, nor would I like him. She has said something sharp to
him to-night, he says. It must have been very sharp to have caused a
quarrel on both sides. All I hope is, it may never be made up, nor shall it
be, if I can help it.'
Thus far ran the little maiden's thoughts, when she reached the inner
door of the princess' room. She tapped softly, and was admitted. The
princess was reclining on her couch, with a silver scroll in her hand, on
which golden characters were delicately traced.
`Where have you loitered, girl?' she asked quickly, as she entered.
`'T is half an hour since you left me. Saw you him safely forth the palace
by the private postern?'
`I did, my noble mistress,' answered the slave, with a low obeisance.
The princess paused and glanced again upon her scroll, which she had been
reading; for there was something in the Peruvian maid's look at the
earnestness
with which she inquired after the young man, that confused her; and
the conscious blush heightened her loveliness. She felt her confusion, and
throwing aside the scroll, asked suddenly,
`What do you hold in your hand?'
`A flower, sweet princess.'
`Bring it hither.'
The slave knelt with it at her feet.
`It is a rare flower, indeed. How wondrously beautiful the shape! What
fragrance! How delicate its petals! and within is an exquisitely formed cup,
of green and golden dyes. T' is a fair flower, indeed.'
`Touch it not, my princess,' said Tzitzis, quickly, as Eylla laid a finger
gently upon the snowy petals.
`Why not, maiden?' she demanded, withdrawing her hand, and fixing
upon her a look of surprise and inquiry.
`I believe it has some virtue,' answered the Peruvian, hesitating, `that
makes maidens love those they hate,' for in some such warning alone
could she but faintly express her fears of mischief.
`Then the gods forfend! I will naught with it,' exclaimed the princess,
starting back with a laugh half earnest  half credulous. `How came you in
the possession of so dangerous a plant? and why did you bring it hither?'
Nay, my sweet mistress, be not angry with me. As I was coming
hither, she continued, archly, `a noble cavalier, who had somewhat suffered
beneath your frown, gave it me, and bade me-'
`Who was this cavalier? what did he bid thee ?' interrogated the princess.
`Out with it'
`It was the prince,' she at length answered, firmly, as if feeling that she
owed her duty to her mistress, rather than to him.
`The prince? How dare he!' cried the princess Eylla, with surprise and
indignation. `Hath this flower truly the charm you name?'
`He said it had, I think.'
`Can he be guilty of this! What said he? word for word?' demanded
she, sternly.
`That he had been so unfortunate as to incur your displeasure, and desired
me to place this flower upon your bosom while you slept, that it might
inspire
you with love for him.'
`And
you
brought it hither to obey?'
`No, my noble lady,' cried Tzitzis, trembling; `I could not but promise,
for fear of him. But I was sure I should tell you ere I could do it,' she
added, with honest simplicity.
`I do believe there is no charm in the flower,' said the princess, turning
from lien and surveying it attentively. 'He hath sent it to conciliate me,
and the lose he seeks to inspire is to grow out of my gratitude for the
gift.
The charm he speaks of is only figurative. But the prince need not hope.
He hath heard my last word. 'Tis a sweet flower. Were it not so late,
thou shouldst bear it back to him. In the morning it shall be returned with
the answer, that his flower hath lost its spell. Place it on the window.
Hath it a name?'
`The Tlascalan told me, saucily, when I asked him, it was called
Curiosity
.'
`The Tlascalan ! was he with the prince when it was given thee ?'
`He was. When was ever the prince without him?'
`Nothing that the prince ever does in concert with that evil wretch, that
bath not evil at the bottom. Name the words again.'
`He said to me, 't is a gift of reconciliation; and when I told him your
highness would scarce accept it, if you knew whence it came, he said then,
tell her what tale of it thou wilt, when she awakes ; but as she sleeps,
place
it upon her bosom, where I fear she will never let the unhappy donor
rest.'
`Said he so?'
`And further thus: I desire, at least, that my little gift should lie
there.'
`Said the prince this?'
`He did, your highness, saying, that if you were not to know from whom
it came till you awaked, he ought to have the happiness of knowing where it
reposed while you were sleeping.'
`Mark me, maiden,' said the princess, impressively, after a few moments'
reflection. `The prince, it seems, designed not to send the flower for a
token
of reconciliation from the first, since he gave it up so readily. So I got
the
flower, I think it were, he cared not how I got it. Was it not so?'
`Such seemed his manner in pressing it upon me,' answered Tzitzis, with
animation.
`Bring me the vase again,' said the princess, resolutely. `I do suspect
my evil cousin hath some deeper purpose in this, than appears to the eye.'
`What do you suspect, my noble princess?' asked the maiden, with alarm,
on witnessing the glowing cheek of her mistress.
`I cannot tell  I dare not think. I may be wrong, and judge him. Place
the vase here. The fragrance is too sweet and the flower too fresh to
contain
poison,' she said, examining without touching it.
`Poison?' repeated the Peruvian, with terror.
`Did he hold it himself in his hands?' she asked of the maiden.
`A long time.'
`Did he inhale the fragrance?'
`He did, and so did the Tlascalan.'
`Then I fear I have been uncharitable to my cousin. Send thy
companion
,
Telitza, hither.'
Tzitzis left the apartment, and the princess once more bent over the vase
and examined the beautiful gift of the prince, with mingled admiration and
suspicion.
`I know not what all this means,' she said, aloud. `It is not courtesy;
for after our parting he would be little likely to show it me. It is not to
open the way for a reconciliation, (though a flower, as every one knows,
were ever to me a most welcome messenger,) or why should he have been
willing to let the donor's name be withheld. It hath something evil at the
bottom of it. Perhaps it possesses the power Tzitzis spoke of, to convert
indifference into love. I will at least test it. There is plainly  horrible
though! but it will not out of my mind  no poison in its fragrance or
touch, or they would not have held it. I will test its power to charm a
maiden's heart,  for such purpose alone can he have sent it to me. Shame
on the Prince Palipan! to seek by spells to win a true woman's love. I will
prove its power at once  and, if it be proven  the whole empire shall ring
with the baseness of this dishonorable prince. Not a maiden in all the land,
but would cry shame on such a man; not a knight or serf but would deride
such a princely wooer. Here comes my pretty Telitza. She hath been
suddenly waked from deep sleep, and her large, lustrous eyes, look wild with
the surprise and light.'
As she spoke, Tzitzis entered with a young Peruvian girl, who had
scarcely
reached her seventeenth summer, with a brown, beautiful face, and long
and shining raven hair. Her figure was full and exquisitely rounded, and
in its motions soft and pliant as those of the gracefully moving
tapir
of her
own forests. Her large black eyes wore a startled look, like an alarmed
deer's, while every other instant the heavy lids, on which sleep sat heavily,
would droop over them till the curved fringe would rest on her cheek. She
was of less stature than Tzitzis, and her beauty was far less
spirituelle
. The
princess smiled to see her struggling between sleep and wakefulness, and
said, kindly,
`Come hither, Telitza. I would show you a rare flower.'
The maiden's languor suddenly left her at the sound of her mistress' voice,
and going forward, she kneeled beside the vase, and gazed upon the otol
with an expression of admiration.
`Telitza,' said the princess, carelessly, `methinks you and the handsome
page of my lord Cuiri are of late somewhat estranged. Hath there been a
quarrel?'
`I never loved him enough to quarrel with him, my princess,' said the
slave, blushing.
`Then my cousin and I should have well loved,' she said, aside. `But,
pry thee, what hath caused the distance between you for some
weeks?
There was a time when, each morning, your dark hair was dressed with
flowers of his own presenting.
'He gave flowers to Tzitzis also,' answered the maiden, with
simplicity.
'A good cause for quarrel. You loved him, or you would not have
cared to how many maidens besides he gave his gifts. I would have
thee
make up with him.'
'Indeed, my noble princess,' cried the maiden, casting herself at her
feet,
and seizing and kissing her hand; 'I do not love him. I
cannot
love
Izcalli.'
'He loves you, Telitza. ''T is but three days since he came to me
with
a sad countenance, and implored me to intercede for him with thee.'
'I cannot love him,' said she, earnestly.
'Dost thou love any one else?'
'No. I never loved any one but--' Here she stopped, and hung her
head, blushingly.
'But Izcalli, you were about to say,' said the princess, smiling.
The maiden covered her burning cheek with the veil of her flowing
hair,
and was silent.
'Well, child; thou shalt not love him, nor be asked to love him, if
tomorrow
thou remainest in the same mind.'
'Thanks, thanks, kind mistress,' she cried, gratefully.
'Yet, thou art so near loving him,' continued the princess,
playfully, 'it
were a charity to reconcile thee. But thou shalt hear no more of this
from
me. Go to sleep again, for thine eyes are already beginning to grow
heavy.
Nay--go not back to thy pallet, but lay upon this mat of floss beside
my
couch. I need thy presence here to-night.'
The maiden gladly availed herself of the permission of her mistress;
and,
sinking upon the rug, with one arm beneath her head, was soon buried
in
deep and gentle slumber.
'Now will I test the property of my cousin's gift,' said the princess
to the
Peruvian. 'If it truly possess it, methinks Izcalli, on the morrow, will
be
happier in the love of his mistress than the prince will be.'
With these words the princess took the rich flower carefully from
the
vase, and knelt over the fair sleeper, and opening her bosom, placed
it
within it.
'I know not how long it must lie there--perhaps till she wakes,'
observed
the princess.
'Ten minutes, said the prince,' replied the maiden. 'I will watch
by
her.'
'It can surely do no harm, if it produce not the effect I look for,'
said
the princess, gazing upon the sleeper with tender interest.
'Indeed, I do believe Telitza would be the happier to love Izcalli.
But
she has too much pride to be reconciled to him.'
'Hark! heard you not music?' exclaimed the princess, at this
instant.
It is the
zitzil
beneath the lattice. Go and see what it
is.'
The Peruvian flew to the lattice, and looked down for an instant, and
then
turning to the princess, said:
'I see, at the foot of the atl, a cavalier; 'but I cannot distinguish
his
face, or form.'
'Hist! there is his voice,' said the princess, approaching the
lattice.
'Can it be the prince?'
`It is not the prince's voice,' said the maiden, archly.
`You speak as if you knew it, maiden?'
`Listen, my mistress. Do you not recognize it?'
`The song is one of love. 'T is bold! I know not the voice. It may be
the  the  Montezuma,' she said, hesitatingly. `List!' she exclaimed,
quickly, as a tender strain rose to her ear. `I know the song and voice, now.
'T is my lord Cuiri.'
`I thought it strange, my princess, that you should have forgotten the
noble and youthful Lord Cuiri, who thinks more of a glance from your eye,
or of your shadow, than the haughty and cold prince does of your whole
person.'
`I am sorry for it,' said the princess, with interest. `The song hath
suddenly ceased. Ha! there is a ringing sound of steel, and now of conflict.
Look forth!' cried the princess, with alarm.
Tzitzis was already looking down upon the scene, when spoken to, and
cried, with surprise and indignation,
`I saw, my noble lady, the singer set upon by some one, who rushed from
the lemon walk, and thrust at him with his sword. The sword broke against
his mail, and the assassin has fled.'
`Hath my lord come to harm? Quick  tell me!'
`No, my lady,' answered the maiden, again looking down. `He staggered
at the blow, but hath recovered himself, and now seeks the assassin.'
`Pray heaven, they meet not. 'T is the prince.'
`I thought so, but dared not speak it.'
`It can be none else.'
`There sounds the
zitzil
again,' cried the Peruvian, with delight. `Look,
my lady! he hath returned, and taken his place at the foot of the tree, and
resumes his song. A gallant knight, and brave. I do believe my lord
Cuiri, besides being the handsomest man, the first noble, and the best knight
in the empire, hath a truer and gentler heart, for a wooer, than any man in
Mexico. Hark! my princess. How sweetly he sings, and how tenderly.'
SERENADE.
[CONTINUED.]
Thou beautiful and peerless,
It was upon thy throne,
That 'mid a world of rival queens,
Didst rule the night alone,
And with a radiance so divine,
Their every ray was quenched in thine.
I rose on fancy's pinions,
To seek thy throne afar;
But, lo! thy form was changed again,
And thou wert now a star!
Oh, that that peerless gem of light
Would cheer again my spirit's night!
`He is too bold maiden. Such words should not be addressed to a
princess' ear from any noble. My lord Cuiri is too bold.'
`And he doth think so, it seems,' said the maiden, sadly, looking from the
casement as the singer's voice ceased; `for he hath ended his song, and
disappeared
.
His heart felt your displeasure.'
'It is better his heart should feel it thus, if it doth, than that I
should be
pained to express it to him more plainly. I do grieve that this noble
lord
should seek to lose my friendship by seeking to win my love.'
'Pardon me, my sweet and noble mistress,' said Tzitzis, humbly, but
firmly;
'but the prince will never more woo thee. Thou wilt not reign a
maiden
princess. Who so worthy in all the empire as my lord of Cuiri, who hath
in
his veins thy own imperial blood?'
'Thou art a good pleader for my lord, and he should be grateful to
thee,
girl,' said the princess, with a smile; 'but thou wilt plead in vain.
Two
days since, I might have listened to thee; for my thoughts have been
much
and kindly on this youthful noble. But thou art too late by a
twelve-hour.
Thou and he, sweet Tzitzis,' she said, playfully, 'are in conspiracy
against
me, I'll he sworn. He hath attacked without, and thou within. But I
tell
thee thou art both too late.'
The Peruvian maiden looked embarrassed, and then laughed to hide
her
confusion.
'I did not betray him, my princess,' she said, falteringly, looking
timidly
up.
'No, child, only by thy too great zeal. I do grieve for the noble
lord,
for I have high regard for him. A woman can but deeply feel for a
generous
heart that hath fallen back on itself, with hopes crushed
and blighted.
Alas! I know now that he loves. I can see, what before escaped me,
that
silent, deep, and devoted love prompted all his modest and retiring
attentions,
inspired his sweet verses, accompanied his gifts of flowers, and the
thousand
and one little kindnesses I have blindly been the object of.
Alas,
alas! how must his noble heart have been wounded by my indifference.
I
received all the tender, respectful homage he paid me, as if meant for
the
princess, and not for the woman. He was too modest a lover.'
'I would he had been bolder or less modest,' said the slave.
'He would have alarmed me then. As it was, I was free and
unreserved
with him, because I feared nothing.'
'He might, perhaps, by boldness, have won your heart,' ventured
the
maiden.
'Indeed, Tzitzis,' she said, laughing; 'I would not answer for it if
he had
been. But thou hast no need to instruct him in this lesson, child. I
have
now nothing but gratitude to give him.'
'Alas! the poor youth.'
'I do feel for him. He will think me cruel. But a princess hath
not
the command of her heart more than other maidens. To-day's events
have
clearly shown me that,' she added, with a heightened color.
The Peruvian surveyed her closely, and then said, with
hesitation,
'If the lord of Cuiri ask me what thou sayest of him--
'Tell him the Princess Eylla did say he was the right hand of her
throne.'
she answered, with feeling and dignity. 'I shall hold an early
conference
with my lord touching some state affairs, in which I need his advice
and
counsel. Henceforth he must try and teach himself to look upon me as
his
princess. I do, from my soul, feel sorry his noble love should be no
better met. But he hath sense and judgment, and I doubt not will
subdue
his hopeless passion.'
At this instant her eye fell on the sleeping maiden, and recollecting
the
flower she had placed in her bosom, she approached her, saying,
'It is near the time my gallant and princely wooer set to win my love
to
him by this flower's aid. Let us see if it hath affected her aught in her
sleep. Methinks, if it touched her dreams, and made her love Izcalli in
them, she would wake.'
The princess approached, and knelt beside her as she spoke, and Tzitzis
took her place near her. For a few moments, they watched her as she
continued to sleep, with the deep and gentle respiration of an infant. The
flower still lay there, like new fallen snow, upon her open bosom.
`It hath not harmed her. She sleeps like a child, that hath played itself
weary. What is the time?'
`It hath been full ten minutes, your highness.'
`I will now take it from its sweet pillow, wake her, and see if the spell
hath had its power. I do but have half faith in it, though I have heard of
wondrous flowers with strange properties. There is one called, I think, the
xical, that hath the power of bringing the dead to life, if held to the lips.
There is another I have heard of called the otol, that hath some wondrous
power,  I think, of death.
`Pray the gods this be not it,' cried the Peruvian, with anxiety.
`If it be, it at least hath failed to injure our sleepy Telitza, for the time is
expired.'
With these words she bent over the maiden, and put forth her hand to
remove the otol. As she did so, she thought she beheld the green and
golden circle within it move and evolve, as if instinct with life. She looked
a second time more closely, and then drew back her hand with an
exclamation
of surprise.
`Behold, Tzitzis! Do my own eyes deceive me?'
The Peruvian bent low over the flower, and the next moment started back
with a cry of horror.
`It is a serpent, uncoiling itself.'
The princess, pale with fear and wonder, again looked into the flower, as it
lay upon the gently rising and falling bosom of the Peruvian virgin, and did
indeed, to her speechless horror and amazement, behold therein, instead of
the beautiful little cup composed of minute concentric circles, a very
small, slender serpent, with a needle-like tongue, moving within the petals
with great rapidity. She perceived at once the fatal danger of the sleeper.
But ere she could obey her first impulse to snatch the flower from her bosom,
she saw the nimble little animal leave it for her breast, and thrice strike his
sting deep into the bosom that had warmed it into life.
The flower instantly withered, and the serpent itself, coiling its graceful
length upon the bloodless and scarce visible wounds it had made, at the same
instant expired. The sleeper waked not, but sighed heavily;  smiled most
sweetly for a moment, as if in a pleasant passage of some happy dream.
Then a fearful shudder passed over her frame,
and she was dead!
The princess and her attendant looked on with silent horror. The blood
chilled in their veins. For several minutes neither could move nor speak.
At length the princess slowly rose to her feet. She spake not a word.
But grief, wonder, indignation, horror, were depicted on her pale and rigid
visage. She stood awhile after she rose, and contemplated the victim as she
lay at her feet. She felt the hapless Telitza had died in her stead. She saw
before her the death she herself had wonderfully escaped. Tzitzis cast
herself
upon the ground, dissolved in tears, and then lifted her hands to heaven
in gratitude for the princess' safety. The princess' heart was full. Tears
would have come to her relief, also, but for the just vengeance that burned
in her bosom against the assassin. She felt grateful for her preservation,
but she expressed it only by a single, fervent, eloquent glance towards
heaven. She felt that the present time was for action. She saw at a
glance the whole dark plot of the prince, and at once decided on her course
of conduct.
"Tzitzis!" she said, in a tone that startled the maiden for its stern decision,
"rise, and brush away thy tears. Haste to the Lord Cuiri, and bid him come
hither speedily. Say not what hath been done. After thou hast given
him the message, haste to the emperor, and desire him come to my chamber. Be speedy."
When the Peruvian had left her alone, she strode the room with a firm,
quick pace. Her brow and bearing were truly queenly, and the fierce fire
of the haughty Aztec race flashed from her eyes, at other times so gentle.
Her bosom heaved with strong feeling, such as woman only can show under
excitement. Yet her firmly compressed mouth evinced the power she held
over her emotions. In a few moments after the departure of Tzitzis, a quick
step was heard without, followed instantly by a tap at the door, as if with
the hilt of a sword.
"Come in," she said, in an abrupt tone, that told of the energy of her
feelings.
The lord of Cuiri threw open the door and stood upon the threshold.
"Pardon me, my noble mistress, but--"
"No apology, my lord--I have sent for you. Come hither. Nay--this
is no time for ceremony. Look! What seest thou ?" And she pointed to
the body.
The young noble saw that the spirit of the princess was aroused; and,
ignorant of the cause, half suspected it was against himself. He obeyed
her, and approached the dead maiden. At first he thought she slept; but
a second glance convinced him that it was the sleep of death. The
withered flower, still lying on her bosom, at the same instant caught his
eye.
"The otol!" he cried, with surprise; "and therewith the fatal serpent!"
"What said you, my lord?" demanded the princess, quickly.
"I said I knew the flower. It is the ootl. Surely, you could not have
ordered this to be done?" he exclaimed, with surprise and amazement.
"No, my lord, no, no. 'T is my princely cousin's handy work. He sent
the flower as a gift to me, with the request that it should be worn in my
bosom for his sake."
"The prince!" repeated the astonished noble.
"None else. To prove if it possessed the love-inspiring virtue which my
slave attributed to it, I tested it, as you see. Alas, poor Telitza! she shall
be avenged. My lord of Cuiri, take with you such force as you will, and
forthwith arrest the prince in his rooms."
"Arrest the prince!" he exclaimed, starting.
"Do you hear me?" she repeated, commandingly, stamping her foot.
"It shall be done."
"Delay not. Interchange no words with him. Reply to no question
she
puts to you. Let it be done secretly, and without noise. Then return to
me. Stay! Let not the Tlascalan escape; I would have him also. Go,
my lord."
The nobleman immediately departed, and the princess was once more left alone.
`I did not believe the prince,  wicked at heart, ambitious in soul as I
knew him to be,  would have attempted such a thing as this. This is the
way he would
leap
into the throne. Pray the gods, he hath not laid his
hands on my father's life!'
She hastened towards the door of her apartment, as if she would fly to
his chamber to see if he were in safety, when it opened, and Tzitzis,
pale and trembling, ushered in the emperor, wrapped in his silken
night-robe
.
`My child, what is this alarm?' he cried, on beholding her flushed and
indignant bearing.
`I have sent for thee, my father,' she said, assuming a calmness that
she was far from feeling, `to ask thee if it is still thy purpose and wish
that I should espouse the Prince Palipan, my cousin, and thy nephew?'
`Thou art a foolish child to call me hither at this hour to ask me what
thou already knowest,' answered the emperor, displeased.
`Sit here, my father. I have a deeper reason than you conceive or
scarcely will believe, when you come to know it, for sending for thee at this
time. Nay  sit by me and hear me.'
`We are not alone,' said the emperor, struck by her impressive manner
and deep voice of feeling.
`Tzitzis, child, retire to thy couch, if thou canst sleep. Be secret, as I
have told thee, as to what thou hast seen. Nay, further, regard not the
slave upon the floor, she sleeps too heavily to hear or heed.' `What
wouldst thou say, my child? Thou art not well. Something hath
disturbed
thee.'
`My father,' she said, without regarding his words, `dost thou remember,
in the history of your imperial line, there was an emperor who had twin
sons?'
`I do. It was Acolhuatzin the Great, my seventh ancestor.'
`Which of those sons did he decree should possess his throne?'
`Both to be emperors equally.'
`Such was his decree; but what was the truth? Did not one twin,
more ambitious than his brother, secretly slay him, that he might reign
alone?'
`This is true, my child. But wherefore these questions?'
`Did he reign?' she asked, pointedly.
`No. The emperor slew him for the murder, and gave the throne to the
heir of another branch.'
`Did the emperor well in slaying his own son?'
`All men have applauded his justice.'
`Wouldst thou have done the same, my father, had he been thy son?'
`Yes, child,' he said, sternly; `though thou thyself should have pleaded
with tears for his life.'
`This is what I wish to know,' she said, with spirit, her eye lighting up
with a smile of satisfaction.
`But what has this to do with the prince?'
`Thou knowest we had some difference the early part of the evening, and
so parted.'
`Well.'
`An hour since he sent me, by my Peruvian slave, in this alabaster vase,
a tall and stately flower.
`He hath, then, come to his senses,' said the monarch, pleased. `Thou
didst accept it?'
"Truly, Father, I held the prince in little favor. Nevertheless, I
admired his flower, but with suspicion. So I questioned the maiden
closely, and she said the prince bade her, after I slept, place it within
my breast, saying, withal, some pretty speech about its coldness towards
him."
"Truly, he was not far wrong, girl."
"Listen, my father. Suspicion grew on me still, strengthened by more
I heard; and, ere I took the flower to my own heart, as the prince
desired, I laid it first upon the warm breast of yonder sleeping slave."
"Well, my child, well," cried the emperor, with both alarm and curiosity
excited by her words and manner.
"Come hither, sire, and let the prince's gift tell the remainder of the
tale."
She led the monarch towards the dead body of the Peruvian slave; and
silently pointed to her bosom. It was already livid, and the flower and
the
serpent lay upon it.
"She is dead!" exclaimed the emperor.
"She is poisoned, sir," said the princess, impressively. "There lies
thy nephew's gift, where, a quarter of an hour since, I laid it. It is an
otol."
The emperor gazed fixedly upon the corpse for awhile, without a word.
He then turned, and cast himself upon his daughter's neck.
"Thank the gods thou art saved, my child."
"I thank them," she said, fervently, "not that I am saved from death, but
from the prince."
"He shall die!" cried the monarch, in a severe and terrible tone.
"Nay, father. Let not his blood be shed. My life hath not been taken.
Let him live, though in the lowest dungeons of the imperial castle."
"His life must answer it," replied the emperor, resolutely. "His head shall
roll on the scaffold at sunrise."
"My dear father, hear me," she cried, detaining him as he was going out.
"So soon as I saw the fatal effects of the flower upon the slave, I despatched
Tzitzis for the young Lord Cuiri, and, showing him what thou hast now
seen, commanded him secretly to arrest the prince in his chamber."
"Didst thou this? Then art thou a noble girl."
"By this time he is a prisoner. Now, my dear father, leave his
punishment
to me. It will be the deeper and severer, if I am his judge.
Let it
not be made a public matter. There are the seeds of dissension now
abroad, and the people, and even certain disaffected nobles, taking advantage
of division in the imperial family, might shake the state and endanger its
stability."
"By the eagle of Aztec, girl," said the monarch, embracing her; "you
speak well and wisely. I feel I shall leave behind me a wise successor,
even though she be the last of her line."
"Let the prince be my prisoner, my father. I sent to arrest him ere I
asked your permission, lest you might take some dangerous step! Now that
you have sanctioned it, place confidence in me, that I shall, in the
disposition
of him, do nothing that will not also meet with your approval."
"You are a noble woman, and I knew not what excellence I was
sacrificing
when I would have given you to this assassin," said the emperor, with
pride and paternal feeling. "But we must trust to the gods to provide for
the continuance of our empire."
'Thou dost remember, father,' said the princess, with a smile, and some
slight tokens of confusion, 'the prophecy that is to be fulfilled in a female
heir to the throne of the Aztecs?'
'I do. And by the glory of the Aztec dynasty.' cried the monarch,
warmly and sincerely; 'I should rather you would wed and take to your
throne the lowest serf from the people, than that this false prince should
have espoused you.'
The Princess Eylla looked in her father's face for a moment after he had
ceased speaking, with unmixed surprise and delight,--then flung herself
impulsively
into his arms, and wept upon his shoulder.
The emperor would have questioned her for the cause of this singular
exhibition of feeling; but she gently and skillfully avoided an explanation
of emotions she scarcely dared to give herself up to even when alone. Having
taken orders for the body of the ill-fated maiden to be privately removed
from the apartments and from the palace, she then obeyed the emperor's
commands to remove from the scene of death to a suite of apartments
adjoining
his own, and which had once been occupied by her mother. The
windows of these chamfers commanded a wider view of the city and canal
than those which she had left, and the lattice in the sleeping-room of the
empress opened upon a balcony of stone, that directly overhung
the water. Hither she followed the emperor, and with Tzitzis, awaited the
return of the Lord Cuiri to communicate to her the intelligence of the arrest
of the prince.
END OF VOL. I.CHAPTER I.
SCENE IN THE ARMORY.
While
these events were transpiring within the palace, scenes of an
opposite character were opening in the net-marker's quarter, and the
neighborhood
of the street of the Armorers. In a few minutes after parting
with Casipeti at the palace-stairs, Montezuma landed on the opposite shore,
at the foot of his own street. He entered his dwelling, to see if by chance
any of his friends were there, and to leave a word of warning with Fatziza.
He then hastened towards the arsenal, which Sismarqui had been ordered
to seize, and the garrison of which his brother, who was one of the soldiers,
had succeeded in corrupting. This he felt was the most important point to
visit first, as it contained nearly all the weapons with which the revolters
were to arm themselves.
As the young man, whose destinies had been so singularly unfolded within
the last few hours, hastened along the narrow and winding street that led
towards it, his mind was agitated with the most restless thoughts upon the
situation in which he had placed himself, through his newly-awakened
passion for the princess. The reality of the scenes he had so recently
passed through,  the bold declaration he had made of his devotion,
her confession of love in return,  all seemed improbable, all seemed to
him a wonderful, delightful, overwhelming dream! Could it be that the
adoring, distant admiration he had felt for the lovely princess from boyhood,
contained really the germ of love, and that that germ had now matured and
become a glorious fruit-bearing tree! Could it be, that his reverential
homage to his future empress, whenever she appeared abroad, was love
unknown to him,  love under the guise of an enthusiastic bondman's
reverential fealty? It was all indeed true. Montezuma had loved long
without knowing it, and now that the key of the knowledge of his own
heart had been given him by the princess' own hand, he could not but
acknowledge her long-existing power over it. He now, therefore, wore
love's cuirass lightly and familiarly on his heart in that love had so well
taught him how to wear it. With the deepest gratitude, and a calm, inward
sense of joy, that only favored lovers like him can feel, he hastened on his way
towards the armory, resolved, for her sake, to avert the storm he had raised,
if in the power of human means. But he felt he had only human means
with which to encounter excited human passions, and the reflection made
him tremble for the issue. Nevertheless, his bold spirit quailed not, and
his love for the princess made him feel the presence within him of a power
almost godlike in its energies.
As he approached the armory, the sounds of deep voices which had reached
his ear on the water, like the noise of distant surges breaking upon the shore,
became suddenly loud and decided. He quickened his pace, and soon came
in sight of the arsenal. At a glance he saw that the impatient multitude
already filled the close street beneath the arch, and that the throng extended
several hundred yards on either side. He had already suspected something
like this, from the deserted state of the net-maker's street and those alleys
through which he had come, which before his visit to the palace seemed
alive with men passing from house to house, standing together in anxious
groups, or sitting in their shop-doors burnishing up their rude arms. He
flew forward, and was pressing through their midst towards the armory, to
prevent, if possible, its falling into their possession, when Hucha, the
Hunchback
,
caught him by the scarf, with an exclamation of joy.
`The gods have answered my prayer! Thou art here.'
At this instant the revolters sent up a deep, stern shout, and the multitude
swayed this way and that, like a vast wave.
`What means this?' asked Montezuma, sternly. `'Tis not the hour for
action! This is madness, if ye had hoped to succeed.'
`The people are impatient for their arms, and dropping in hither in small
parties by different streets, have insensibly increased to the multitude you
behold. But Sismarqui holds the armory, and though they have thrice
assailed
its gates, refuses to open them till the signal is given from the temple.
`Sismarqui hath behaved nobly, Hucha. Come with me.'
With these words, Montezuma forced his way through the townsmen, who,
on recognizing, greeted him with acclamations, and made way for him and the
Hunchback to approach quite up to the arch of the armory. Above it was
a terrace, on which stood Sismarqui in full armor, attended by his gigantic
brother and Inisquini, the sword-maker, also clothed in strong mail, and
leaning upon a huge sword with which he was armed.
`You are most welcome, Montezuma,' he said, on discerning him. `We
have had to hold at bay our own party for their overmuch zeal.'
`I would come up to you,' said Montezuma, `having a matter of deep
moment to communicate. Open the gate!'
`The people will take possession of the armory, if I do.'
`My friends,' said Montezuma, turning towards them, and speaking with
gentle firmness, `this rude bearing grieves me! This spirit is not the kind
that will better our condition. Patriots who begin by insubordination among
themselves, will never be successful, and their course must end in direct
anarchy. The gates of the armory are now to be opened for me to enter.
Will you permit me to go in with Hucha?'
`Open the gates to our brave chief! His will is our will. Long live
Montezuma!' were the replies that rose from a thousand voices.
As the gate was opened, the populace retired from it, leaving a large space
before them, and the two entered without hindrance, and closed the gate
behind them. On reaching the balcony, Montezuma took Sismarqui, Hucha,
and the sword-maker into a guard-room adjoining it, and closed the door.
His manner prepared them for some important communication, and they
waited in silence for him to unfold his purpose in seeking an interview with
them. After a few moment's delay, during which he paced the room as if
troubled how to open his communication, he turned abruptly to them and said,
My brave friends, this revolt must not go on!'
The three insurgent chiefs started with astonishment, and looked upon each
other, to see if all had heard aright.
`I repeat it, my friends. The insurrection must be stayed. At whatever
cost, it must be stayed!'
`What mean these strange words, Montezuma?' demanded Sismarqui.
Art thou mad?'
`No.'
`Art thou a traitor?' cried the sword-maker, grasping firmly the hilt of
his weapon, and fixing upon him a penetrating glance of suspicion.
`No.'
`Then thou art a coward,' cried the Hunchback, with a contemptuous
glance and a bitter sneer on his expressive lip.
`My friends and brothers, I am neither,' answered the young man, calmly.
`Hear me a few words. Our wrongs have kindled this flame of rebellion in
the city. We have taken arms to retrieve our condition, and from slaves to
become freemen. We are now the property of the emperor and his nobles,
articles of barter and sale,  holders neither of our lives, of our honor, or of
worldly wealth. All we have and are belongs to our masters. Is it not so?'
`You speak the truth,' answered the sword-maker, in a harsh tone, as if
this recapitulation of his condition had stirred from the depths of his soul all
the bitterness of his spirit against his oppressors.
`It is, then, that we may break these chains of vassalage, and become
freemen
,
that we are in arms,  not that we may slay or make slaves of the
nobles, and place ourselves in their stead. Our object is not anarchy, but
order,  not bloodshed, but benevolence,  not war, but peace.'
`Yes,' answered Sismarqui, who had listened to his friend's words with
surprise, and vain conjectures as to their drift; `Yes, if peace, benevolence,
and order may be achieved without their opposites. If freedom and all the
blessings of a healthy human liberty could be ours without striking a blow,
then would I be the first to sheathe the sword I have drawn this night.'
`Is such your opinion, Inisquini?' demanded Montezuma, with a kindling
eye, of the stern old sword-maker.
`The gods know, I have no ambition in my old age, to win honor through
blood. I have taken my sword to break the chains worn by my country.'
`If the emperor would remove those chains, would you put up your sword,
nor seek to shed his blood and that of his nobles?' inquired Montezuma,
eagerly.
`I would. But there is little hope of this,' answered the old man, shaking
his head.
`What say you, my brave Hucha?'
`The sword is drawn, and will never be laid down until the tyrant lays
down his sceptre, or it is wrested from his grasp,' answered the young
insurgent
leader, almost fiercely.
`Thou knowest in a few days, Hucha,' said Montezuma, without appearing
to regard the tone of his words, `that by our laws the emperor will resign
his crown to his daughter.'
`To the more refined tyrant, prince Palipan,' answered the Hunchback,
with a dark frown.
`Mark me!' said Montezuma, impressively, fixing his eyes upon their
faces, `prince Palipan will never wield the sceptre of his uncle Ulyd.'
`Hath he been assassinated?' cried Sismarqui, which the decided and
certain tones of his friend led him at once to suspect.
`No; unless that he hath slain himself. The princess hath this night
dismissed
him from her presence in high displeasure, and signified to her father
her firm determination never to espouse him.'
`How know you this?' they all demanded in one breath.
`I will tell thee, briefly. The princess privately sent for me, an hour
since, to '
`Knew she of this conspiracy, then?' asked Hucha, quickly.
`She knows it all,' answered Montezuma, evasively; `how, thou shalt
hear another time. I confessed myself its leader, in our interview, and she
implored me by the gods and by her regard for the people, and theirs for
her, to use my influence to stop its further progress. She bade me say that
the prince should never rule, and that whatever we desired, for whatsoever
we were about to take up arms, she would grant, the day she became
empress
.
She implored me not to deluge her empire in blood, and to promise,
in her name, to the people, more than all that steel could win.'
`This is marvellous,' said the sword-maker, thoughtfully.
`What said you?' demanded Sismarqui, with the deepest interest.
`That if she would give me some token, to convince the citizens of my
truth, and as a surety of her promise, I would sacrifice myself but that I
would obey her will.'
With these words he exhibited the signet which the princess had given
him.
`And you promised!' said Hucha, who had steadily all the while watched
the face of the young man, with a singularly penetrating gaze.
`I then swore by the sacred gods and the imperial eagle of her house, that I
would stay the revolt, or perish a sacrifice to the fearful spirit I had raised!'
For a few moments there was a dead silence among the listeners. The
old chief leaned upon his sword, thoughtfully, with his eyes fixed upon the
floor. Sismarqui stood with his arms folded upon his breast, looking upon
his friend with more of displeasure than approval; while the Hunchback
walked slowly away to the opposite side of the room, as if seeking to conceal
from every eye the effect, whatever it was, that Montezuma's words had
upon him.
`How is this?' at length said Montezuma, looking round from one to the
other; `am I to believe that you joined in this revolt for the sake of
bloodshed
,
or from a more evil motive still, guilty ambition? Why do I find you
grieved that the diamond you would seek with years of labor in the deep
mine, is found in your very path? What seek ye more?'
`My noble friend and brother,' said Sismarqui, taking his hand, `your
judgment in all things should be my guide. It has been so, from my youth.
Your words convey joy to my bosom; but I have been silent because I doubt.
`Not my word?'
`No; nor the princess' promise. But I fear when she becomes empress
of the realm, and the sole power is in her own hands, she will be dazzled by
it, and either forget or repent of what she has now promised so fairly. I
might say, if I could find one hundred golden
xiquepilli
to-morrow, I would
give fifty to the first man I met, yet should be very reluctant when I had
found the sum, to fulfil my promise. Doubtless the sweet princess speaks
as her heart dictates. But she has not been
tried.
'
`Sismarqui speaks with wisdom,' said the sword-maker; `he has expressed
my thoughts. If my life would make the good princess happier than she is,
methinks I would willingly give it. But our country looks to us for liberty.'
`And they shall
have
it,' cried the Hunchback, in a loud voice, coming
forward
.
`The princess Eylla hath not so devout a worshipper of her heart's
virtues and her person's charms, as the accursed Hunchback, whom she can
scarce look upon without contempt. But the princess hath neither virtues
nor charms enough to make a traitor of me.'
2
`Traitor, to me!' repeated Montezuma, laying his hand upon his weapon.
But he instantly withdrew it, and looked as if more grieved than offended.
`I repeat it,
traitor!
She hath sent for thee, hearing somehow, (the
gods know if otherwise than through thyself,) that we were on the eve of
revolt, and hath so won thee by flattery and fallacious promises that thou
hast come back hither ready to sell thy country! By the bright sun! I will
go forth and proclaim thee traitor to the people, that they may reek their
swords in the false heart that would betray them!'
He advanced towards the door as he ended, when Sismarqui stepped
before
him.
`Nay, Hucha! This is madness. I am, perhaps, as little favorable as
thyself to this subversion of our bright plan of revolt on the uncertain tenure
of the princess' promise.'
`Stand aside, Sismarqui,' answered the young man with gloomy fierceness;
`unless thou dost wish a quarrel with me, which on another matter than this
I would freely engage in with thee.'
He struck him back with the flat of his sword, as he spoke. The blood
of the young armorer leaped to his cheek, and the next instant both would
have been engaged in hostile conflict with each other, when both
Montezuma
and the old chief arrested their weapons.
`Shame!' cried the latter, with stern displeasure, `would you draw your
swords first upon each other? Fie upon thee, Hucha! If such be your
temper, little good will come of our taking up arms. If you love your
country truly, and would free her from bondage, put up thy weapon.
Sismarqui
return thine to its scabbard. Listen to me, both of ye!'
The momentary irritation of the irascible dwarf had been vented in his
blow upon the breast of Sismarqui, and ashamed that he had let passion and
also private feeling take the place of reason and zeal for the public good, he
silently obeyed the old chief, and stood with a pale cheek and his eyes cast
upon the ground awaiting his words. Sismarqui betrayed no trace of anger
or resentment, and seemed to think only of the present crisis of affairs.
`There remains but one course to pursue,' said the old chief; `either
insurrection with a firm trust in our good swords, or endurance with faith in
the princess Eylla's promise. Both results are equally uncertain, and both
equally favor our object.'
`Not so, Inisquini,' interrupted Montezuma, and speaking with respectful
earnestness. We
may
fail to achieve our liberties with our swords,  we
are sure of them when the princess comes to the throne.'
`I am willing to resign my opinion and be guided by you,' answered the
old man. `I feel that you are a better judge of the sincerity of the princess
than we can be, as you saw her and heard her speak.'
Montezuma warmly grasped the sword-maker's hand, and then turned
inquiringly to Sismarqui.
`I will also wait the princess' promise,' said the young armorer; `if then
it fail, it will be time enough to resort to arms.'
`And by that time the wily woman will have strengthened every post,
fortified every garrison, trebly manned the walls and bridges, and riveted
our chains so firmly on, that we may not rend them off our limbs but with
all our lives,' answered Hucha. `No, no! We possess the arsenal with its
fifty men-at-arms, and this step alone has given us the command of an eighth
of the city.'
`Wherefore, brave Hucha,' said Montezuma, kindly and reprovingly,
`wherefore this turbulent will in opposition to your friends? Thou hast, like
ourselves, boldly declared thyself a lover of liberty. Will she be more
welcome
to thee that she comes in garments dyed in blood, or less so that she is
presented to thee by the hand of the princess? Nay, nay, my friend, thou
hast forgotten thyself for a moment. Give me thy hand.'
`Montezuma,' said Hucha, steadily and calmly, `I will not give thee my
hand. Thou hast been corrupted by the fair words of a woman, and art
unworthy the confidence of men. Have thou and thy friends thy own way.
I wash my hands of this matter altogether. If
ye
choose to continue slaves,
I will be free!
'
With these words, he threw himself forward upon the point of his sword,
forgetful of the corslet he had put on. The blade broke short against his
steel-covered breast, and he fell heavily upon his face to the floor. He rose
slowly and silently, and turning his head towards the wall, burst into tears.
Montezuma was touched by the keen sensibility of the nervous dwarf, the
violent expressions of whose feelings were not new to him, and approached
him.
Hucha!' he said in a low tone, `I know you have a deep and secret grief
at heart, which embitters all your spirit, and that you had hoped in the
excitement
of battles and conquest to fly from your own soul. If my sister hath
chosen differently than you could have her, I am sorry for you, and she
herself
sympathizes with you. There are a thousand fairer and kinder maids
than Fatziza in Mexico. We have discoursed before upon this subject, and
therefore I speak freely to you now.'
The dwarf did not return the pressure of the hand Montezuma placed in
his, and walked away from him without speaking.
`How shall we move the people to our new purpose?' said Sismarqui, as
Montezuma came forward; `and how the garrison? 'T will be harder putting
this down than carrying it on, methinks.'
`Leave the people to me. Go, Sismarqui, and tell thy brother secretly
that the conspiracy is discovered, and must end where it is, and bid the
soldiers return to their duty.'
`The armorer's street is filled with the populace receiving arms,' said the
sword-maker; `I will fly thither, and disperse them, if possible.'
`Proclaim the princess' promise, and appeal to their love for her. On my
life, it will act upon them.'
Sismarqui and the old chief left the apartment together, and Montezuma
once more stepped up to the Hunchback.
`Hucha, I am grieved at this manner. Join thy voice with ours, and let
us show our love to our country and to the princess by both doing this noble
service.'
`Montezuma,' said Hucha, turning and fixing full upon him his glittering
eyes, `I tell thee thou art a traitor.'
Montezuma started, colored, and was silent. His conscience smote him.
He felt he was in truth acting more for the princess than for his
fellow-bondmen
.
His glance fell beneath the penetrating eye of the Hunchback,
and at the moment he asked himself if he did not merit the appellation. At
length he said, quietly,
`Hucha, I forgive you.'
`Montezuma, truth needs it not,' said Hucha, with sarcasm. `Your
countenance
hath been an open scroll for me to read, and when I was at fault for
the beginning or ending of a line, I had but to use my ear, which ever
caught, unfailingly, from your lips, the catch-word, princess Eylla. The
princess hath used her beauty as a net, and caught you in it. Alas, that
thy ambition should have so blinded thee as to let thee fall into it! Mark
me! the princess will rivet firmer the chains that bind her vassals; and then,
look out for thy own head!
I forgive thee,
for thou needest it. I pity thee,
for thou dost surely merit it!'
It would be difficult to describe the inimitable irony of voice and manner
with which the Hunchback uttered these words. When he had ended, he
turned away from Montezuma and left the guard-room.
CHAPTER II.
THE SERF-CHIEF AND THE INSURGENTS.
The
multitude without had been long expecting the re-appearance of their
leaders, when the sword-maker appeared at the gate, on his way out of the
arsenal. When he came forth into the crowd, he said,
`My friends and fellow-bondmen, our liberties are nearer and surer than
we hoped. Whatever Montezuma suggest to you, I pray you all submit to.
The fair princess Eylla hearing of our desire to free ourselves from her
father's oppression, hath sent us a fair message of terms.'
`What terms?' asked one of the crowd, as the sword-maker was making
his way along through their midst.
`Terms better than we can win by our swords, and without bloodshed!'
`Long live the princess!' shouted many of the multitude, enthusiastically,
while others cried sternly,
`What power hath the princess? Prince Palipan is to be our ruler. She
hath no voice, masters, when once he gets into the throne.'
`True, true! No princess,  no terms!' cried the fickle multitude.
`The prince will never rule Mexico with her consent,' answered the
sword-maker
,
still moving on.
`Nor is it with her consent she marries him, if all tales be true,' said the
first speaker.
`She will never marry the prince,' said the old chief, decidedly. `But
yonder is Montezuma. I do pray you, my friends, listen to him with
peaceably-disposed
minds.'
The sword-maker then pursued his way towards the armorer's quarter,
while Montezuma himself appeared on the balcony above the arch. His
presence was hailed with a shout, and every eye was turned towards him.
`My friends,' he cried, you have known me from my youth upward, and
you have this night sealed your confidence in me by constituting me with
one voice the leader of this movement to assert our civil rights. Have you
still confidence in me, that I will do nothing that will have a tendency to
bring evil upon you?'
There was but one voice from a thousand tongues, `Live Montezuma!
We will follow him to the death!'
`Your object,' he then said, in a loud, clear voice, `in rising in arms, is to
free yourselves from attachment to the soil, and to the nobles who hold it,
to break the bond that binds you as fixtures to a street or estate belonging
to a noble or the emperor,  to release your persons, lands, and goods from
longer being the property of your lords.'
`Yes, yes!' was the unanimous response of the multitude.
`It is, also, that you may no longer be subject to be chastised or maimed
by men who hold you as their property,  that the fine on the marriage of
your females may be done away,  that the chastity of your wives and
daughters may be protected and secured, that your feelings as men may be
respected, and that the power of life and death shall be lodged only in the
hands of the emperor. Is it not so?'
There was again a loud exclamation in the affirmative; but one or two
voices from beneath the arch cried, `No emperor!'
`No emperor, indeed, but an empress, good as she is lovely,' said
Montezuma
,
quickly. `The princess Eylla will soon become empress of the realm.
She has long felt for your oppression, and grieved that she could not relieve
you. How often she has interceded with the emperor for the innocent, you
can all bear testimony. She will shortly have the power in her own hands,
and will then exert it for our benefit.'
`The prince, the prince!' cried several persons, in disapproving tones.
`The prince Palipan hath this night been dismissed by the princess, with
her final answer, that she will never espouse him, but ascend the throne
herself
sole empress.'
There was a loud simultaneous shout from the multitude, the same which
had reached the prince's ears as he was then standing beneath the balcony
of the net-maker's house. When it had ceased, Montezuma was about to
continue, when one of the artificers in the crowd asked, abruptly,
`How know you this, sir chief?'
`From her own lips. She sent for me but a little while since, and made
this communication, desiring me to convey it to you. She promises, through
me, that if you will return to your abodes peaceably, she will grant you, on
ascending the throne, all which you would now demand of her by force of
arms. Not one grievance is there you would redress, and which I have just
enumerated, that she will not at once do away with. She throws herself
upon your generosity, and implores you to subdue this spirit of revolt, and
receive from her hands the heavenly gift of freedom.'
`What said you? What did you?' asked several, eagerly.
`I knelt at her feet, and swore that I would, if my life were the forfeit,
seek to carry out her wishes. It remains for us now to deluge our fair city
in blood, fighting for a liberty we may never gain, consigning our abodes
and wives and children to the fires of universal conflagration and the reeking
steel of an infuriated soldiery, or lay aside our swords, and wait seven days,
to receive in peace the certain liberty she offers.'
A deep murmur ran among the multitude at these words of their leader,
and for a moment he was unable to decide in what way they had been
received
.
At length it began to grow louder and more marked, and he saw
with pleasure that the desired effect had been produced.
`Now, my friends, let us retire to our homes, and wait patiently the issue
of events. Not a blow has yet been struck! though nothing evil can come
of this, if you soon retire. The garrison of the arsenal have returned to
their duty, alarmed that the knowledge of our intentions had reached the
palace. Let each man seek to spread the intelligence of peace, and sow its
seed wherever his footsteps take him. Long live princess Eylla and liberty!'
`Long live the empress!' was the loud response of the multitude.
Instantly they began to disperse by the different streets, and in less than
five minutes the Street of the Arch contained but two or three solitary
individuals
.
Montezuma then turned from the balcony, and met the fraternal
embrace of Sismarqui.
`This is beyond my hopes,' said the latter.
`The people, though slaves, love their homes and families,' said
Montezuma
,
`and if liberty can be achieved without endangering them, they will
choose it. Besides, I counted much on their attachment to the princess, and
I am not disappointed.'
`The name of the princess Eylla is a talisman to every Mexitlian heart,'
said Sismarqui, with enthusiasm. `Her presence in the midst of the revolt,
had it come to blows, would have suspended even the contest. Thank the
gods, she hath cast off this prince.'
Montezuma had stronger reasons for gratitude than his friend, but was
silent. Words would but faintly express what
he
felt in a matter in which
his heart was so deeply interested.
`How took thy brother the announcement, said you?' he asked quickly.
`Not kindly at first, but at length yielded. The garrison were more difficult
to bring over, inasmuch as they feared for their heads. But I convinced them
that they were yet safe,  that their defection had not yet transpired, and
that, if they chose, they might hold me prisoner in testimony of their loyalty.
This they would have done, but for my brother. They are now on duty
again, but are a little sullen. Their office is willing to throw himself on
the clemency of the emperor.'
`Did he join us with the soldiers? I thought he was to be placed under
arrest.'
`He loves Casipeti's pretty daughter, and resentment against the noble
who insulted her in the square, and for which her father struck him, induced
him, he says, to side with us. He thinks the course we are now pursuing
the safest and wisest.'
`I feel that it will be. May he prove true! But I doubt the noble's faith!
Half my task is not yet accomplished. My party of brave young men in
the street leading to the Temple of War, and who were to seize it with me,
are yet to be seen,  but I have only to speak, and they will do as I desire.
Then the quarter of the Lapidaries and my brave knight must be visited. It
is near twelve, and they will be in arms, and mischief will be done, ere we
can reach them.
It was decided that Sismarqui should go to the street of the armorers, and
assist Inisquini, the sword-marker, in suppressing the spirit of revolt in that
quarter, and from thence proceed to the foot of the hill of the Temple, to
disperse the band Montezuma had directed to meet him there; while the
latter should hasten to the ruined palace of Axusco, and with the knight and
such chiefs as might have assembled, go forward to the Lapidaries' quarter.
The two young men then retired from the balcony into a circular stone
hall above the arch, from which a flight of steps wound downward to the
area enclosed by the gates. They were about to descend, when four of the
soldiers, with their weapons drawn in their hands, stepped before Montezuma
and arrested his progress, by leveling their pikes at his breast.
`What means this?' he demanded.
`That we have forfeited our heads, if our participation in this affair you
set on foot reaches the emperor's ears,' replied one of the men boldly.
`What is your purpose in arresting me?'
`To deliver you, as the leader of the rebellion, to the emperor, as the price
of our own liberty and forfeited lives.'
`Ye are foolish, men-at-arms,' said Sismarqui, sternly; `Montezuma's
person
cannot be of any avail for your safety. If you will have a victim, take
me, and release him;  I am equally guilty,  nay, more so, for I was the
chief rebel here until he came.'
`Let him give us some surety of safety, and he shall go,' said one of the
soldiers, for several other men-at-arms had by this time gathered round the
young men.
Montezuma had made no resistance, nor betrayed any emotion the while,
trusting by exercising moderation, sooner to escape from his unpleasant
situation
.
As the soldier spoke, he recollected the signet of the princess. He
felt for their situation, feeling he had contributed mainly to place them in it.
He therefore resolved to part with it, to re-assure them.
`My brave fellows,' he said, `here is the signet of the princess Eylla,
which she placed in my hands, to show to her subjects in testimony of the
truth of the message I have borne to them. This will protect you, should
the displeasure of the emperor menace you. The signet of the princess is
held by him as sacred as his own.'
As he spoke he placed it in the hands of the men-at-arms, who had
demanded
some security or token of protection. The soldiers examined it,
passing it from one to the other, with many exclamations of surprise at its
rare beauty. It bore a representation of the Aztec eagle floating with
outspread wings in the sun, and beneath it the name, `Eylla,' encircled by a
virgin zone.
`We will take this,' said the soldiers, `and return it to the princess, when
she ascends the throne,  for then we shall not fear for our safety. You
may pass forth.'
They were then permitted to descend and pass out of the gates into the
close street. Here they separated, as they had previously agreed,
Montezuma
going in the direction of the ruined palace, and Sismarqui proceeding
towards the street of the armorers. He had proceeded beyond the arch but
a few steps, when two men, hitherto concealed in the shadow of the wall
along which he was walking, stepped forth in his path and confronted him.
He started back, and stood in an attitude of defence.
`Sismarqui,' said a voice he thought he well knew, `we have been waiting
for thee to come forth. We were told thou wert in knights' armor, and thus
knew thee.'
`I shall soon doff it.'
`We are well met, Hopo, if you seek me;  who is this with thee?'
`I am Harani, the boatman,' answered the other.
`What do you wish with me? Time presses!' he said, hurriedly.
`A sad tale, I fear me, master Sismarqui.'
`Speak; what is it?'
`As we were rowing our boat along the gardens, to land at the net-maker's
street,' said Hopo, the fisherman, `we saw one of the emperor's white
swan-boats
lying close in with the alcatl trees that overhang the water. To
escape observation, we instantly pulled into the land. We had been there
but a few minutes, when we heard a shriek '
`Well, well! what is it?' demanded Sismarqui, half guessing at the truth.
`I thought you looked alarmed,' said the waterman, apologetically.
`Wilt thou torture me?'
`The shriek,' said Harani, `was from a female whom we saw taken from
the balcony of Mahco, the net-maker's house, by a cavalier, who, with the
aid of a man-at-arms, bore her to their boat.'
`Well  well.'
`The boat then put off, and swiftly crossed the canal. We followed at a
distance, and saw it land at the palace-stairs, near the marble tower, where
the lemon-walk terminates.'
Sismarqui scarcely heard the remainder of the communication. He felt a
sensation of dizziness, and staggered against the wall.
`Was it  was  was ' he faintly articulated; `did  did you see her?
Was it Fatziza?'
`It was,' said Hopo. `We saw her face by the light of the moon. She
had fainted, we thought.'
`How long since this happened?'
`But twenty minutes since. We are just from the palace.'
The lover was for a moment longer overpowered by the suddenness of the
appalling intelligence; but at length he succeeded by a strong mental effort
in recovering himself. If his deep emotion had been a mantle, to have been
laid aside, he could not have divested himself of it more completely than he
did.
`Come with me,' he said, in a deep, rigid tone of voice, that permitted no
question.
The men followed his long, rapid strides towards the net-maker's, without
speaking. He moved swiftly forward, without having formed in his mind
any definite purpose or mode of action. Fatziza was torn from him by some
reckless knight of the emperor's court, and it was enough to set on fire every
feeling in his bosom, and spur him forward! He thought of going at once to
the palace, and alone to attempt her rescue. He thought of an appeal to the
princess! A thousand different modes of conduct in the emergency occurred
to his mind, as he hastened onward through the narrow streets, but he rejected
each as it suggested itself, for others equally unsatisfactory. In this irresolute
state of mind, and in a condition bordering on phrenzy, he reached the
netmaker's
house. As if to assure himself that all was not a dream, he threw
himself against the door, and burst it open. In an instant he was in her little
room. It was deserted. He flew to her brothers. The window was thrown
open, and the moonlight streamed in broadly upon the floor. No one was
there!
`Fatziza,' he cried, as if he hoped yet to hear her sweet, familiar voice in
reply.
All was silent. An object on the floor arrested his eyes. He took it up,
and held it in the moonlight. It was a knight's plume. He examined it
closer. It was black, and a diamond button was attached to it. His face
became deadly pale, while his eye brightened up with settled vengeance.
`I am no longer at a loss who hath done this,' he said within his closed
teeth. `This is a feather from the wing of the imperial eagle. None but
the Aztec princes wear such a plume! I know where to direct my vengeance!
My thoughts were upon the knight, whom I unhorsed,  but  this knight
may have been the prince. By the gods! now I call to mind his bearing, it
was he! I will seek her, and rescue, or die with her!'
On the railing of the balcony he also saw a fragment of the
huepilli,
or
fillet, that had tied her hair, and on bounding forward with mingled rage and
grief to seize and press it to his heart, he beheld the prince's cloak, which
he had thrown down upon the balcony. Its clasp, with the eagle upon it,
and its green color, confirmed his suspicions. At this instant the net-maker
entered the room in great terror, and on beholding before him a man in
complete
knight's armor of the richest description, for such had been Sismarqui's
costume since he so suddenly made his appearance in it at the meeting of
the conspirators in the room below, he started back with additional terror.
`Fear not, Mahco! I am Sismarqui. I broke into thy dwelling to see
if the rumor that reached my ears were true!'
`What rumor? Where is Fatziza, son?'
`She hath been torn from thy roof, old man,' he said sternly, `by a recreant
villain!'
`Fatziza! my child, borne from me!'
`Too true, father! I go to rescue her.'
`Fly, fly! may the gods aid thee! Alas, my child! my daughter! Would
to the gods I had died ere I saw this day!' cried the bereaved net-maker,
sinking upon the floor.
`Father,' said Sismarqui, `if Montezuma come hither, tell him I have gone
to rescue his sister, and bid him look to his country. Ha! he speaks not!
The pulse hath fled! It hath killed him! Here is sorrow, twice told! The
gods receive thy spirit, father!'
With these words he rushed from the chamber, bearing the old man, slain
by the shock of his sudden and deep grief. Before gaining the street, nay,
on finding the plume and cloak, he had decided on the course he should
pursue to attempt Fatziza's rescue.
`Hopo, and you, Harani, my kind friends, I pray you add to your kindness
to-night a further favor. Take me in your boat, presently, and land me at
the palace-stairs, where thou sawest this cavalier himself land.'
`We will do it, master,' said Hopo, promptly. Wilt thou go to the palace
in thy knight's armor?' asked Harani.
`If I would play among serpents, I must choose their scaly covering,'
answered
he, as he stepped into their rude boat. `Delay not, but shoot out into
the stream. Thy nimblest oar will scarcely keep pace with my impatience.'
`I do hope thou wilt recover her, master Sismarqui,' said Hopo, as he
bent with his comrade to their slender oars, and impelled their little bark
swiftly across the bright water; `but when these nobles have a mind to
wickedness, 't is a hard matter for poor bondmen like us to stay them!'
`Poor maiden! she was the loveliest flower in our vale of Alcolo,' said
Harani, with that simple poetry of expression which characterized the
Mexitili; `and then her voice, as she screamed, was so sweet and mournful,
just as I have heard the golden-winged
quiltototl,
when pierced by the
hunter's arrow!'
Sismarqui's grief was deepened by the words of his humble friend, and
tears sprung to his eyes. But he suppressed the feeling which gave rise to
them, and steeled his spirit to the stern purpose he had in view. When
they came to the palace-stairs, where the black shadow almost rendered
invisible the line dividing the lower marble step from the water, he leaped
to land.
`Hopo,' he said, ascending the stairs, `come up hither. Show me which
way the knight took.'
VOL. II. 3
The waterman followed him to the top of the steps, from which was a
broad and noble view of the palace rising majestically before him in the cold
moonlight, like an edifice of driven snow, and contrasting strongly with the
towers or castles of dark blue stone, and warlike battlements, that projected
from either wing, half encompassing the Court of Fountains, before it.
`I dared to follow him up through this lime-path, till I saw him turn and
take the terrace round beneath the wall of the tower, and enter a small door
on the opposite side. I would have followed him through it, but for fear of
being seen and arrested by the sentinels,  for I could not bear to see the
sweet maiden borne off, without knowing whither, that I might tell you or
Montezuma.'
`You have done us both a kindness, good waterman, we shall never forget.
Stay;  I would ask you if you have ever seen the prince abroad in full
armor?'
`Yes, too often; for never did he take to the streets on horseback but
mischief went before him, and tears followed after him.'
`Behold me!' said Sismarqui, placing the prince's imperial plume in his
shining casque, and casting over his shoulders the cloak woven of the
beautifully
green feathers of the cochotl, which none but princes were allowed to
wear, and which the prince himself, in wearing it forth from the palace, to
disguise his identity, had turned inside out.
The waterman started back as if the prince himself had stood before him,
for in height and carriage the two were nearly equal.
`If thou hadst been the prince himself, I could not have been more
surprised
,'
he cried, with admiration.
`Be secret,' said Sismarqui. `I shall recover the maiden, or thou wilt
ne'er behold my face again. Wait here with thy boat one hour. If I come
not within that time, I shall come not at all.'
With these words he dropped the visor of his helmet over his face, drew
his sword, and placed it beneath his cloak, and disappeared within the dark
shadows of the lemon-walk.
Hopo put up a prayer to the gods for his success and the safety of the
maiden, and rejoined his companion in the boat. As he stepped into it, and
was about to take his seat beside him, to wait the return of Sismarqui, they
were startled by a bright flame that suddenly shot upward into the sky from
the summit of the Temple of Huitzilotli, and illumined the whole of that
quarter of the city. Ere they could express to each other their surprise, a
loud shout of triumph filled the air, and the loud
Tlalonzon,
or shield of the
god of war, suspended in the temple to give note of hostile alarm, struck
quick and strong, and resounded in deep tones throughout the city.
`It is the signal! Montezuma hath no faith in the princess!' they cried
with pleasure. `Liberty! Down with the nobles! Hopo,  Harani! we
are, from this moment, free men.'
Such was the spirit kindled in the bosoms of these two men, and such was
the spirit that the sounds and signal of revolt awakened in every bondman's
breast.
`Sismarqui hath lost faith in the princess! We must now win freedom
at the sword's point!'
CHAPTER III.
THE HUNCHBACK AND THE CAVALIER.
When
Hucha left the guard-room in which the conference of the four
chief conspirators had been held, after his severely ironical speech to
Montezuma
,
he met, near the door, the brother of Sismarqui. With the wonderful
power he held over the expression of his countenance, he said to him, in an
even voice, and with a slight, pleasant smile, in which there was no sign of
the feelings of his heart or the bitterness of his spirit,
`Methinks, stout Gila, that you and I should be friends, inasmuch as we
have been equal victims in love.' As he said this, he led him aside, and
walked with him along the stone passage of the armory.
`Ah, master Hucha,' said the stout soldier, with emotion; `I have grieved
more for that pretty maiden, than I shall ever do for woman again.
Methinks
you bear it lightly.'
`Dost thou love her still?' asked the Hunchback, quietly, but with a
searching glance of his piercing and restless eyes.
`I would lay down my life for her, now,' answered the man-at-arms warmly.
`And she would not thank thee. Dost thou not know she is a proud thing?'
`It is the pride of beauty, master Hucha,' answered the stout soldier;
`pride is a part of beauty in woman, as much as bravery is a part of strength
in man.'
`Thou hast well answered; butit is the pride of contempt. She scorned
thee!'
`Never, master Hunchback,' answered Gila, bluntly. `She hath too much
gentleness and goodness to scorn any one.'
`Why didst thou give her up?'
`Because she told me she could not love me; and she spoke so sweetly
when she said it, and told me so prettily, if I would forget her and regard
her only as a sister, it would make her happy, that the very sweetness of
her look did away the bitterness of her tongue.'
`And like a fool you swallowed the sugared pill. I tell thee she laughed
at thee.'
`Laughed! Her laughter is music,' said the enamored soldier. `But you
mean something more, by thy tone and eye. Out with it, master.'
`She did make merry with thy love for her, in my presence; likening
thee to some huge condor of the Cotopal peak making love to the singing
cenzontli.
'
`She hath a pleasant humor,' said the stout man-at-arms, laughing good
humoredly. `I' faith she hath nearly hit it!'
The dwarf bit his lip with disappointment and vexation, and walked along
silently, for a few seconds; at length, turning to him, he said angrily,
`Gila, thou art an ass! If she had told thee thou wert a fool, verily I
believe thou wouldst have commended her good sense, and had she ridiculed
thee to thy face, thou wouldst have laughed with her.'
`Truly, I would, master,' said the imperturbable man-at-arms; `no pretty
woman can make me angry, and especially one I love.'
`But she loves not thee.'
`But I do love her, and shall till my dying day,' answered Gila, stoutly.
`But I tell thee what, master Hucha,' he added in a low tone, `there are
some ugly men that can anger me, if they press me too closely. You have
been trying to get up a quarrel between me and Fatziza; and you have
spoken against her, because she hath liked a strait-limbed youth, like my
brother, Sismarqui, better than '
`Stop
there,
Gila,' said the Hunchback, laying his hand strongly upon the
arm of the soldier; `I can complete the sentence, if need be.' And the
dwarf's eyes literally blazed as he spoke.
`Well, well,  I will not say it. But thou shouldst beware how thou
speakest against others. Go, now! for what end thou hast sought this
conference
with me, I know not. If thou hadst hoped to effect thy object by
defaming Fatziza, thou hast missed it.'
`Good Gila,' said Hucha, at once subduing all emotion, and speaking in a
tone singularly soft and insinuating, `I hope you will forgive me;  I meant
not to anger thee.'
`I do forgive thee, Hucha. Nothing that one like thee can say will ever
offend me. I know that thou hast a feud with nature, from thy birth, and
that thou lookest upon mankind as thy natural foes, that are ever holding
up to thy morbid vision the mirror in which thou seest not thyself, but what
thou shouldst be. By mine honor, I pity thee; and thou mayst be as bitter
against me as thou wilt, and I forgive thee. But, I pray thee, let sweet
Fatziza alone. She is a woman, and doth not, like thy fellow-men, ever
mock thee with the presence of the comeliness of manly stature, which the
gods have denied to thee!'
The Hunchback stood still an instant, with a sad and heavy countenance,
as if the words of the blunt soldier had allayed his feelings as well as
displeased
him. At length he said, grasping his hand,
`I did seek to tamper with thee, and by exciting thy resentment against
the maiden, extend it to her brother, and even to them,  for to be tempted
to quit them and join me in what I contemplate, I know I must break thy
confidence in them both. But 't is past! Where is thy noble captain? I
would see him.'
`Did I not say thou wert by nature prone to evil?' said the soldier, with
something of self-approval in his tones; `thou wouldst make brothers
foes to bring about thine own purposes.'
`Where is thy captain?' demanded the dwarf, impatiently.
`In the ward-room of the armory thou wilt find him. The governor of
the arsenal is at his palace. He little suspects that his gay son hath turned
rebel, and all for love of a pretty maiden. His head hangs loosely on his
neck.'
`Lead me to him. I would see him,' said Hucha, peremptorily.
`More mischief. The gods give him wit to keep out of it. Yonder is the
door. Open it, and enter,' said the man-at-arms, pointing to the extremity
of the passage in which they were.
The Hunchback left him, and the next moment disappeared within the
apartment.
`There goes more generosity and manly spirit, by nature, than is in all
Mexico beside,' said the man-at-arms, fixing his gaze on the door the dwarf
had closed behind him. `But his heart is so warped and distorted by a way
he has of incessantly feeding upon his deformity, as if all men hated him for
it, and he felt himself bound to hate all mankind in return, that it is now
scarce less deformed than his body. He reminds me, with his fair smile,
of the Peruvian flower I have heard of, with a serpent concealed within its
leaves, and that strikes its fangs into those who longest nourish it. Hucha
has become, of late, most dangerous to his friends. He will do some injury
to Fatziza, or I know not his nature. I shall watch him, and warn her.'
With these words, the man-at-arms returned to the place from which he
had walked to listen to the address of Montezuma, whose voice he heard on
the balcony of the arsenal.
On closing the door of the room into which he had so unceremoniously
entered, Hucha found himself in an apartment of large size, the walls of
which were hung with every species of offensive and defensive armor.
Pieces of armor also lay about on the furniture, a helmet here and a cuirass
there, and the room altogether had an appearance of disorder easily
accounted
for from the present state of excitement, within as well as without the
arsenal. The only individual in the room was a young man, with a
strikingly
elegant person, who, with his head bare and his helmet in his hand,
was standing by one of the deep windows, looking out upon the crowd. His
air and address were those of a courtier. His attitude was easy and careless,
and singularly in contrast with the stirring events of the hour, and his
manner was as composed as if he were gazing from the lattice of a lady's
boudoir upon a pleasant garden of flowers. He turned his head slightly, as
the dwarf entered, and held his ear in that position an instant, as if he
expected
to be addressed. The Hunchback walked directly to the spot where
he stood, with such a quick, stern step, that he turned his head towards him,
and, on seeing him, started with an exclamation of surprise, and laid his
hand to his sword.
`How now? Who, in the name of Michtlan, art thou?'
`I carry my name on my back, my lord,' said Hucha, with that sarcastic
spirit which he was ever retorting upon himself, as if he took a morbid
pleasure in anticipating the derision which his sensitive spirit was ever
dreading, ever expecting from men.
`I have seen and heard of thee,' said the young man, in a tone of
indifference
,
real or assumed, and with a slight smile, that sharply wounded him.
`Thou art one of the leaders of this revolt. What is thy business with me?'
`Art thou acquainted with all the steps taken by the conspirators, and
their ultimate aim?' asked Hucha, without betraying his emotion.
`I have been told them by one Sismarqui. But, hark ye, sir Hunchback.
I would know which of you gallant gentlemen are to become our next
emperor
,
if this revolt be successful?'
Hucha looked at him with angry surprise and suspicion, and then
replied
,
`My lord, I had been told, and this state of things within and without the
gates of the arsenal seems plainly to show it, that thou hast given it thy
countenance.'
`And thou thy back. Marry! between the two it will have fair support.
Nay,' said the young man, laying his hand familiarly upon the dwarf's arm;
`I am careless, and meant nothing. Thou hast business with me. I will
hear thee.'
Hucha subdued his irritation; but before he spoke, fixed upon the face
of the young soldier one of those keen, searching, analyzing glances, peculiar
to him, when he would read the soul. Some suspicions, by no means
favorable
to the honesty of the young noble's professions of interest in the cause,
had entered his mind, and he sought to satisfy himself if he was to be trusted
further in it. The young noble, if he was really insincere, either felt that
he was being the subject of some such severe test, and prepared his features
to meet it, or else was truly sincere, and evinced it in his countenance; for
after a moment's steady and most piercing scrutiny, the dwarf took his eyes
from his face, and said,
`My lord, pardon me. I had doubted you. But I know not why I should,
after you have placed the arsenal in our hands. I know not what your
motives
really are in joining us, and giving us access to thousands of arms; but
they must, from your rank, be opposite to our own.'
`'T is merely for change,' said the youth, almost languidly. `Methinks
the emperor hath ruled long enough. We live but a little space on the
earth, and it is but fair each man should have the chance of being an
emperor
once in his life. For my part, I would have a new emperor every
day. What think you, good Hunchback?'
Hucha expressed his surprise at the young noble's sentiments and
inimitably
careless manner, by his countenance, and replied,
`My lord, we need
no
emperor. Rulers, elected for a limited time by the
people at large, should alone govern nations.'
`Perhaps so, sir Hunchback,' said the noble, weariedly; `but I have little
taste for politics. What would you say to me, for I wish to amuse myself
with looking out of the window.' There was an inward smile in the eyes
of the youth, and a singular expression about his mouth, that escaped the
penetration of the dwarf.
`My lord,' he said, `methinks you take but little interest in this matter, in
which you have so largely committed yourself. But your committal is proof
of your sincerity, and I trust you.'
`You are very kind, to be sure,' said the young noble, with a slight accent
of irony.
`My lord Ezquitl,' said Hucha, `I came hither to tell thee, that
Montezuma
,
the leader of the revolt, hath proved a traitor.'
`Ha! this is news.'
`The princess hath bought him, and he hath come hither to stay the people
with empty promises, that she will never espouse the prince; and will, on her
ascension to the throne, grant them all they could obtain by rebellion.'
`Now thou speakest like a man with matter on his mind,' said the noble,
with spirit. `Who brought this news?'
`Montezuma himself. I hear his voice now, addressing the people. See,
they disperse, with shouts for the empress,' he cried, going hastily to the
window. `My lord! my lord! one word from thee will bring them back.
One word from thee will stay this traitorous tide.'
`Patience, good Hunchback, patience,' said the young noble, returning
from the window, after glancing out, and satisfying himself of the truth of
the excited dwarf's words. If these have dispersed, let them go,  it will
be better for thee and them to-morrow. There be rebels still enow in
Mexico
for my purpose.'
`Thy purpose?'
`Did I not say  and
thine?
Well  for thine and mine.'
`My lord, you speak strangely,' said the dwarf, with displeasure.
`Look ye, sir knight of the shoulders,' said the young lord, with a quiet
tone of reproof, slightly touched with menace; `I have suffered, from one
of your degree, much freedom of speech. I have now let my patience of
endurance quite run out. If thou hast nothing further to communicate, I
would be alone, for I find my thoughts, at times, most excellent company.'
`I thought, my lord, you were to aid our party. You see it dissolve with
indifference.'
`I shall aid it, sir, but in my own way,' answered the young man, with
decision. `Thou wilt commend me to-morrow,' he added, ironically, `for
more energy and interest in this revolt than thou dost now give me credit for.
Ho! Why dost thou linger?'
The Hunchback, foiled and disappointed in the object he had in view, cast
upon him a hostile and vindictive glance, and left the apartment. The door
had no sooner closed, than the young noble's whole manner changed. His
languor gave place to energy; his carelessness to decision; his indifference to
the expression of intense feeling, and high and determined spirit. To
explain
all this, it will be necessary to go back a moment to the early part of
the evening, when Montezuma, on his return home from the quarter of the
lapidaries, spoke with the brother of Sismarqui, who was on guard in the
arch, and sought, through him, to get possession of the arsenal. The young
noble, who by night held charge of the armory for his father, the old lord
Esquitl, was, at the moment of their conference, descending the stairway
leading from the rooms above out into the arch, and was in the act of pushing
open the lower door, which was ajar, when the words of Montezuma arrested
him. The sentinel had stopped directly opposite the door, and so near it
that every word of their conversation reached his ear. He immediately
returned
to the guard-room, where the garrison did duty, and, assembling the
inferior officers, informed them of the contemplated revolt, and that Gila
would attempt to tamper with them.
`If he mentions it to you, at once accede to it. I have perfect confidence
in you, and feel that you, as well as the men-at-arms, will evince their
attachment
to me by following my wishes. It is my desire that you should
seem, with my consent, to give the arsenal into the hands of these rebels.'
The officers at once promised their obedience, and the young man then
addressed, in the same manner, in person, each soldier of the garrison. Gila,
therefore, had but little to do, when he commenced his mission among his
comrades. At length, to his surprise, the young noble himself, giving some
light cause for it, came forward and offered his own services and influence.
The young lord Esquitl then privately assumed the disguise of a serf, and
went forth among the populace, and by nine o'clock had informed himself of
all the intentions of the conspirators. Without further delay he then
returned
to the arsenal, ordered his officers to keep the severest vigilance, and
mounting his horse rode to the palace, sought the apartments of the
emperor
,
which he reached just after the prince had left it, and unfolded to him
the whole conspiracy.
`Now, your majesty,' he said, when he had completed his recital, `I pray
you, as the reward of my industry in this matter, leave the management of
it all to me. To-morrow morning you shall hear no more of it. Let not
the empire be involved in a civil war by any rash step. I am acquainted
with every intention and plan of the insurgents, and will meet them on their
own ground, and defeat them, with little loss of blood. Pray, your majesty,
grant my request.'
The emperor, pleased at the spirit and decision of the young noble, gave
his consent.
`Do as you will,' he said; `the safety of the empire is in your hands. You,
who have so well and ably detected the plan of the conspirators, will best
know how to defeat it.'
`Thanks, your majesty. May it please you to grant me written
commands
to your generals and captains of all the posts within the city, and at
the gates.'
`It shall be done.'
With these important orders in his hands, the young noble immediately
left the presence of the emperor. In one hour afterwards, thirty thousand
troops were silently in motion on the revolted side of the canal, and into
every garrison were thrown soldiers enough to maintain it. To preserve the
greater secrecy, every street through which they marched was at once
blockaded
,
and those who saw the troops in motion were, therefore, unable to report
it. By a private way, communicating between the armory and the second
bridge, he marched secretly three thousand men-at-arms, and made their
officers form them on the inside, around the walled area of this edifice. By
eleven o'clock every post likely to be attacked,  the gates, bridges, and
arsenal,  were in a state not only of defence, but were able to pour out
battalions, which, by their superior discipline, could easily rout any parties
of the insurgents that should assail them. From time to time, this
extraordinary
young man despatched couriers to the emperor, to inform him of the
progress of events.
Such was the mine over which the conspirators had been blindly moving,
during the latter part of the evening. Sismarqui himself had heard rumors
of troops in motion, but he received no certain intelligence, and, being in
expectation of such an event, though certainly on a smaller scale, from the
public nature of the conspiracy, he paid little regard to it. Montezuma
himself was at the palace, and had heard no rumor whatever, and was still
wholly ignorant he had such an able coadjutor in carrying out his own views
and those of the princess. The young noble, feeling, therefore, very cool
and confident in the event, placed himself by the window, in an easy, indolent
attitude, natural to him, to observe the multitude, resolved, when the signal
should be lighted on the summit of the temple, and the insurgents began to
assail the gates, before which they were now waiting, to let loose upon them
his three thousand men-at-arms, and cut them in pieces. He felt, indeed,
regret at the necessity of such a step; but, like all the nobles, he had little
sympathy for the serfs. When Hucha intruded into his presence, he
recognized
him, at a glance, as one of the leaders of the rebellion. Instantly,
and with great address, he assumed, to hide his true one, a character
wholly foreign to his own,  which he so well preserved throughout the
interview, as successfully to foil even the shrewd and suspicious scrutiny of
the Hunchback.
`How have I put that keen-eyed dwarf at fault, though my impatience
with the rebel serf had more than once made me betray myself,' he said, as
Hucha left the room. `Methinks I should make a good diplomatist, when I
get more years. I will suggest it to my pretty princess. Can this be true,
that he hath told me of her? The princess pledge herself to these scum and
offal of her empire, that she will not wed with Palipan  will pardon their
rank revolt, and give them, if they will wait till she is empress, a charter of
liberties! 'T is strange! How knew she of this rebellion? Or knowing
it, wherefore sent she for this Montezuma, instead of letting out upon them
half the army of the empire? 'T is beyond my brain's skill to get to the
bottom of it. It were easier far to get at the root of a deep revolt, and meet
it half way ere it come to head, than ask and answer why or wherefore a
woman does so or so. 'T is a hard nut! Well, I 'll leave it for to-morrow's
cracking. It would have been policy to have arrested these conspirators,
when within the arsenal; but then it were, I thought, deeper policy to let
them lead the rebels on, and so take them in the act of arms. This
Hunchback
I was tempted to detain, when I saw the rebels were dispersing; but
I feared I should but keep him out of some mischief he seemed to be bent
on, in which I pray he will get nothing less than a broken head.'
He approached the window as he ended, and glanced upon the deserted
street.
`So! that is better than if it was piled with their slain bodies. I am glad
this is likely to end without bloodshed, especially as the princess seems to
have taken it up in this light. But if my Hunchback friend can help it,
things will not go off so peaceably as they promise to. I will to my general
and his men-at-arms. The old soldier will growl to find there will be no
fighting. Nevertheless, I shall keep them under arms till day-light. The
elements of revolt have been too deeply and widely agitated, to subside all at
once throughout the city.'
At this moment, a lieutenant of the men-at-arms entered the room.
`Well, Hualpi?'
`Shall Gila be arrested?'
`Is he not? At once. The rogue's head shall answer his treason;
nought else.'
`Montezuma, the rebel chief, hath not long departed. The men, pleading
fear of death, did arrest him, as he went forth, hoping you would approve it,
lest he should do more mischief hereafter among the people, by his
influence
.'
`He is a brave fellow. I am glad he hath escaped. He should have
been one of us, but fortune hath given him cap and staff, instead of helmet
and sword.'
`He left with them this signet, for which they permitted him to depart,'
continued the officer, presenting the gem.
`It is the royal seal of the princess!' he exclaimed, looking at its face.
`He said the princess gave it him to show to the people, in testimony of
the truth of her words.'
`Ha! said the serf so? Then there is truth in this Hunchback's tale.
'T is most strange. Go, Hualpi, and see that the gates of the arsenal are
safely and strongly secured, and have this traitorous soldier put in chains.'
The officer departed, and the noble, fastening on his helmet, also
immediately
afterwards went out by an opposite door, which, by a broad flight of
steps, led to a vast court below. When he reached their foot, he found
himself
in the midst of a group of young knights and an elderly noble, while all
around the court were ranged, ten or twelve men deep, the numerous
men-at-arms
he had secretly conducted into the armory. They stood still and
motionless, like a forest of iron men. The moonlight fell upon the forms of
half of them, on one side of the court, leaving the other half standing in deep
shadow, cast by the frowning battlements around. The young man paused
an instant, to gaze upon a scene so impressive, and indulge the martial
feelings
it kindled in his breast, and then approached the venerable commander
of the legion, who stood within a few feet of the foot of the stairs.
`My noble general,' he said, `I fear we shall have little work for the
men-at-arms
to-night. The revolt is likely to pass off peaceably.'
4
`Pray the gods it may,' answered he. `I have never seen good to either
come of dissensions between the people and their prince. What is the
change?'
`It seems the princess hath early discovered that a conspiracy threatened
the state, and sent to have an interview with the young Montezuma.'
`This was good policy,' said the old noble.
`It was, perhaps, for a woman, and this young rebel leader is a proper
youth for a woman's eye,' he said, smiling.
`Young man, remember you speak of the princess,' replied the general, in
a reproving tone. `What was the result?'
`That he told her, probably, the causes of the revolt, and she speedily sent
him back, bidding him tell the people they should, on her accession to the
throne, have every privilege they desired.'
`She forgot the prince, who will then be emperor,' said the old noble,
shaking his head.
`Nay, she bade him say to them, that she had resolved not to espouse
Prince Palipan, and would reign sole empress.'
`What proof have you of this, beyond this young man's words?'
`This signet. It is her own, given him to show to the people.'
`It is strange news.'
`What is stranger, the insurgents,  some two thousand in number,  that
now filled the street, have quietly dispersed.'
`'T is the princess' royal signet, surely,' repeated the noble, taking and
again examining it. `Well, I know not what to make of it. The prince
discarded! What saith the emperor?'
`He cannot know it. I have seen him within three hours,  at least, he
spoke not of it.'
`And the prince?'
`I have not seen him to-night.'
`The revolt, then, is ended without bloodshed,' said the old noble. `T 'is
best it should be so. The people, it is true, are something oppressed, and
doubtless the princess will rule them kindly. Ha! what light is that?'
he cried, as the whole court was suddenly lightened.
`Ho, sentinel! what ho!' shouted the young noble, to a man on the
battlements
.
`A bright flame on the altar of the Temple of War,' was the loud reply.
`It is the signal of revolt, lighted by some party that know not of this
message from the princess, or the serf's tale hath been a ruse to bring about
some deep plot,' cried the young man. `Hark! there thunders the
tlalonzon
.
The alarm is fairly sounded. To horse, knights! Press forward to
the temple with the legions.'
The court of the armory was instantly in motion,  knights were
leaping into their saddles, or riding here and there marshalling their
divisions
,
the gates were thrown open, and, headed by the old noble, the
columns poured forth into the street, and separating, marched in two parties
by different routes, in the direction of the still brightly blazing signal fire.
On gaining the street, the young lord Ezquitl, accompanied by half a dozen
young knights, galloped on ahead of the troops, too impatient to arrive on the
scene, to await the heavier and slower movements of the men-at-arms.
CHAPTER IV.
THE SIGNAL FIRE.
Hucha
quitted the apartment of the young noble with the bitterest feelings
of resentment rankling in his heart at the severe treatment he had got from
him, and vowed future revenge. But a deeper feeling than any merely
personal considerations now held the control of his mind. From the first
moment of incipient revolt, he had given himself to the cause with the truest
and loftiest patriotism. His heart bled for his country, and his self-love had
received too many wounds from the nobility to let him rest content with his
own condition, without some attempt to improve it. Every energy of his
energetic character, therefore, he freely devoted to the cause he had espoused,
and he had looked only to the end originally proposed, for success. When
the proposition of the princess fell on his ear, his fiery spirit at once rose
against any such species of temporizing in a matter which he felt must then,
and by arms, be decided, or the opportunity would be lost forever. His
singular sagacity, sharpened by habitual jealousy, had enabled him to detect
the true motive, (at least, a very strong one,) that prompted Montezuma to
adopt the pacific measures suggested by the princess. He knew not,
however
,
how far his feelings were interested in obeying her, or he would not
have hesitated to have plunged his danger into his heart, when he proposed
the submission. Montezuma himself dared not look too closely into his own
motives, and felt conscious that they could ill bear the scrutiny of others less
interested than himself.
Satisfied that his country and her awakened liberties were about to be
sacrificed
,
if not betrayed, Hucha resolved, if but one blow was struck for the
cause to which he had given his heart and consecrated his life, he himself
would strike it. On leaving Montezuma and the two other conspirators, it
was his intention to retire from the arsenal and at once lift the standard of
revolt, in a part of the city which would not, for some time, learn the
proposals
of the princess. As he came out of the door, he saw Gila, and at once
conceived the idea of getting him to join him, as the presence of a
man-at-arms
,
as well as the influence he had as a citizen with his fellows, would
contribute greatly to his success. He was defeated, however, by the blunt
honesty of the soldier, and thence, for the same purpose, sought the young
lord Esquitl. The reception he met with in this quarter was such as to give
no opportunity of communicating his exact intentions and wishes, and he was
compelled to depart as he came.
Without further delay, or addressing any one, he took his way swiftly
along the passage; but, to avoid a group of soldiers standing near the head
of the arch stair-case, from whom he imagined he should receive some
in-insult
,
and possibly be detained,  instead of keeping on to the end, he
instinctively
turned aside into a window that opened upon a terrace. At the
extremity of it he saw a tree that could be reached by a light bound. He
hastily traversed the terrace towards it, and without hesitation sprung into
the branches, and by the trunk swiftly descended to the earth. The spot
where he alighted was on the left of the crowd, who were in motion towards
their homes. Without speaking to any one, he glided swiftly along the dark
side of the lane, and soon came into the net-maker's street. Here he paused
an instant, as if prompted to enter the dwelling of Montezuma, with his gaze
on the balcony and window of Fatziza's chamber, as if his thoughts were
associated with the maiden. But the next instant, he pursued his way in
the direction of the armorer's street, muttering,
`'T will be time enough by-and-by! Sismarqui shall never wear that
gem in his bosom, if I have to despoil it with my own hand. Ha! there are
shouts in the direction of the armorers' quarter. There are some men yet
to be found in Mexico, that will not longer wear the yoke of bondage.'
Confused cries, growing louder and louder as he advanced, caused him
almost to fly; for he distinguished the words, `Liberty, and no empress.'
The next moment he was in the street before the armorers' shop, where a
thousand men were gathered.
`Liberty, and no empress!' he shouted, in a voice that rose clear and
strong above the tumult.
Every eye was turned upon him, and his name was repeated by a
hundred
voices. At a glance, he saw that Inisquini, the old sword-maker, who
stood in his door, had been communicating to them the will of the princess,
and that the majority were opposed to it. The whole multitude were armed
with pikes or swords, and every man had a shield on his arm, which he had
taken from the shops of the armorer and sword-maker. The actual
possession
of arms had given them a warlike spirit, and rendered them reluctant to
lay them aside; the multitude which Montezuma had addressed were
unarmed
,
and, therefore, had more readily embraced the terms he proposed.
The Hunchback saw at once the advantage this spirit offered; and, while
the sword-maker was yet speaking, cried aloud, as he advanced within a few
feet of him,
`My friends and brothers, the old man is a traitor. Montezuma, your
chosen leader, has betrayed us to the emperor. Let us act without them
both. I will lead you on to freedom, and
thus
do I consecrate my sword to
the sacred cause, in a traitor's blood!'
With these words, he sheathed his sword in the heart of the old man. There
was a cry of horror from some that stood around and beheld the deed, but it
was instantly drowned by a fierce cry of exultation, and the air rang with
shouts of
`Death to all traitors! Down with the emperor and nobles! Long live
Hucha!'
`Forward to the Temple of War!' cried the dwarf, taking advantage of
their enthusiasm. `Let us light the signal fires, and proclaim liberty as far
as its light shall be seen.'
He hastened forward as he spoke, followed by the insurgents, shouting
their insurrectionary cries, and striking their swords upon their shields.
After turning from the street of the armorers, he led them across a square,
their numbers increasing as they moved onward, and came to a short, steep
street, that at the top terminated in a lofty flight of marble steps, which led
to a circular temple of red stone, surrounded by a lofty colonnade. On its
flat summit was an altar to the god Huitziltli, which was gained by a spiral
stairway, ascending from the centre of the temple. On this altar was
sacrifice
offered morning and evening, and upon it was now laid the wood and
combustible materials for the next sacrifice. Hucha pointed with his gory
sword upward to the majestic temple:
`There is the altar of liberty, fellow-slaves. Let us light there the pyre
of our fallen chains. Onward!'
In the steep passage to the temple, at the foot of the steps, stood a party
of some threescore young men, whose number completely filled the way.
They waited unmoved the approach of the insurgents, until the Hunchback,
at their head, got within a few feet of them. One of them, armed lightly
with a sword, a tortoise shield rimmed with silver, and a low steel cap upon
his head, then stepped towards him.
`Hucha, welcome!' he said, with animation; `but where is Montezuma?
What means the multitude, that they come hither? 'T is but a temple, and
Montezuma and ourselves were to seize and hold it.'
`Montezuma is a traitor!' cried Hucha, fiercely.
`Who hath said it?' demanded the young man, menacingly.
`He hath confessed it. The princess hath bought him.'
`'T is false!' cried the young man, resolutely. `Montezuma is no traitor.
Nay  keep back, Hucha! He hath appointed us to this post, to await his
coming. No man shall enter it, save he.'
`Ha! this is strange, Inzecan,' said the Hunchback, with concentrated
rage in the steady tones with which he spoke.'
`What is thy purpose here?' asked the youth, quietly and firmly.
`To light the signal fire, and proclaim the birth of freedom.'
`No man's hand shall light it but Montezuma's. We have sworn to him
to abide here until he shall appear, and to let no man kindle the altar until
he commands it. He is our chief.'
`I tell thee he is a traitor. Leave the way open to the temple.'
`And I tell thee thou art not Montezuma's friend, as thy words prove.
None save his friends enter here.'
`Inzecan,' said the Hunchback, impressively, `let not the first blood be
spilled among ourselves.'
`Thou hast blood glistering wet on thy blade. Whose is it?'
`A traitor's!'
`Ha, Montezuma's!' cried the young man, seizing him by the throat.
`An equal traitor,  Inisquini, the sword-maker.'
`Assassin!' he cried, flinging him from him.
The Hunchback recovered himself, and turning to the insurgents, who
had hitherto been passive, cried in deep rage,
`My friends, shall we let this beardless stripling stand in our path to
freedom
?
The gods have willed that we must first hew our way through traitors.
Onward, to the temple!'
The young man made a signal to his party, and the whole breadth of the
narrow avenue was at once taken possession of by them, and with ready
weapons they stood prepared to receive the assailants. The dwarf waved his
sword to the insurgents, who had caught his spirit, and leaped forward like
a tiger, with a fierce cry, upon the young leader. The van of the revolters
pressed closely behind him, and the two parties were at once engaged in
terrific and deadly combat. For a few minutes the fight seemed equal, and
neither party gave or gained ground. Many fell on both sides; and at
length the number of the young men became sensibly diminished, while, for
those who fell of the attacking party, there were numbers ready to supply
their places. Finally, the defenders of the temple and friends of Montezuma
became reduced to so small a number, that they could no longer fill with
their front the width of the avenue, and they gave way, retreating up the
steps of the temple. They, however, were nearly all slain by the infuriated
revolters ere they gained the top, where their captain made a stand, singly
and unsupported, against Hucha, who, covered with blood, had pressed him,
during the fight, with a vindictiveness of purpose, that would only be satisfied
with his life. This, at length, he obtained; and drawing forth his ensanguined
steel as the youth fell, the last of his band, he waved it above his head, and
shouted, `Victory! So perish all enemies of freedom, and all friends of
Montezuma!' The insurgents were now hastening towards the steps
leading
to the altar, when he cried, commandingly,
`Hold, each of you! No hand but mine shall light the altar-fire. Remain
thou here, and when you see its flame, lift up your voices to the gods!'
With these words, he passed through their midst, as they silently gave
way before him, by their submission singularly acknowledging the supremacy
of the superior mind of the dwarf, who, by its energy alone, had exerted
such wonderful influence over them. Slowly and solemnly the successful
revolter ascended the winding steps in the interior of the temple, and at
length disappeared from every uplifted gaze upon the lofty elevation. A
deep murmur passed through the multitude, succeeded by a profound waiting
awe.
The summit of the Temple, on which the Hunchback appeared, was a
circular area, nearly flat, enclosed by battlements, in the form of niches, and
ornamented with many stone figures of serpents. It was curiously paved,
with smooth polished stones, of various colors, and contained in the centre a
square altar of black marble, supported by four sculptured lions. In front
of the altar, between two beams, was suspended a vast round shield, covered
with innumerable martial devices. From an opening beneath the altar, the
dwarf made his appearance upon the top.
His first act, on gaining this spot, was solemnly to lay his sword and
shield at the base of the altar, and fall prostrate on his face. He remained
in this posture a few seconds, and then rising, took up his arms, and
ascending
the altar by five steps, laid them upon the wood and combustible
materials that were piled upon it, saying,
`Thus, ye sacred gods! and thou warlike Huitziltli, whose aid I crave, do
I make an offering of the sword and shield of liberty. Consecrate them with
fire, and return them to me, that, bearing them in this war, I may be
invincible
and victorious!'
He then walked around the altar, where, in a brazen tripod, within a
niche, was kept the sacred fire. Beside it sat a venerable priest, in white
vestments, wearing upon his hoary locks a steel helmet, and holding in his
hands a two-edged sword, having an iron head like a hammer.
`Who art thou, young man?' he asked, without emotion or surprise;
`and wherefore have you visited the Temple of Huitziltli?'
`To pay my vows, sacred priest, and to kindle the altar fire!
`Pure vows are ever welcome to the god! But thou art not a knight?
What hast thou to do with vows to the god of warriors?' he asked, gazing
upon him with surprise.
`Old man,' said the Hunchback, impatiently, `I have no time to answer
questions. Give me thy torch, that I may kindle it at thy sacred lamp, and
light the altar!'
`Wherefore these strange words? There is commotion among the people,
and I have heard, as I watched this holy flame, shrieks, and shouts, and
noise of battle. What is the evil that hath come upon the city?'
`Not evil, but good! Liberty hath descended from the skies, and I would
here sacrifice to her. Stand aside, old man!' he said, sternly.
`Do the people revolt?'
`They have risen in their might, as one man, to obtain the gift of nature,
and of the gods! Stand aside, for I would not harm thee.'
`Wilt thou do sacrilege?' cried the priest with sternness, mingled with
horror.
`Nay  if thou wilt, give me thy torch and let me light it!'
`Back, young man!' cried the priest, rising from his seat before the
niche, which for centuries had been thus guarded; `I am a priest of the
temple and of the altar!'
`And I the possessor of the temple and altar,' answered the dwarf.
`Give me thy torch. I have no time to dally with thee!'
The priest replied by laying his torch for kindling the morning sacrifice
in the niche beside the burning lamp, and presenting his sword across his
person, as if to guard the sacred fire. This attitude, assumed by him,
inflamed
the resentment of the dwarf, already familiar with blood and outrage,
and throwing himself upon the priest, he wrested the sword from him, and,
dragging him to the altar, slew him with his own sword, and, with
supernatural
strength, cast him upon it. The next instant, the sacred pile was
in a blaze; and, with the iron head of the sword he sounded loudly, upon
the shield swung before it, the tocsin of war.
Then, snatching his sword and shield from the altar, he sprang upon the
battlements, and waved it in the presence of the thousands below. The air
was filled with an answering shout, that made the solid temple tremble
beneath him. He remained an instant before their eyes, appearing to them
as if standing in the flame, and then descended. The fire he had lighted
burned brighter and fiercer as it seized upon the vestments and body of the
priest, and shone for leagues over the city, displaying, like noon-day, its
temples, bridges, encircling walls and towers, and far-distant lake.
On arriving below among his party, he made a signal to address them.
`The first step is taken,' he cried aloud; `there is now no room for retreat.
We must overthrow the empire, or be ourselves crushed! To the first
bridge, and let us attack it! Thence to the palace! Give no quarter to
knight nor noble, for they will not spare you!'
`To the palace!' was the answering cry of the insurgents, who had now
increased to full seven thousand men, filling the temple, the steps, and
avenue to it, and all the square below.
Placing himself at the head of those about him, and naming others for
leaders to marshal the rest, the Hunchback left the Temple, and descended
towards the square. It was filled with a confused and irresolute multitude,
variously armed, and swaying to and fro, as one self-elected leader cried one
thing, and another another. The presence of the dwarf among them gave
rise to opposite emotions.
`Live the brave Hucha!' cried some.
`Down with the Hunchback,' answered others. `Montezuma! Sismarqui!
where are they!'
`No Montezuma! no traitors!' replied the party about the dwarf,
menacingly.
Amid these conflicting cries, the young Lord Esquitl and his friends
galloped
into the square, and, sword in hand, attacked the outskirts of the
multitude
.
Here the most dire dismay and confusion ensued, for many standing
there were unarmed, and, as yet, rather interested spectators than actors in
the scene. They gave way before the furious attack of the young cavaliers
who pressed through them towards the elevated part of the square, where,
by the clear light, the noble beheld the person of the dwarf, who with voice
and gesture, was endeavoring to inspire those who gave way before their
charge to make a stand.
`They are but half a score!' he cried, with scorn and anger. `Strike
them down! They are knights! bear them to the ground! They are your
masters, slaves! Unhorse and trample them in the dust!'
Some of the insurgents, as they came nearer, made a show of resistance;
but as knight and horse were all clad in complete armor, they made no
impression
upon them. On all sides they were compelled to give way, and
the horsemen at length reached the spot where the Hunchback stood,
surrounded
by about eight hundred resolute men, who remained firm, as if
resolved to receive the charge.
`These look more determined,' said the young noble: `but let us at them.
I have a particular desire to have further acquaintance with my friend of
the hump-back!'
`By the gods! it is the false knight, Ezquitl that leads them,' cried the
dwarf, hearing these words. `So, wait not for their charge! Why stand
you still? We are revolters, and our business is to advance and strike, not
stand and ward!'
He pressed forward as he spoke, and caught the horse of the knight by
the bit, while, with his sword, he aimed a blow at his helmet. His followers,
inspired by his words and example, also attacked the other knights, with
indescribable
fury, six or seven assailing a single one, so that they were well
nigh overpowered, and borne to the ground, by the weight and number of
their opponents. At length one of them fell beneath the blows of a
battle-axe
,
in the hands of a huge smith, and one or two others with difficulty
warded the strokes that thickly fell upon them from a score of arms. So
determined were the insurgents, that a few moments longer would not have
left a knight upon his horse, when, from the eastern entrance to the square,
was heard the sound of a score of war-trumpets, and the well known
battle-cry
of men-at-arms.
`Now, sir Hunchback! thou hast run thy brief race,' cried the young
noble, who had been contending for his life with the dwarf and half a score
of others.
`Traitorous noble! would to the gods I had struck thee to the heart in
thy room,' said Hucha, seeing column after column pour into the square
from different streets. `I deserve this, for being such a fool as to be
deceived by thee!'
In an instant the work of slaughter began. Hucha left the knight, and
threw himself among the insurgents, and animated them to resistance.
`It is but death now, or death to-morrow! Let us die nobly!'
But in vain their faint struggles of resistance. A few fought bravely, and
died where they fought. But all in vain! The men-at-arms swept the
square like a besom. Hucha threw himself upon one of the fallen cavaliers'
horses, and galloped from point to point, to rally them. But his voice had
lost its power. His influence had failed to govern them. Fear  terror
universal dismay, alone prevailed. The bravest of the insurgents were
panic-struck by the consternation of their fellows, and, taking the
contagion
,
fled equally with them. So sudden and total was the dispersion of
the seven thousand serfs that a few minutes before filled the square, that not
one hundred remained, save the dead and dying, that literally strewed the
ground. This party of one hundred, headed by Hucha, retreated to the
entrance of the temple, where, for an instant, they made a stand.
The old general of the legion now came up to the spot where the young
noble was assisting one of his unhorsed companions to rise.
`They have served you rightly, my lord,' he said sternly. `It was
madness
,
with so small a party, to rush into the midst of thousands of infuriated
men.'
`They were but serfs, my lord!'
`They have shown themselves to have the power to slay. Alas! Here
are four young nobles lifeless by your temerity.'
`My noble general, I did but my duty. I knew you would be up to
sustain
me with the men-at-arms. I pray you, my lord, call off the pursuit,' he
added, as the men-at-arms, in small divisions, followed the fugitives through
the several streets. Yonder is the head of the revolt! See, he has leaped
from his stolen horse, and is flying upwards to the temple, with the remnant
of his party. Stay, my lord; he is my prisoner! Let him be taken alive!'
he cried, as a detachment of soldiers were sent by the general towards the
temple.
They reached the steps before Hucha and his friends could gain the
portico; who, seeing that all was lost, here made his final stand. The
men-at-arms had already engaged with them, when the young noble rode up,
and called upon the insurgents to lay down their arms.
`Nay  listen not to the false knight!' cried Hucha; `let us die here
like men, if we have lived slaves!'
`Lay down your arms, and surrender your leader, and I promise you
pardon, in the name of the Emperor, by mine honor as a knight.'
`The men-at-arms paused, and the insurgents looked, with but one feeling,
upon the dwarf. He looked scornfully and haughtily around upon them,
and seemed to await their decision.
`Your reply  death or pardon?' demanded the young man, sternly.
`Pardon,' cried the revolters, casting their arms at the feet of the
men-at-arms
,
and kneeling upon the steps of the temple.
Hucha looked round upon them with a countenance of grief and contempt,
and then, lifting his hands to the skies, cried impressively,
`I do devoutly thank the gods that these slaves have not been made free
by my hand! Slaves they have been  slaves they have this night shown
themselves to be  and slaves they will ever remain! The gods, in
defeating
this rebellion, have shown themselves wiser than they who set it on
foot. My lord, I give you up my sword! I hoped with it to free my
country  but I have found her unworthy of freedom, and do only regret I
should have believed liberty and honor to have their abode in the bosoms
of bondmen. The gods, I find, have fixed the destinies of all mankind, and
't is not for men to change them. Take my sword, my lord. I drew it
with the prayer that my countrymen might be free. I lay it down with the
prayer that they may continue slaves! Once more, do I devoutly thank the
gods for saving the empire from the despotism of bondmen, who so love
their chains, that they would have entwined with them the pillars of their
palaces, and wreathed them about the imperial sceptre they would have
usurped!'
With these words the insurgent leader gave his sword to the young noble,
whom his lofty language and manner had inspired with admiration and
respect.
VOL. II. 5
`If ever revolt could have succeeded, it would have been with a man like
thee at the head,' he said, with warmth. `I know not which feeling is
uppermost
in my mind, pity for these, thy traitorous companions, who have
now shrunk beneath thy withering words, or admiration for thyself, who, at
such a time, can speak so boldly, and maintain thy fallen condition so well.
Thou shalt be borne prisoner to the emperor's castle; but fear not,  I will
befriend thee.'
`Fear! My lord, I have no fears, save that I shall be suffered to live.
I have seen my bosom friends turn traitors, and my companions in arms
prove false to themselves and to me. I have lived long enough on earth.
I would see if there be liberty in yonder glittering empire of the gods.'
`Guard him to the castle by the palace, and see that he lays not hands on
his life, and that he be not illy-entreated,' said the noble.
The insurgent leader was then placed in the midst of a detachment of
soldiers, conducted by an officer, and led away. In a few moments
afterward
,
the general of the legion rode up to the young nobleman, and informed
him of the total discomfiture of the rebels, and that, save dead men lying in
the streets, no signs of an insurgent was to be seen.'
In a short time afterward, the troops returned to the square, from their
slaughter
,
rather than victory, and the young lord Esquitl, their general, and a party
of cavaliers, preceded them to the armory. The garrisons in the other quarters
of the city, on seeing the signal-fire blazing from the temple, and hearing the
tocsin of alarm sounded on the war-shield, having had instructions to make no
movement forth, but remain and defend the posts, if assailed, strictly obeyed
the order, though aware a fierce conflict was raging in the neighborhood of
the temple of Huitziltli. The quarter of the lapidaries was commanded by
a stationary garrison, which the insurgents of that district had seen
augmented
by four thousand men, which at ten o'clock silently passed through their
street, taking possession of it as they moved on towards the post. Here,
therefore, there was no outbreak, even at the sound of the tocsin,
although
this point promised, early in the evening, to be the chief seat of the
revolt, under the immediate direction of Montezuma. This the observing
and sagacious young noble had learned while in disguise, and so formed his
plans and gave his instructions, as, by the movement and disposition of his
troops, effectually to awe any insurrectionary spirit, that might be ready to
break out. The result, as well as the issue of the whole revolt, bore
testimony
to his sagacity and military judgment. On arriving at the armory,
he selected three young knights and twenty men-at-arms to accompany him
on what he said would be a brief expedition, and, if successful, wholly
terminate
the rebellion. On assembling them, he rode rapidly at their head in
a direction opposite to that from which he had just come.
CHAPTER V.
THE VISION OF THE KINGS.
When
Montezuma parted from Sismarqui, beneath the arch-way of the
arsenal, he walked forward at a rapid pace in the direction of the ruined
palace of Axusco, where he had left the Peruvian knight. It was within a
few minutes of midnight, and he was fearful, that, impatient for the signal,
the knight might in person rouse the quarter of the lapidaries, and thus, by
leading them into open revolt, defeat his purpose in hastening forward. After
traversing several streets without meeting with any one, he came in sight of
the dilapidated and ruinous mansion of the exiled noble. The moonlight shone
softly down upon its moss-grown roofs and ivy-clad columns, upon its ruinous
towers and stately marble porticos and colonnades, and presented a soft and
lovely, but sad and touching scene. He paused an instant, to contemplate
it and reflect upon the fallen glory of the proud family, of which it was so
striking an emblem; and then crossing the street towards its grass-grown
entrance, passed into its court. The knight's horse was cropping the rank
weeds not far from him. Fallen columns were strewn around; trees, that
had returned to their forest wildness, cast their shadows upon him; and
fountains without water stood silently amid the court, the white statues that
adorned them appearing like the spirits of the departed inhabitants holding
vigils over the desolated grandeur. He walked sadly but rapidly forward
through the court, and approached the wing in which he had seen the knight
disappear. He was about to ascend the broken steps, when his eye fell
upon a group of men, standing within the shadow of a column of the portico.
They at the same moment beheld him, and approached him.
`Welcome, Montezuma,' said one of them, whom he recognized as one
of the chiefs that had met in his house, and for whom he had appointed this
rendezvous, and which now, for the first time since then, occurred to him.
His object hither had been only to see the knight, and dissuade him from
the revolt. His heart sunk within him the thought he should have
to do over again the same work he had done at the armory.
`You are welcome, my friends. I see you are at the rendezvous
promptly.'
`How goes the sacred cause?' asked one, with animation.
`'T is time for action,' said another, grasping his sword.
`My brave friends, I am pained for your sakes, to tell you, that the
conspiracy
is known at the palace. We must defer it till another day. It will
not answer to rise in arms to-night. I have spoken with a large party of
our friends, who agree with me, and have retired to their homes. It is the
safest.'
This communication was received with exclamations of surprise and
regret.
`Alas, our liberties are lost, I fear,' said the chief who had first spoken.
`Nay,' said Montezuma, with animation; `the princess hath sent word,
having learned of our intended revolt, that she marries not the prince; and
on ascending the throne as empress, will grant us whatever charter of
liberties
we may desire. This is better than rebellion.'
`The princess is good and generous,' said one; `but I fear she promises
more than the nobles will let her perform.'
`I am willing to trust her, my friends,' said Montezuma, warmly; `and
should she refuse to ratify her promise to us, we can then take arms.'
`Be it so. You are our leader, and have at heart the good of every
Mexitlian
bondman,' they replied, with ready assent.
`This willingness, on your part, my brave friends,' said the young man,
with feeling, `to wait the decision of your princess, is a far greater evidence
of your patriotism and love for your country than heading this rebellion
would have been. I pray you, on your way to your homes, do all in your
power to allay the spirit of revolt among the people. In a few days, we
will all be freer by the princess' hand, than we could have been by our
swords.'
He here took leave of the conspirators, after a few more words of caution
against listening to those who should be obstinately disposed to carry on the
insurrection.
`I have got through this disagreeable duty far easier than I
anticipated
,'
he said, looking after them as they left the ruins. `I do believe,
from the willingness with which I have undertaken the duty of
suppressing
this incipient movement, that I regard the will of the sweet
princess more than the liberties of my fellow-bondmen. But I feel
I am no longer a bondman. The extraordinary favor of the princess
hath ennobled me, and raised me above my condition, I already feel.
I
have
no reason now to be an insurgent. No, no. The ironical Hucha was half
way to the truth when he denominated me a traitor. Can there be a stronger
motive offered to any man for treachery than that I have held out to me,
even the love of my royal mistress? Does she indeed love me?' he
suddenly
asked himself. `That I love her I can no longer question; but may
she not have been mocking me? May she not have trifled with my
passion
,
so unpardonably daring as it is; and, the better to win me to put down
the rebellion that threatened her throne with annihilation, profess a tender
regard for me that she never felt? It may indeed be so. Reason tells me
it should be so. But  no, no. My heart tells me better. There was too
much sincerity,  too much truth of feeling there! I will believe as my
heart, not as my head would.'
With this decision,  for the more he had reflected upon the extraordinary
interview he had held with the princess, the more he marvelled, doubted,
and questioned,  he ascended the steps to the portico of the ruin, and
entered
the building. The hall was partly open to the sky, and the light of
the moon fell through many a crevice, and between tall columns, upon the
tessellated floor, like beams of silver, lighting up the places where it shone
with intense brightness, and leaving the remainder of the interior in
impenetrable
darkness.
With uncertain steps, he picked his way through the central hall, and
advanced
towards the wing in which the knight said he should be found. The
beams of the moon penetrating the gallery into which he entered, through a
distant open door, directed his steps, and he pursued his way thither with
such speed as was consistent with safety in an unknown and perilous
pathway
.
On coming to the door, he pushed it open, and beheld a sight that
filled him with amazement and fear. The room had been formerly the
domestic
temple dedicated to the tutelar gods of the family. It was large and
lofty, ornamented with carved work in stone, and contained a single window,
through which the moon shed a brilliant light directly upon an altar beneath
it. On this altar was stretched, at full length, like an effigy of steel, upon a
tomb, the Peruvian knight. His hands were crossed upon his breast, and
his feet were composed together. His visor was up, and his face was cold
and stern and silent as death. Montezuma shuddered; but his gaze rested
not long on this spectacle. Beside the altar, and between himself and the
knight, he beheld a being,  he knew not whether mortal or spirit,  like a
young female. She was of the most wonderful beauty of face, and her
symmetrical
figure was inconceivably light and elegant, and seemed to swim in
the moonbeam rather than tread the earth. Her hair was dark as sable, and
floated softly about her pearly shoulders, and her features were shaped with
exquisite delicacy. Coal black eye-brows contrasted with the singular
brightness of her complexion, and her eyes were large,  very, very large,
and so very, very black, that they seemed to be the hiding-places of
Night. Nothing could be more exquisitely formed than her hands and feet,
nothing more graceful than her figure. She was attired in a flowing
scarf of silver tissue, with a
mitla
of azure silk reaching below the knee.
A veil, shining and looking like a wreath of mist, floated about her shoulders.
She wore sandals of white
itzli
upon her feet; and in her hair, fastened, he
could not see how, an emerald, that bore some device. In her hand she
held a light wand, with a gem, of singular color and luminous appearance, at
the extremity. As Montezuma entered, she was leaning lightly and
gracefully
upon it, and gazing upon the prostrate knight, with her profile turned
towards him.
He stood, transfixed to the spot, and gazed upon her with surprise and
admiration, mingled with superstitious fears. She turned upon him her
eyes, which, though so very large and black, were sparkling with light, like
the midnight firmament with its stars, and smiled. Yet he thought her
look was the most touchingly melancholy he had ever conceived of. She
smiled upon him again, rather with her look than her lips, and beckoned him
towards her. He obeyed irresistibly, and advanced to the altar. She took his
hand in hers, and looked softly up in his face; and he then saw that she
wept. He believed her to have been a spirit of moonbeams, till he touched
her hand, which was like velvet, and warm with life; but then there was
something about her eyes, that he did not think of this world, and her robes
and veil, like the wings and plumage of a bird, seemed to be a portion of
herself. He was perplexed and bewildered. There were tears in her eyes.
They appealed to his heart. They almost convinced him she was a woman.
But he doubted, though he felt her pulse throbbing in the hand that held and
warmed his. He was about to speak,  for his eyes rested on the
recumbent
knight,  and he wished to ask wherefore he saw him in this situation.
She touched his lips with her wand, and he found speech sealed up in his
mouth. He commended himself to the gods in his spirit, and waited the
issue.
`Prince,' she said, addressing him in a voice of the most thrilling
sweetness
,
such as he had never before listened to, `I have long waited for thee.'
Montezuma would have replied to her, that he was not the prince; but
he could not move his lips.
`I have need of thy services. Wilt thou obey me?' she continued,
mournfully fixing her eyes upon his face.
He silently pressed the fingers that held his own.
`Follow me.'
She moved away with a light, floating motion, as if she used her feet
rather to add grace to motion than to sustain her form upon the ground, and
entering a closet, descended a narrow staircase, that led to the vaults beneath
the ruin. He followed her in silence; and, although the moonlight did not
penetrate the place into which they had entered, he found no difficulty in
moving forward, for her form shed a kind of soft light around her, as if the
radiance of the moonbeams, in which she had been standing, still lingered
about her person. He descended the stone stairs after her, marvelling where
this event would end; and, although assured he was led by a being of
unearthly
nature, curiosity took the place of fear in his bold heart. At the foot
of the staircase commenced a labyrinthine gallery, which, with a slight
downward inclination, led below the foundations of the palace. In a sort
of circular hall at its extremity stood, upon a pedestal, a black marble statue
of a knight. She stopped before it; and, turning round to him, spoke for
the first time since she had left the upper palace.
`Behold the statue of Nopaltzin, the last monarch of the Mexitili!' she
said, fixing upon him, as she spoke, an impressive look.
Montezuma instantly uncovered his head, and knelt reverently before it.
She beheld the act of reverence and honor with a countenance expressive
of the intensest pleasure.
`The spirit of thy race yet lives in thee,' she cried. `Thy lips are
unsealed
!'
With these words, she touched his mouth with the reversed end
of her wand.
`Wherefore am I conducted hither, fair spirit?' he asked, rising to his
feet.
`Knowest thou the fate of this monarch, before whose statue thou hast
done reverence?'
`He was the last of a race of kings, whose founder was the celestial
Prince of the Sun. He fell by the sword of the first Emperor Aztec, who
took possession of his throne, and whose descendant now sits upon it. 'T is
seven centuries since.'
`Thou hast spoken truly, prince,' she said, pleased.
`Nay  I am no prince.'
`Answer me not,' she said, sternly. `Do I not know thou art
Montezuma
,
son of Mahco, the net-maker!'
`I am, therefore, a bondman,' he answered bitterly.
`Dost thou love thy bondage?'
`Am I not a man  a descendant of the free Mexitilians? Seven
centuries
have not extinguished the memory of the glory of our ancestors.'
`This is the language that I would hear from thy lips. Come with me,
and I will show thee thy destiny  that thou mayest have confidence
towards
her whom thou lovest.'
`Ha! do you know this?' he asked, with surprise.
She made no reply for a moment, and then said to him in a solemn voice,
`Montezuma, the genius of thy country and of thy race hath been
awakened
this night. The end of the Aztec race is nigh! A prince from the
loins of Nopaltzin shall within seven days sit upon the throne of the empire,
and the Mexitili shall be free.'
`Doth the princess die then?' he demanded, with painful interest.
`Nay  but what I say will, nevertheless, come to pass.'
`There lives none of the royal race of Acolhuan, that once ruled the
empire of the Mexitili,' he said, with surprise.
`Nopaltzin had a son who escaped his father's fate, and fled to Xaltocan.
He hath a descendant living, who shall restore the dynasty.'
`Who is he? Nay  it cannot be.'
`If it were true,' she said, with a smile, looking steadily in his face,
`wouldst thou resign thy hopes  in love  dethrone the princess, and with
thy hand place him on the throne of his fathers?'
Montezuma was silent. He knew not what to reply. He loved the
princess  but he had never thought of any thing beyond the happiness of
her love. His thoughts had never aspired to union with her!  the idea of
sharing the throne with her never once occurred to him. When he looked
forward in the future, he beheld her, in imagination, sole Empress, himself
her humble, secret worshipper. The ambition of the throne had never
mingled with his pure, adoring love. He therefore felt no rivalry roused by
the words of the beautiful creature who so closely questioned him. He felt
that, so far as he himself was concerned, his love for his country, his
devotion
to the memory of the early monarchs of his enslaved race, would induce
him freely to lay down his life to restore one of their blood to the sceptre.
But he felt for the Princess Eylla! His imagination could not picture her
dethronement without pain, not that he would have loved her less were she
to fall to the degree of the lowest maiden of the land. He was troubled by
the question put to him, and was silent.
`Thy love struggles with thy honor,' she said seriously, yet without
reproof.
`'T is true, sweet lady,' he said, with emotion. `If I had never seen the
princess, I would lay down my life to restore the dynasty of my race.'
`What if I should put thy love for thy country's glory to the test,' she
said, severely, `and bid thee seek its good to the sacrifice of thy love for the
princess!'
`Nay  I implore thee!' he cried, distressed. `I feel thy power! I
know thou art a creature of the spirit world! But thy look is gentle, and
thy sweet voice hath no key of cruelty in its tones! Spare me the trial, I
pray thee!'
`Mexitlian!  Thou art not worthy,' she cried, her eyes kindling with
fearful light, and her brow growing black with anger.
He bowed his head before this expression of her fierce and sudden
displeasure
,
and deprecated her wrath. `Pardon me!' he cried, submissively,
and with a voice of heavy sorrow.
`Love hath made thee recreant,' she said. Alas! I did hope the memory
of the glory of the Mexitlian race yet lingered in thy breast, when I saw
thee bow down in profound reverence before this statue of thy last monarch!
I have tried thee, and found thee wanting! Go! continue slaves!
Henceforth
the gods shall blot out thy once proud name, and the remembrance of
thy kingly glory, from the nations!'
`Spare me! Forgive, offended spirit! I yield!' he cried, fervently.
`Wilt thou sacrifice thy love for the princess for the restoration of thy
country's former glory, in the person of the living descendant of the
Acolhuan
race of kings?'
`I have seen my error! I will make the sacrifice,' he said, firmly, as if
the struggle had passed, and the noblest principle had conquered.
`Swear it by the sacred gods thou worshippest and fearest!' she said,
with an energy that startled and awed him.
`I swear!' he repeated, lifting his hand to the heavens.
`Now lay thy right hand upon the thigh of this statue of thy king, and
pledge thyself, that, forgetting all other earthly loves and honors, thou wilt
place upon the throne, from which he was hurled, one of his own race, even
if the blood of the last child of the Aztec usurpers should be shed by thy
hand in doing it.'
`I swear it!' he said, solemnly, placing his right hand upon the statue.
`
Thou art worthy!
' she cried, with the deepest intensity of joy and
feeling
;
`through thee the gods will restore the empire of thy people!'
Montezuma replied not. He stood sad and stern! He had made a
sacrifice
dearer to him than life. But his country  the hope the singular
being in whose presence he stood, had held out to him  the restoration of
the glorious dynasty of a race that had been for centuries in bondage! he
felt he would be unworthy of the love he sacrificed, if he let it stand between
him and his country. He was sad, but firm. He had made the sacrifice,
and the pain was past. His heart bled, but he strove to hide, if not heal,
the wound, by the contemplation of the restored glory of the ancient empire.
Of the truth and certainty of the bright maiden's words, he had no doubt.
He felt that he was in the presence of one of those beings, whom both
religion
and tradition had told him were the spiritual guardians of the races
of kings. But his thoughts dwelt upon the individual to whose services he
had so solemnly bound himself. That a descendant of the kings should be
alive was most incredible and extraordinary.
`Montezuma,' she said, in a gentle tone, and with a look of gratitude and
pride, `you have proved yourself worthy to restore the sceptre of the Princes
of the Sun. You have sacrificed to your country the dearest object of a man's
heart. You have shown yourself a true Mexitlian, and the shades of the
exiled princes, for seven centuries, shall do you homage for the honor you
have bestowed upon their long degraded race!'
`Who is this prince, that thou dost need my poor aid to replace him in the
seat of his fathers?' he asked, with curiosity.
`Thou shalt behold him,' she said, solemnly, and in a commanding manner.
`Stand thou there, and fix thine eyes upon the statue. Neither move nor
speak at what thou seest!'
He stood a few paces from the altar or pedestal on which was the statue,
and, with feelings of expectant awe, fixed his eyes upon it. She then
approached the statue, and touched it with her wand. It instnatly received
life, and stepping from the pedestal, walked slowly past him, saying, as it
came opposite,
`Hail, Montezuma the First! restored to the throne of thy ancestors!
Blessed of gods and of men! My expiation is finished!'
He then walked with a slow and majestic motion towards the opposite side
of the place, and passing through a door that opened into the tombs of the
Axuzco family, disappeared from his appalled and wondering vision. He
turned to ask her for an explanation of his words, when, to his amazement,
he beheld upon the pedestal a second statute. It was that of a young man
in the garb of a peasant; but his features and air were noble, and resembled
those of the first statue. His face was haggard, and his brow worn with
care. Upon his head was a cap similar to those still worn by the peasantry
of Xaltocan. She lightly touched him with her wand, and he descended
from the pedestal, and walked across the gallery before Montezuma.
`Hail, Montezuma the First!' he said, with a smile of triumph. `The
sceptre of my father, Nopaltzin, cruelly snatched from me, 't is thy destiny
to restore!'
With these words, the melancholy shade of the exiled prince crossed the
floor, and disappeared after the king. Montezuma looked again, and a third
statue stood upon the pedestal. It was that of an old man in the garb of a
fisherman. At the motion of her wand he descended to the ground, and
passed slowly before the youth. His features were noble, and bore the
likeness
of the royal race of Alcohuon. He waved his hand, and bent his
venerable
head in homage as he passed by, but spoke not. Like the others, he
disappeared
in the tombs.
A fourth statue, that of a robber-chief, occupied the pedestal. His brow
was fierce, and his bearing bold and reckless. As, obedient to her wand, he
descended to the floor, his armor rang through the vaulted passage, and as
he crossed the paved gallery, his step was firm and strong.
`Hail, Montezuma the First! may the gods give to thee the sceptre they
denied to me.'
A fifth statue appeared in his place. It was that of a slave in chains. As
he passed before the young man, he said,
`Hail, Montezuma! Thou art the liberator of thy race! Hail, son of
Nopaltzin!'
He also passed forward into the tombs, which had received, one after the
other, those who had preceded him. His place upon the pedestal was
occupied by a waterman, in the garb of the Mexitlian serfs; his by an
artizan; his by a foot-soldier; and then followed a long series of bondmen
and artificers, all of whose countenances bore the strong likeness of the race
of Alcohuan kings. At length an old man stood upon the pedestal, with
flowing white hair, and clad in the blue scarf and cap of the bondmen of the
city. In his hand he held a broken net. Montezuma trembled with
surprise
.
He recognised his grandfather. The old man descended from the
pedestal at the touch of the beautiful being who had so wonderfully called
back the dead of centuries, in all the characteristics of their various
conditions
when living, and slowly approached him.
`Hail, Montezuma! Thy virtues, in loving thy country above the idol of
thy heart, hath redeemed the curse upon our race! The gods have given
to thee the sceptre of thy fathers!'
He spoke, and passed on, leaving Montezuma petrified with astonishment.
Another statue stood upon the pedestal. It was his father! Montezuma
now recognized in him the likeness to Nopaltzin that had distinguished them
all. He knelt with awe before what his heart told him was his father's
shade! His eyes fell upon the beautiful being who had conjured him before
him, as if he would ask if his father were indeed dead. But her look awed
him to silence. The old man descended from the pedestal, and laid his hand
upon his son's head, as he still knelt. It chilled him with its icy coldness.
`Montezuma! The gods have revealed to me what I knew not living.
Thou art the last of the royal line of the Mexitlian kings! Thou shalt sit
upon the throne of thy fathers! All hail, Montezuma the First!'
The young man followed him with his eyes, as he slowly disappeared, and
then fell upon his face, overcome with the spectacle he had witnessed. The
voice of the spirit-being restored him to himself.
`Behold, Montezuma! What further seest thou?'
He looked up, and beheld two figures, not statues or shades, like those
that had gone before, standing upon the pedestal. They were male and
female, arrayed in royal robes, with diadems upon their heads, and each
having a hand resting upon a sceptre, which a black eagle above their heads
was presenting to them in his beak. Could it be! The female was none
VOL. II. 6
other than the Princess Eylla! His heart leaped with delight. He would
have bounded forward, but was awed by the majesty of her beauty. He
who stood beside her as emperor, was of a noble and commanding presence,
and bore upon his youthful features the characteristic impress of the race
of the ancient Mexitlian kings. But he knew him not. He would have
asked, and turned towards the fair spirit for this purpose, when she touched
the pedestal, and the attitude and costumes of the figures changed! It was
the princess again, in her evening robe. The youth, in the very garb he
himself wore in her boudoir, when he knelt and declared his love, was now
kneeling at her feet. It was
himself.
She waved her wand over the figures,
and they disappeared from his sight.
Lost in wonder and admiration, he continued to gaze upon the spot where
had been so singularly unfolded to him the past and the future, when she
laid her hand lightly upon his arm.
`Dost thou believe?' she asked, impressively.
`I do,' he answered, with deep emotion.
`Then shalt thou become emperor of Mexico; but thou must
win
the
crown by a
trial
of endurance; thou must undergo that will call for all thy
courage, patience, and faith in my prediction. The gods
devise,
but thou
must
execute.
'
`I will go through the task,' he answered, resolutely.
`I have shown this vision to thee to strengthen and confirm thy love,'
she said, `and also to reward thy virtue. Thou hast both thy country and
thy princess, because thou wert willing to sacrifice the love of the one for
the glory of the other. Hadst thou refused, thou wouldst have lost both.
Such ever is the reward the gods render to virtue. Follow me; my spirit
faints for light. Darkness is death to one of my nature. Be secret in what
has been revealed to thee.'
She led the way again towards the upper part of the palace, her form
emitting the same soft, misty halo, but far less bright and clear than at first,
that had guided them.
It would be difficult to describe the emotions and feelings of Montezuma,
as he traversed the passage. He felt that he was the object of supernatural
interest, and could not but believe the truth of the extraordinary revelations
he had heard and witnessed. He soon succeeded in reducing his intensely
wrought mind to some degree of composure, and, placing faith in all that he
had seen, devoutly thanked the gods. But he thanked them most devoutly,
that he had not to sacrifice the princess' love. Was he indeed the descendant
of the Mexitlian kings? He could not question it. He had seen and heard
speak, the shades of all his ancestors, from the last monarch down to his
father's! His father's? `Can my father be dead?' he asked himself.
At this moment they came to the closet above, adjoining the room in which
he had left the knight. The altar was visible, with the moonlight still
streaming in through the casement upon the mailed knight stretched
upon it.
`Prince!' she said, ere they entered, `again seal thy lips as to what thou
hast seen.'
`I obey,' he said, fervently. `Does my father live?'
`Thou art the sole and last of thy race. Thus the gods willed it,' she
answered solemnly.
`Alas, my father!'
`This is no time to mourn. If thou hast lost a father, thou hast gained a
throne. Enter, and lay thy hand upon the knight's breast.'
`Wherefore lieth he so? And what hath the house of Axusco to do with
the kings of Alcohuan?'
`Thou hast well asked. The nobles of the Axusco family were ever the
ministers and defenders of their throne. Like the faithful
quelen,
that flies
with the eagle, and expires when he dies, as if its life were in him, the
Axuscan
lords reigned and fell with their princes. It becomes the restored
prince to have an Axuscan lord, like his fathers before him, to be the guide
and council of his throne.'
`But, methinks the knight lies dead,' said Montezuma, advancing towards
the altar.
The beautiful spirit-being at the same time, with an air of languor and
fatigue, stood panting in the flood of moonlight, with parted lips and heaving
bosom, as if refreshing and bathing herself in its beams, after her long
absence
from it in the dark passages beneath the palace. Montezuma looked
upon her with wondering curiosity and awe; but she was too lovely and
gentle to create in his bosom any thing like fear. In a moment afterwards,
she stepped out from the moonlight, with a sparkling eye and elastic step,
and with a fresher and brighter radiance of light shining from her person.
`The knight hath been dead seven centuries,' she answered.
`I saw him at sundown,' answered Montezuma, with surprise.
`Come hither. What seest thou?' she asked, leading him to a recess on
one side of the apartment.
Upon the steps of a pedestal, where had once stood a statue of the god
Huitziltli, now lying broken upon the floor, sat the counterpart of the figure
stretched upon the altar. He was leaning his head upon his sword, and
seemed buried in profound thought.
`'T is the knight himself!' exclaimed Montezuma, with surprise and
pleasure. `Who, then, is yonder effigy?'
`The minister who sat at the right hand of king Nopaltzin, and was slain
by his side when he was dethroned.'
`'T is wondrous strange. And the gods have preserved this line, too, with
the kingly?' inquired Montezuma, most deeply interested.
`Else would not the throne be as it was. What the gods ordain, will never
fail of the minutest accomplishment.'
`He seems buried in deep meditation. Perhaps he sleeps.'
`No. He beholds now in vision what thou hast seen with the eye,
and heard with the ear.'
`The wondrous vision of my ancestors?'
`'T is passing in his brain.'
`Knoweth he his own descent, or hath he lost it, as my fathers did.'
`There lies he who was called the lord of Axusco, seven centuries ago, and
this knight thus calls himself. He hath not lost his descent, nor the memory of
his former glory. The conquerors of thy kings kept the family near their
throne, to humor the enslaved people with the semblance of power in one
of their own nobles. But the Aztec princes have ever been watchful of
them. Thou seest the last knight hath had his palace laid in ruins, and
himself exiled. The vision hath passed. Ho! sir knight. Sleepest thou at
such a time?'
The lord of Axusco sprang to his feet, and looked about him for an instant,
ere he realized his situation. His gaze then rested upon Montezuma, and
he instantly knelt at his feet, and placed his sword upon the ground before
him.
`My noble prince! behold your servant. My sword and my life are
yours.'
`Nay, brave knight; this posture becometh thee not towards me,' said
Montezuma, with embarrassment, at this confirmation of his assurance of his
true position.
`Thou art the favorite son of Heaven. The gods have revealed to me
the past and future as I slept, waiting for thy coming hither,' answered the
knight.
`Such hath been revealed to me by this bright being. Ah! she hath
vanished,' he cried, looking for the guardian spirit of his house, who had
disappeared in the direction of the altar, the instant the knight opened his
eyes. `Yes, noble knight, I do feel,' he said, with firm and lofty confidence,
that became his high descent,  `I do feel that I am of the royal race of the
Mexitlian kings. Henceforth I fix my eyes upon the throne of my fathers.'
`Beware thou betray not thyself till the time be come to fulfil the will of
heaven. Till then thou art Montezuma the serf!' said, commandingly, the
spirit-maiden, appearing before them.
`Do I wake or sleep?' cried the knight, with alarmed surprise. `I did
behold this same bright being in my vision.'
`Thou art awake, brave lord,' said the sweet, thrilling voice of the
wondrous
maiden. `Within seven days, shall the decrees of heaven concerning
thy emperor be accomplished. Till then, farewell! noble prince.
Farewell
!
noble lord of Axusco.'
With these words, she retired backwards towards the broad moon-beam,
and standing in it, waved her wand towards the moon, upon which she fixed
her large, glorious eyes, and slowly dissolved into its light. Montezuma and
the knight, recovering from their surprise, approached the spot. But the
pure beam of light, that lay upon the cold marble, betrayed nothing of the
presence of the bright being it had united with its own ethereal substance.
While they were wondering at all this, a strain of enchanting melody,
yet of the most melancholy and touching kind, floated in the air around
them.
`Look! Behold!' cried the knight, pointing towards the altar.
Montezuma turned at his voice, and beheld the ancient lord of Axusco,
whom they had seen recumbent, standing upright upon the altar, with his
sword in his right hand, and his shield on his left arm. The soft melody
seemed to be floating above him in the air, from some invisible musician.
Suddenly it became wild and martial, and rang so clear, that the blood
thrilled in their veins. The statue, at the same instant, struck his shield
thrice with his sword, and then, descending from the altar, advanced towards
Montezuma.
`Emperor and king! all hail!' he cried, in a voice of exultation. `The
glory of the empire of thy fathers shall be revived in thee.'
Then, approaching the Peruvian knight, he knelt before him, and in
silence
laid his shield and sword at his feet.
`Lord of Axusco, defend thy king!' he said, in a solemn and commanding
tone. He then rose, and passing by, crossed the chamber towards the altar,
and disappeared near it, they knew not how. At the same instant, the
music ceased.
The knight took up the sword and shield, and laying them upon the altar,
cried, in a loud voice,
`My brave and noble ancestors, wherever thou art, I do solemnly pledge
myself, before this sacred altar of the god of our house, to obey thy
commands
.
May the gods recompense me, as I am true or false!'
He then broke his own sword upon the altar, cast the fragments at the
foot of it, and, taking up that of his ancestor, devoutly kissed it, and girded
it to his side.
`'T was heaven that guided thee hither from Peru, brave knight,' said
Montezuma. `Let us embrace, for our fathers' sakes, and patiently wait its
further guidance.'
At this moment, the loud tramp of horses was heard in the court of the
palace, rapidly approaching the main entrance. The next instant, they saw,
from the window, three cavaliers alight from their steeds, and hasten up the
ruined steps of the portico.
`What means this?' cried the knight, with surprise. `Yonder comes
into the court, also, some score men-at-arms, at the top of their speed.'
Ere Montezuma could reply, the voice of the young lord Esquitl was heard,
giving directions to guard every avenue of the palace.
`This is their rendezvous,' he said to those with him, `and they should be
found here.'
`Something hath transpired that menaces us with evil, sir,' said
Montezuma
.
`They are but three,' said the knight. `Here they come.'
The party of cavaliers, as he spoke, entered the apartment. The
eye of the young noble immediately fell upon them, and, in a stern voice, he
commanded them to surrender.
`To whom?' inquired Montezuma, calmly.
`To the emperor,' answered the noble, haughtily.
`My lord of Esquitl,' said Montezuma, `I have done my best to put down
this spirit of revolt.'
`As thou hast done thy best to kindle it. Thou art a rebel,  and who
is he with thee? Surrender, both!'
`I shall surrender to them, my lord,' said Montezuma. `It is best it
should be so; for I perceive the gods will bring good out of it. But act
thou for thyself.'
The knight made no reply, but dropped his visor over his features, covered
his breast with his shield, and advancing the point of his sword, walked
boldly past them into the hall of the palace, cut his way ere they could
prevent
him through the men-at-arms at the entrance, and, leaping into his
saddle, galloped out of the court into the narrow street, and disappeared, the
sound of his horse's hoofs growing fainter and fainter in the distance, till
they died away altogether.
`A bold knight!' cried Esquitl, `if knight he be; but I have seen so
many valiant serfs in borrowed plumage, I scarce know hawk from buzzard.
Dost thou give thy arms, fair sir?' he asked of Montezuma, seeing him
stand quietly by.
`I am thy prisoner,' answered Montezuma, who saw resistance, had he
been disposed to make it, against four knights cased in armor and a score of
men-at arms, would be vain.
`Where are the rest of thy fellow-conspirators? Methinks I saw some
half dozen more at the net-maker's, than have been captured.'
`They have gone to their homes. Whom else hast thou captured? And
why do you take prisoners, now that the revolt is quieted, and the princess
hath granted amnesty?'
`Quieted! Yes, with the slaughter of some two thousand rebels,' answered
the young noble.
`Two thousand men slain! Hath there been bloodshed? Hath the
revolt
,
then, broken out?'
`Yes. Heard you not the tocsin of alarm? Saw you not the signal-fire
from the summit of the Temple of War? Where were thine eyes and ears,
sir rebel?'
The sound of alarm and the flame of the altar had both alike been
unheard
and unseen by him while in the subterranean galleries of the palace.
`Who was the leader and mover of this, my lord?' he asked eagerly.
`A certain hunchback, with the eye of a woman, the soul of a warrior,
and the heart of Michtlan, the evil one.'
`'T is Hucha! I feared it. Hath the revolt been put down, my lord?'
`It did but want this consummation,' said the young noble, receiving
Montezuma's
sword. `I am sorry for thee, fair youth, that thy success was not
equal to thy wishes, in this matter. Thou didst, 't is true, use fair words
and a princess' promise, to put it down. But they will little avail thee with
the emperor. I knew not so much of the spirit of cavaliers existed in your
class as I have witnessed this night. I shall hold in better favor thy degree
henceforward. `Men-at-arms! guard your prisoner to the castle keep.
Thou wilt be judged by the emperor, sir rebel, who I fear me will make thee,
and also thy friend the hunchback, shorter by the head ere to-morrow's
sun set.
With these words, the lord Esquitl returned to the outside of the palace,
and mounted his horse and rode away, accompanied by all his friends, save
one, who remained with the men-at-arms; while Montezuma, strictly
guarded
by them, was conducted a prisoner to the imperial castle, which adjoined
the palace of the emperor.
CHAPTER VI.
SISMARQUI IN THE PALACE.
When
Sismarqui left his companions at the foot of the palace stairs, he
followed the terrace round the base of the tower, until he came to the postern
door, through which the prince had conveyed Fatziza into the palace. From
his previous knowledge of the wing occupied by the Prince Palipan, he
knew that it must lead toward his rooms. He attempted to force it open,
but in vain. Burning with impatience and disappointment, he was about to
dash against it a fragment of rock that lay upon the terrace, when a different
mode of ingress occurred to him.
`Why should I prepare the prince, by a rude and noisy assault, for my
coming?' he said; `this disguise will, with address and boldness, bring me
sooner to my object. I will try its virtue, as I first contemplated. May the
gods guide me!'
With these words he rapidly retraced his steps, and returning to the
lemon-walk
,
followed it towards its termination, at the foot of the steps leading
to the battlement, where Elic had been posted as sentinel. A slight
knowledge
of the interior of the palace, which he had occasionally visited to carry
shields to courtiers, was sufficient to show him that these stairs would give
him access to its courts and galleries, and open the way for him to approach
the apartments of the prince. The chief difficulty was to pass the guard on
the battlements. With a firm step he advanced from the shaded avenue
towards them, when, to his surprise, he beheld a sentinel stationed at their
post. It was unusual, and the circumstance convinced him that the emperor
had intimation of the revolt, and was prepared for surprise. He hesitated
an instant, and then, assuming the gait and bearing of the prince, he
approached.
`Stand!' challenged the soldier, sternly, as the young man advanced from
the shadow towards him.
`Thou art keeping strict guard to-night, soldier,' he said, in a composed
tone of voice. `This vigilance is well.'
`The prince!' exclaimed the soldier respectfully; and lowering his pike,
which he had presented to his breast.
`Thou shouldst know me, methinks! Who hath stationed thee here?'
`The lieutenant of the emperor's guard.'
`Gave he no countersign to thee?'
`'T is
The Emperor,
noble prince!'
`What is thy name?'
`Nezal; a soldier of thy own body guard.'
`I do now see thou wearest my insignia. I will remember it, for I may
need thy services soon!'
With these words Sismarqui passed him and ascended to the battlement.
On landing upon it he was not a little startled at seeing several soldiers
standing at the opposite extremity and two sentinels on guard at the
entrance
of the gallery of armor, that led to the interior of the palace. He
hesitated an instant, but the object he had before him gave him confidence,
and he walked steadily across the battlement towards the sentries. One of
these was Elic, who, believing it to be the prince, did not challenge him, but
said, as he came near,
`Noble prince! the man whom you bade me arrest, hath not yet
appeared.'
`I bade thee arrest no one,' said Sismarqui, wishing to draw from him who
was under the displeasure of the prince.
`A mascal of the palace, whom your highness said was in disguise.'
`Thou mayest arrest as many mascals as thou choosest for me. When
did the prince  that is, when did I give you this order?'
`Not an hour since, as you went forth.'
`True. See thou arrest him. And hark you! if you or thy fellow-soldier
here see any one calling himself the prince, passing here, arrest him also!
There is one so disguised within the palace, and I would have him seized.'
`It shall be done, your highness.'
`There is masquerading here to-night, methinks, with disguised mascals
and princes,' said Elic, as Sismarqui proceeded at a quick pace along the
gallery towards the rotunda of columns, from which the various avenues of
the palace diverged. He had not advanced but a few paces before his steps
were arrested by an imploring cry from the post behind him.
`Noble prince, save me! I am the true Casipeti!' He turned, and beheld
struggling in the hands of the guard, one in the dress of the steward of the
palace. `Save me, prince! I am no impostor!'
`Thou art!' cried Elic, `and I have orders to arrest thee.'
`I did but come hither from my room by this private door that leadeth to
the emperor's wine cellars, to ask thee, Elic, who knowest me well, if I am
so altered that my companions and intimates do know me not. I cannot
sleep. The gods have cursed me!'
`Thou art an impostor, and we arrest thee by the prince's orders,'
answered
both sentinels.
`Save me, noble prince!' cried the mascal imploringly.
Sismarqui, apprehensive that his object might be defeated by any
disturbance
at such a crisis, turned back and said,
`Thou hast doubtless made a mistake, soldier. Release him!'
`Nay, your highness,' said Elic; `he is an impostor. Yonder comes the
true mascal, now!'
While he was speaking, Casipeti the waterman, habited precisely like the
prisoner Elic held by the throat, was seen approaching the spot on his way
out of the palace, after successfully accomplishing his purpose in retiring
into it. On beholding the scene he would have gone back, but, finding that
he was observed, boldly came forward.
`Thou hast got the rogue, then, brave soldiers,' he cried, advancing with a
confident step. `Hold him fast! Ha! my noble prince!' he added, on
discovering Sismarqui; and he bent his head in the lowest reverence.
Sismarqui started at his voice, and fixed his eyes upon him with a
curiosity
he could not account for to himself.
`Your highness, I am indeed myself, and none other. He is the impostor
that hath haunted me like the evil Michtlan in my shape.'
`There cannot be two stewards,' answered Sismarqui, desirous of escaping
without further delay or notice. `He, whom thou shalt judge the true one,
release, and hold the other.'
`Your highness judge between us,' said Casipeti the waterman. `We
both claim to be Casipeti, the king's steward.'
`If he be Casipeti, your highness,' said the mascal, `he is the waterman,
who, of late, struck a noble.'
`Come hither into the moonlight, and let me see thy face,' said Sismarqui
to the disguised bondman. `I think I should know that voice.'
The waterman obeyed, and no sooner did Sismarqui behold his composed
features, than he recognized them.
`Ha! why art thou here, Casipeti? I thought thou wert with our
friends!' he said, forgetting his disguise.
`I do not understand your highness,' he answered, with surprise, at these
words. `If I am the true Casipeti, I pray your highness detain the other,
and let me pass without hindrance.'
`Thou art the true Casipeti, I 'll be sworn,' said Sismarqui, and thy
presence
here is of value to me, if thou wilt befriend me.'
`I beg your highness would permit me to depart,' prayed Casipeti,
alarmed
lest he should be detained.
`Nay, look at me!' said the prince, in a low tone. With these words, he
turned towards the light, and lifted his visor. `Dost thou know me?'
`Sismarqui!' cried the waterman, with surprise and pleasure.
`I am. Fatziza hath, within the half hour been borne away to the
palace
by the prince. He left his plume and cloak behind him on the floor, by
which I knew who had wronged me. I have assumed them to cover my
attempt to rescue her. Wilt thou aid me?'
`With all my heart. I know the direction of the prince's chambers. I
came hither under this garb, to ascertain the temper of the emperor's guards
for rebellion.'
`Retain thy disguise, then. It will aid us. This poor mascal must be
placed under arrest till our end is obtained. So, soldiers,' he said, turning
towards them, and speaking sternly, `this is the true Casipeti, whose services
I need. Place thy prisoner in custody till morning, and if thou hast then
no further orders from me, let him go! A night's occupation of the
guard-room
will be sufficient punishment.'
`Look ye, friend,' said Casipeti, going up to him, as the soldiers were
leading
him off, `I owe you a kindness, and, to relieve thy mind, lest thou
shouldst believe thyself under magic, I will charitably tell thee that thou art
the true mascal Casipeti, and that I am Casipeti the waterman. I trust we
shall know each other better hereafter.'
`Ho! guards! prince! soldiers! ho, all honest men! Seize him  the
villain! He has confessed!' shouted the mascal, enraged.
`Heed him not, good friends, he hath a madness in him,' said Casipeti,
following Sismarqui, who had by this time advanced some distance along the
gallery.
`Thou shalt confess, thou rogue,' said Elic, `when thou art brought before
the prince in the morning.'
`Alas! alas! I am a miserable man,' said the mascal, dropping his head
upon his breast, and weeping. `Do with me what thou wilt!'
Thus desponding and overcome, the hapless steward surrendered himself
to his fate.
`Your highness,  nay, I did forget, for thy princely costume and
bearing,' said the waterman, as they traversed the gallery; `brave
Sismarqui
,
I should have said '
`Thou wert right, Casipeti. Till Fatziza be rescued, I am prince to
thee, and thou the mascal to me. We must maintain our characters with
our lives, if need be; for all may depend on the disguises we have assumed.
What wouldst thou have said?'
`That the emperor hath plainly heard some rumor or direct intelligence of
the revolt, for, as I passed through the palace, I met knights and couriers
passing to and from his cabinet with hasty and important tread. Hast thou
seen Montezuma?'
`I have, and his influence hath dispersed the people. But I fear the
armorer's quarter may be in motion, for as I should have gone thither, I
heard the fatal news of Fatziza's abduction by the prince. Haste thee!
One moment may be too late for aught save vengeance! Knowest thou the
way to the prince's rooms?'
`I have, favored by my disguise, been studying the interior throughout,
and learning the position of the various departments and their occupants,
looking to some day when it might be useful, even if the present insurrection
pass by.'
`Thou hast done well. Lead me to the apartments of the prince!'
`Thou must compose thy step in crossing the rotunda before us, where
thou seest a few courtiers stand in waiting before the emperor's door, and I
will walk a pace behind thee. Keep on to yonder flight of marble steps,
guarded by two bronzed lions, and pursue thy way across a court beyond, in
which thou wilt see a vast silver serpent, spouting jets of water, that fall
around him into a marble basin, into which he seems to swim. Beyond it,
VOL. II. 7
thou wilt see, beneath a portico of porphyry, three broad steps of alabaster,
leading to a door, the leaves of which are ivory. They lead to the ante-room
of the prince's chamber. Proceed first; I will follow thee.'
With a beating heart, lest, with all his haste and caution, he should be
too late to save the maiden, the lover advanced before him along the
steel-hung
gallery, and entered the circular hall of columns. Two or three
cavaliers
,
in rich dresses, were leaning against the pillars, as if weary of their
attendance, and one or two others were walking to and fro before the
emperor's
door, in light, laughing conversation. As they entered, and were
crossing the place, one of them, after saluting the royal plume that waved
above Sismarqui's helm, touched Casipeti on the shoulder.
`Stay, good mascal! Let the prince proceed; he wanteth not thee.'
`He hath commanded my attendance, lords,' answered Casipeti,
impatiently
,
as Sismarqui, seemingly forgotful of all but Fatziza, ascended
alone the marble steps towards the court of the silver serpent.
`Where is thy counterpart, or art thou he?'
`I pray you, my lords, let me pass on. I have been too much detained
to-night already.'
`Thou shalt go on one condition, which will prove whether thou art
Casipeti or not Casipeti,' said the young lord, holding him by his tunic.
`Name it, my lord.'
`Bring us presently hither a flask of the emperor's Pimerian wine!'
`It shall be done.'
`Stay  thou mayest add to it a bunch of Teuctli raisins, and some
clusters
of purple grapes!'
`It shall be done, my lord,' he said, following Sismarqui.
`Then haste. Ha! pretty Tzitzis,' cried the youth, `whither art thou
flying, with so wild an eye?' he asked, as he beheld the maiden at this
instant
make her appearance at the entrance of the rotunda.
`I am hastening to the rooms of the Lord Cuiri, Lord Tlanotl!' she said,
passing him.
`He leans against yonder column, half asleep, or deeply meditating.
She flew towards him.
`My lord!' and the Peruvian laid her hand upon his arm.
`Is it thou, Tzitzis!'
`The princess!'
`What of her?' he demanded, alarmed by her breathless manner.
`She hath present need of thy services. Hasten to her!'
Without a word the young noble obeyed, and Tzitzis disappeared within
the apartments of the emperor.
`What means this?' demanded the young lords of each other.
`She hath a message to the emperor too! Events are in the air. Ha,
mascal! why dost thou linger?' cried one of them, seeing Casipeti, who
had been struck with the alarmed manner of the messenger of the princess,
and lingered to see the result. `Go, and do our bidding.'
He continued on his way, but lingered again when he reached the court
of the fountain, on seeing the hurried departure of the noble she had spoken
to, suspecting the message might have some connection with the object of
Sismarqui's visit to the prince's rooms. After waiting a few seconds longer,
he was about to proceed, for he saw that Sismarqui had crossed the court in
the wrong direction, and was looking back for him, at a loss which way to
proceed. But his first step was arrested by a hand on his shoulder. It was
the Tlascalan whom he had seen by the dwelling of the net-maker. He was
in haste and alarm.
`Ha, mascal! thou art well here. Give me thy cap and tunic!'
Ere Casipeti could divine his purpose or resist, the Tlascalan had snatched
the cap and torn the flowing robe from him, and fled with them, leaving
him, save an embroidered vesture, in his costume of a waterman. At the
same instant, the Lord of Cuiri reppeared, coming towards the rotunda,
and, fearing lest he should be detected, either by him or by those below, if
he crossed the court in his present garb, he, with angry alarm, cast aside the
vest from his person, and withdrew within the shadow of a statue.
`What hath happened, my lord?' asked the gay youth who had
despatched
Casipeti for the wine, as the noble returned.
`Nothing of moment,' he answered, with composure, so that all heard him.
`Come thou aside with me,' he added, in a low tone of voice. His face was
flushed, and his voice stern. `Can I trust thee, Lord Tlanotl?' he asked,
impressively.
`To death,' answerd the young man, grasping his hand warmly.
`The prince hath attempted the life of the princess with an otol flower!'
`Hath it succeeded?' cried the noble, with intense surprise and
consternation
.
`Not on her life, but her slave's. She hath commanded me to arrest him
secretly.'
`I will aid thee.'
`Go to the battlements, and march privately, by the passage in the rear of
the emperor's apartments, a guard of four trusty men-at-arms, whom thou wilt
select. I will meet thee in the court of the silver serpent, near the steps of
the prince's apartments.'
`He hath just gone to them, armed and cloaked, as if he had been abroad.
The prince hath indeed attempted her life! It was rumored, this evening,
she hath given him ill reception of late.'
`Delay not. Be secret and speedy. I would arrest him in his rooms, as
't is the princess' desire it should be done without noise. Haste, but show
to these no signs of haste.'
The young noble left him, and leisurely crossing the hall of columns,
disappeared.
`Hath aught happened, my lord?' asked one of the elder cavaliers,
advancing.
`Nothing of moment, my good lord; the alarm was most in the Peruvian's
manner. A slight matter will frighten maidens.'
`I do rejoice. I did fear some evil had befallen our noble mistress,' he
said, with grateful feeling.
`The gods have the Princess Eylla's life in their own keeping, my Lord
of Oznenetl,' answered Lord Cuiri. `My lord, I may want your aid, and as
you have experience, it were best I took you with me.'
`Command me,' answered the old cavalier.
`Come with me to the prince's apartments. I have some order from the
princess, that will lead me thither presently.'
`The princess hath not of late done the prince such courtesy, for,
methinks
,
in their intercourse, for cousins, and betrothed as they are, they are
full distant.'
`Thou wilt soon learn the nature of her courtesy. Come, my lord!'
With these words the young noble, followed by the gray-headed cavalier,
ascended the lion-guarded steps of white marble, and entered the court of
the fountain. Casipeti withdrew within the shadow as they passed, without
their perceiving him, saved from detection only by the dark hue of his
waterman's dress. Anxious for the success and safety of Sismarqui, anxious
for himself, exposed as he was to instant discovery, he followed them with
his eyes until they were hidden from his view on the other side of the
fountain
,
and then began to devise some means to extricate himself from his
perilous situation. He remained at least ten minutes in a state of
uncertainty
and irresolution, aware that detection would be followed by instant
death, after the deception he had practised under the guise which had been
so singularly stripped from him. Nevertheless, he at length made up his
mind to fly across the rotunda, and escape by speed along the gallery of
armor, rush past the sentinel on the battlements, and either effect his
escape, or lose his life in the attempt. He knew that, in his present
situation
,
he could be of no further use to Sismarqui, but rather endanger his
safety. When he had come to this desperate resolution, and was about to
put it into effect, he beheld approaching, from the quarter which he
knew led to the princess' apartments, the Emperor himself, and the Princess
Eylla leaning upon him. They were preceded by a slave, bearing, in
golden candlesticks, two brilliant torches. Their step was quick and decided,
and their faces were both strongly marked with intense feeling. They
crossed the angle of the court in which Casipeti stood concealed, and passed
by towards a lofty door that opened into a suite of gorgeous apartments,
which he knew were once occupied by the empress, and known as the
empress' wing. They were both silent and thoughtful. He saw the
princess
,
as she passed, cast an anxious and impatient glance in the direction of
the prince's part of the palace, and then continue on her way, with a sterner
countenance than he could have believed so lovely a face could wear. A
few paces behind them, walking at a sad and thoughtful pace, came the
Peruvian. He instantly recognised her as the maiden who had extricated
him from the group in the rotunda, after his meeting with the mascal. A
ray of hope flashed upon him. She came within a few feet of him, as he
stood within the shadow of one of the polished columns of the colonnade that
environed the court, and he stepped lightly forth, after she had passed by,
and gently touched her veil. She turned quickly, and the waterman knelt
at her feet.
`Kind maiden, fear me not! Nay, call no one! I am at thy mercy.'
`Who art thou?'
`I
was
the mascal whom thou didst do a kindness some two hours since.
My life is again in thy hands.'
`Art thou the friend of Montezuma?'
`I am, maiden.'
`Then for my mistress' sake, I will do thee a kindness, if thou needest it.
Where is thy disguise, and what hadst thou to do with usurping the honors
of the unhappy mascal?'
`I came hither in the disguise, maiden, by Montezuma's request. A
Tlascalan, a quarter of an hour since, tore it from me, and fled with it.'
`What art thou?'
`I am Casipeti, the waterman.'
`Hast thou a fair daughter?'
`I have.'
`I have heard young knights discourse of her. This Tlascalan hath
mischief
in him as well as wickedness, I see. I know not how to help thee.
If thou art found within the palace in such guise, thy life is surely the forfeit.'
`I fear not death, if it come in the shape a man should meet it; but I
would not die cut to pieces like a dog,' he said, warmly.
`Nor shalt thou. Wilt thou take a slave's dress, and do a slave's duty till
I can get thee from the palace?'
`I will, fair maiden.'
`Wait within the shadow of this pillar till I return.'
She immediately left him and went back in the direction in which she had
come. After a brief absence, she reappeared, bearing in her hands the dress
of one of the domestic slaves of the palace.
`Throw this on over thy waterman's garb and follow me.'
He soon became as effectually and more safely disguised than before, and
followed her to the door, through which the emperor and princess had already
sometime entered. Thou wilt wait within the ante-room,' she said, turning to
him, as she went in before him; `Remember, thou art the princess' attendant.
Thy life now depends on thy discretion and address. I would save thee for
thy daughter's sake, as well as that I have before done thee a kindness.
Those I serve, I ever have a liking for after.'
`With these words they disappeared within the ante-room of the
apartments
to which the princess had removed. As they did so, the signal flame
from the summit of the Temple of Huitziltli reddened the sky, and the
sudden
light shone into the inner recesses of the palace, while far and wide,
stroke after stroke, sounded the tocsin of revolt.
CHAPTER VII.
THE PRINCE AND HIS CAPTIVE.
When
the prince disappeared, leaving Fatziza in the voluptuous
apartment
into which he had conveyed her, he passed through a door so secretly
contrived within the wall as to elude the strictest search. It opened into the
room which he left to go on his expedition to the net-maker's street.
The Tlascalan at the same moment entered from the court of the fountain.
`What news from the otol?' he demanded, quickly.
`I have been listening by the door, but hear nothing. Thou hast a private
key, my lord, in thy cabinet, which opens a door behind the arras, where I
can not only hear, but see. I came, if thou hadst returned, to ask thee
for it.'
`Take it!' he said at once, giving it to him, `go back, and fly to me with
the first intelligence thou dost gain that favors my purpose.'
`Hast thou succeeded in thy other purpose?' asked the Tlascalan, with
hesitation, as if aware of his audacity in putting the question.
`It matters not. Yet, I may need thee. The maiden is in my private
chamber.'
The Tlascalan smiled with malicious triumph. `The lover?' he ventured
to repeat.
`I left him for thy revenge, slave. Besides, I saw him not.'
`Then he knows not of it. I would I had the happiness to be the first to
tell him the sweet tidings. I shall never forget his taking me by the throat,
till I have put my knife into his life.'
`Thou art an evil villain, and smell of blood! Go, and bear me the
inteligence
I wait for, and thou shalt have a hecatomb of victims.'
`I need but one, your highness, like yourself,' he replied, boldly. But I
think the steel is trustier than a flower!'
`Foul Tlascalan! If thou wert not so serviceable to me I would have
thy head taken from thy shoulders for that speech. Go! Let me not see
thee but with tidings of the princess' death.'
The slave left him, and hastened on his mission to the apartments of the
princess, where, by the aid of his key, he secreted himself within the arras,
and heard and witnessed the whole scene, from the moment the otol was
placed on the bosom of the sleeping slave, to the departure of lord Cuiri to
arrest the prince.
When the Tlascalan quitted him, the prince prepared to lay aside the
armor in which he was cased, when he missed his eagle's feather, and also
remembered that he had left his cloak on the balcony, at the net-maker's
house.
`There too must I have lost my royal plume!' he said, angrily. `It will
be a mark by which to know that an eagle hath swooped so low as to rob a
dove-cote. It matters not. To-morrow I shall have none to answer to but
myself, if I choose to cast down the statues of all the gods, and set up my
own! But till these cares of empire begin, I will pass the hours in love and
ease. Sweet slave! she will shed many tears to sacrifice her love for her
beloved serf! I will win her to love me! A thousand maids in Mexico, of
high and low degree, would be full willing to take her place. But I will try
the experiment, and see if I cannot win her heart. I shall need a bride
when I get the empire. She hath grace and dignity enough to adorn a
throne, and if she will love me, I do believe, before the gods! I would make
her empress. In such a case, I would my cousin should live to witness it.
It would be a triumph dear to my heart. But while she lives, even as a
prisoner, I cannot hold the throne. The very army of the empire would
displace me, she hath such favor with all men!'
Thus ran the current of the ambitious and revengeful Prince Palipan's
thoughts, as he laid aside his armor and robed himself in a rich evening
court dress, of the most elegant and graceful description. It consisted of an
upper coat of brilliant feathers, worn over a light cuirass of gold; half-boots
formed of thin plates of gold; brachials of the same metal, and bracelets
composed of the most beautiful gems. About his neck was a chain of gold
and diamonds; and over his head waved a snow-white plume. But his most
costly ornament was a cape of feathers, of the most beautiful description,
wrought in mosaic. His whole costume was at once elegant and becoming,
such as was usually worn by princes and nobles of the Aztec court in their
palaces, when not in full armor.
`This becomes my rank, and I would impress her with it,' he said, as he
glanced at himself in the mirrors of
itzli,
which paneleld his magnificent
chamber. `I will now seek my pretty net-maker. Methinks she hath been
silent; but caged singing birds are ever so till they become familiar with
their wires. I hope she will give me no more such melody as her clear
throat poured forth when being conveyed to the boat! But it matters not!
My apartments are sacred, and no man says to me, what doest thou? I have
something foared my uncle, and stood in awe of my cousin hitherto, but they
are now too near their end of power to influence me, and I too near the top
of it to care for them. So! my pretty maiden! I will now teach thee how a
prince can woo!'
Thus speaking, he approached the wall, and stepped upon one of the
polished
slabs of marble adjoining it, which covered his chamber. The weight
of his person upon it seemed to act upon some machinery, for it instantly
revolved with him, moving, at the same time, a portion of the mirrored wall,
and instantly shut him from his own room into the next. As he disappeared,
the plate of
itzli
resumed its former position, and a corresponding piece of
marble, from the opposite side, replaced that on which he had been
revolved
through the wall. The transition was noiseless, instantaneous, and
like magic; there remaining behind no sign of the means by which it had
been effected.
Fatziza was kneeling with her face buried in her hands in silent despair,
where she had cast herself on finding she was a prisoner without hope of
escape. She had been at one moment weeping, at another condemning
herself
for her silence, when she might have alarmed the palace with her cries.
`I feel I have brought the evil upon myself by too much confidence,' she
said bitterly, `and I can only trust to the generosity of the prince, or the
interposition
of heaven.'
Such were the thoughts upon her heavy mind, when the prince stepped
from the slab of marble into the apartment. His low voice near her, was
the first intimation she had of his presence.
`Sweetest maiden, I am pained to see thee in tears.'
His voice was very soft and tender; for the prince had that rare
excellence
of wickedness,  found in its perfection only in those whose native evil
of heart has been refined and finished by the accomplishments of high rank
and polished intellect,  of appearing most harmless when he was most
dangerous
,
and of covering bad intentions under the most fascinating exterior of
sympathy and kindness. He had also the power, common to all bad men
of strong minds, of disguising his feelings, and only permitting such to have
the ascendency, at any one time, as that time itself called for. Now,
therefore
,
although thoughts of murder against the king, of assassination, of
usurpation, agitated his bosom; although his soul smarted with the
remembrance
of discarded love, and a host of dark and conflicting meditations filled
his breast,  he subdued, by the pressure of his will upon it, all this troubled
sea, and indulged only the feelings of the present moment. To behold now
his calm and pleasant countenance,  just enough touched with sensibility to
give it tenderness,  no eye could have guessed the thoughts of the busy
brain, or believed that in his heart were harbored the dark and guilty
purposes
,
that he had that night taken to his bosom.
He bent over Fatziza as he spoke, and would have touched her hands to
remove them from her face. But the sound of his voice acted upon her like
a fearful spell. She sprang to her feet wildly, and with a suffocating cry
fled to the opposite side of the room.
`Alas, dearest Fatziza!' he said, in a tone of well-feigned sorrow and
mortification, `thou dost fly from me like a deer before the fierce
cojotl
of
the mountains.'
`My lord prince,' she said, with alarm, but speaking firmly, `I have as
much need to fly. Would to the gods I had, like the deer, the broad plain to
fly upon!'
`Nay, sweet maiden. Thou hast no cause to fear,' he said, with gentle
reproach. `If thou art loved by me, thou must blame thy own charms.'
`My lord prince, you love me not. Mock me not, nor demean yourself by
speech so unworthy thy rank.'
`Maiden, I neither mock thee, nor degrade my rank. Beauty in woman
is rank. Thou art the most beautiful virgin in Mexico. Thou art,
therefore
,
the highest in rank, and my equal. Nay, smile not so scornfully, and
curl that sweet lip with contempt, proud beauty. I speak truly, and the
sincere thoughts of my soul.'
`Prince, this language is idle. Thou dost forget the princess, e'en were
there not a thousand others in Mexico fairer than I.'
`The princess! I did tell thee she had scorned my suit. Besides, though
the princess hath beauty, 't is inanimate,  well enough for an empress,
but 't is not the soft and spirit-like loveliness, that renders thine own so
irresistible.'
`I have heard thee, prince,' she said, with pain; `I do pray thee permit
me to depart to my father's humble roof.'
`Wilt thou go, sweet maiden?' he asked, with real pathos and regret in
his pleading tones, for the very firmness of the maiden, from its novelty to
him, added, as it was, to her exquisite loveliness, inspired him with a deep
and sincere passion. As he spoke, he approached her, and knelt at her feet.
`Dost thou kneel at a serf's daughter's feet,' she said, scornfully. `Thou
dost forget thyself, prince of Aztec.'
`Thou mayest try scorn and withering irony, maiden, but 't will not
move my love,' he said, firmly.
`What will move thy compassion?' she cried, almost hopelessly.
`
Thy love,
' he said, with passionate ardor.
`Prince, I do believe thee generous. I appeal to thy honor. Distress
me not. I cannot, may not, listen to you. As one of the royal race I appeal
to thee to protect a subject of thy empire. The gods give thee power to
shelter and defend, not bruise and break. I am helpless. Save me.' She
cast herself at his feet, and bathed them with her tears.
`Noble and spirited maiden,' he said, touched with admiration, and
half-relenting
from his purpose, `I do more. I offer thee my love.'
`Speak not of it. I am beneath it. I ask only thy protection. If thou
deniest it to me, prince, may heaven take from thee the power it has given
thee for the defence of the weak, and give it those who will remember, that
to rule is not to oppress.'
`I do not deny it, fair maid,' he said, calmly. `Rise, and let me speak
with thee.'
`I will not lift my face, my lord prince, till thou first promise me thy
protection
,'
she answered, with touching energy.
`From what?'
`From thyself, my prince,' she said, firmly.
`This I promise thee,' he said, smiling. He took her hand as he spoke,
and lifted her from the ground, and led her passively to a seat. `Now listen
to me, fairest Fatziza. I have shocked thee by my too rude declaration of
passion. Nay,  listen to me. When I beheld thee, seated in thy little
balcony by the water-side this afternoon, I did, I do confess to thee, regard
thee as only the pretty plaything of an idle hour; but since I have seen
something of thy mind and character, my passing admiration,  which went
no deeper than my eye,  hath sunk into my heart, and taken the shape and
substance of earnest love.'
`My prince, it may be true as thou hast spoken; but thy words only make
me more miserable, and give me less room for hope, than as if thy passing
glance had not taken deeper root.
That
might have been fixed by some
new face a moment after; but where the heart is touched, then every other
maiden, by bringing the first to mind, but makes the impression deeper. My
lord prince, I tremble. Your earnest manner confirms your words. If you
love me, you will respect me.'
`By my princely honor, sweet eloquence, I do both love and honor thee.'
`Thy honor will save  thy love destroy  its object. Oh, most noble
sir! fling wide my prison gates. Thou wilt be happier for it, and the gods
will bless thee. Surely, surely, they will reward evil and injustice.'
`The gods, methinks, have enough to do to look after their own rule, to
care much how things go on earth.'
`Dost thou scorn them, prince!' she demanded, with fear and amazement.
`No. But they have given the princes of the earth wisdom sufficient to
rule it, and so leave the world confidently to their government.'
`Then thou wilt have to render to them the heavier account of thy
governorship
.
It should beseem thee, methinks, to govern wisely and well.'
`Tut, ti! child,  this is dull prosing for such sweet lips,' he said, tapping
her mouth playfully. `Wilt thou love me?'
`I can discourse with thee no longer on this painful theme, my lord prince.
I have hitherto sought if, perhaps, I might not persuade thee to regard thine
own rank and mine  thy power and my helplessness.'
`Then I must despair. If I were a boor,  an ignorant serf,  thou
wouldst listen to my suit. 'S death! If I did not love thee, I could not have
patience with thee. I have power, but I supplicate thee. Why art thou
content to be so cruel? I offer thee my heart.'
`Mine I cannot give in return. Thou knowest I love another; and my
heart would be little worth to thee, another possessing its affections.'
`Nay  now thou dost mistake. A serf, like thy betrothed, knoweth
nothing of the art of love. Thy heart, Fatziza, is not the half won. He
hath not sounded beneath the surface of its deep affections; but, like a
swallow skimming a placid mere, hath but rippled here and there thy bosom.
I, like a skillful angler, will draw from its hitherto unmoved depths such a
store of love, you have not dreamed was in it. You will wonder, Fatziza,
at the richness of the mine, which this Sismarqui hath only walked over.
Alas! 't were a pity such a treasure should be given to one who knoweth not
a pebble from a priceless gem.
Sismarqui hath long loved me, my lord prince,' she answered, with
affectionate
earnestness.
`It may be, he loveth thee to the bent of his rude nature; for e'en a
hound, to look on, would feel a hound's attachment for thee. Nay  be not
displeased  thou knowest I do speak of him as we are accustomed to speak
of his degree.'
`I am of the same grade, my lord,' she said, something proudly.
`Thy love and thy beauty ennoble and elevate thee,' he answered, with an
animated smile, seeking to draw one from her. `Thou dost do wrong in
thinking thou lovest him. There is a time, about when maidens verge on
womanhood, that the heart begins to feel its affections and inherent love,
already silently growing from its seed, begins to sprout and put forth
tendrils
.
Tender and vigorous, they readily cling around the support that first
offers. At such a time, when thy young heart was luxuriant with the
thousand
VOL. II. 8
tendrils of love seeking something to entwine around, rather than fall
back upon the heart and perish, thine eye fell upon this Sismarqui. You
gave him the care of the young vine of thy affections; but he hath little
skill, and but one tendril hath he trained to twine about his heart. The rest
now run riot over the rich soil. Now, I pray thee, give me the culture of
these; and soon, instead of being tied to him by one perishing tendril, thou
wilt feel thy heart bound to mine by a thousand strong, entwining fibres.'
`You speak, perhaps, truly, prince. But this one perishing tendril first
clung to him, when it was perishing and single, and most needed support.
If there are others, they have sprung up since; and, as they were not
necessary
to unite our hearts together, they will not be necessary to bind them
together, now they are already united. Let
them
perish, my lord prince, and
all the sap of my heart's affections flow upwards to his, through the single
stem, that, directed by nature, clasped itself around him.'
`This is all very pretty in the way of sentiment, perhaps,' answered the
prince, with a smile. `He can never appreciate your beauty, child. What
careth a mind like his if your forehead be high and almost regal, as it is, as
if thy blood were kingly! What careth he whether thy cheek be like the
brilliant hue of the carnate lily, or a dusky brown! What heedeth he the
faultless symmetry of thy neck and shoulders; the perfect outline of thy
figure! Hath he ever taken this beauteous hand in his, and admired the
just proportion with which the fingers taper to the nail; or hath praised the
shape and transparency of the blushing nail? Hath he clasped thy rounded
arm, with wonder at its beauty; or marvelled at the sweet perfection of thy
foot? Hath he worshipped the embodiment of divinity in thy whole
person
,
and, like a devout worshipper before his shrine, bent the knee in
homage to thy beauty.
He knelt before her as he ended, and looked the impassioned devotee he
had mentioned. The maiden was not unmoved by all this. She was of a
warm and susceptible nature, with a heart full of tenderness and love, and a
fountain of ardent feelings, ready to pour themselves out into a bosom that
she felt was kindred with her own. Love had led her to choose Sismarqui's,
and instinct now prompted her to shun the prince's. If he had been truly
of a noble and generous nature, had his love been pure and honorable, had
he been really worthy of her as a man, instinct would never have proved
false, and warned where there was no danger. In such a case the young
armorer would have had a powerful rival in the prince, even in sharing the
deepest affections of the maiden; for she was not unmoved by his subtile
flattery, not untouched by his deep and devoted passion. She looked up,
and fixed her eyes upon his face, as if his words had awakened momentary
reflection! Had the prince been other than himself  had he been the
generous Lord Cuiri, or the brave young Lord Esquitl, there would have
been, at least there
might
have been, (there is no guessing exactly what a
woman always will do,) some fear that Sismarqui's poor perishing tendril,
allowed him by the prince, would soon have perished indeed. There was
something, however, in the prince's face that she shrunk from, and the
tendril
of her virgin love clasped, as if for protection, closer the stay it had
clung to in her lover's heart.
`Noble prince,' she said, her heart more strongly fortified than ever; `I
have listened to thee, and feel grateful for the interest you have taken in a
poor maiden like me. I feel that I am in your power; but I am sure if you
truly love me, you will not make me its victim. I cannot love you.'
`You speak more kindly than thou hast yet done. If I permit you to go
free, will you give me hopes that I may gain an interest in your heart?
Wilt thou permit me to woo on the same terms with this Sismarqui?'
he asked, with a confident smile, taking her hand, and looking up into her
face, his eyes sparkling with animation and hope.
`Nay, your highness, think of me no more,' she said, with painful
earnestness
.
`Remember the princess, to whom thou art betrothed, my lord
prince!'
`Have I not told thee,' he said, with a slight flush of anger, that the
princess will henceforward be nothing to me?'
`It is a lover's quarrel, my noble prince! It will be healed when thou
dost next meet her.'
`
Never,
Fatziza! I do hate the princess as deeply as I love thee.'
`And dost thou hope I will believe that thou dost wish to solace thyself
for the loss of a princess' love, with that of a net-maker's daughter? No,
no, my lord prince! Such love as thou bearest towards me is not
incompatible
,
in thy estimation and the world's, with that thou shouldst entertain
for her,' she said, with spirit.
`The gods are my witnesses!' he cried, `that you do me wrong! Hark
ye, sweet Fatziza, if by any chance blight should come upon this love of
Sismarqui
for thee, or death should remove him, leaving thy heart free when
its grief hath passed, wouldst thou not then give it to me?'
`No, my lord prince! I will never consent to dishonor!'
`Ha, I see it all! It is not, then, so much thy affection for him who is
betrothed to thee  so much thy indifference to me, that keeps thy
hard-sought
love in reserve, but doubt of my honor. Doubt it not, sweet Fatziza.'
`I can but doubt it, your highness,' she answered, with firmness; `or else
believe thou dost wish to make me thy wedded bride. This, thou knowest,
cannot be with thee and me!'
`Dost think so, pretty one,' he said, with a singularly mysterious smile,
that troubled her; `
wilt
thou be my bride?'
`My lord prince, I am pained and weary with this discourse. If you have
pity in your bosom, let me go free, as I was brought hither.'
`In one minute. Hearken to me, child! I have a secret to convey to
thee; for I love thee passionately, and must try my last argument; for while
there is hope that love or ambition may move thy obdurate heart, I will use
no other means.' He then added, solemnly and impressively, `if thou wilt
be mine, Fatziza, and now consent to bestow thy affections upon me, I will
make thee my princess!'
`Thou dost laugh at me, my lord prince, presuming upon my credulity;
and after take advantage of my trust in thy promise, to put me to shame
among the maidens of the land!'
`Hear me,' he said, approaching her ear, and speaking in a low, deep
tone, that startled her with its emphasis; `the Princess Eylla hath offended
me this night beyond forgiveness'
`Well, my lord prince?' she said, seeing that he paused.
In his manner and eye, more than from his words, she painfully
believed
that she read, at the instant, evil to the princess, and fearing from his
silence that he would hesitate to reveal what he at first contemplated doing,
she resolved, with that firmness and decision of character she had more than
once shown the possession of, to seem to come over to his views; and, by
giving encouragement to his hopes, induce him, without reserve, to make
her a confidant of all his intentions, in reference both to the princess and to
herself.
`The princess, my cousin, hath offended me,' he repeated, more
impressively
;
`and,' he added, with a blazing glance, `an Aztec never forgives an
injury!'
Fatziza involuntarily shrank before his look, but her self-possession was
not shaken, nor did her purpose falter.
`The princess is something quick with those that she likes not. Is it not
so, my lord prince?'
`She hath the subtily of the serpent, beneath the mask of a dove!'
`I like not duplicity, my lord, much less in a princess.'
`The princess hath it to perfection. I have made an escape that I
espoused her not.'
`There is, indeed, much room for gratitude the espousals do not take
place.'
`Ha! dost talk thus?' he exclaimed, with pleased surprise.
`Is it truth, my lord prince, that the princess will never become thy wife?'
she asked, with seeming interest.
`She never will,' he answered decidedly.
She looked on the ground, deliberatively and thoughtfully, when he had
answered, as if the seeds of ambition, which he had been dropping into her
heart, had taken root, and were growing. This idea crossed his mind, and
he furtively and delightedly watched the expression of her features.
`Well, child, what art thou thinking of?' he asked, at length, with
impatience
and curiosity.
`Will the princess, then, be sole empress?'
`There seems deeper meaning beneath thy words than appears to the ear,
maiden.'
`I was wondering,' she said, with finished address, `if it would be policy
for you to permit the princess to reign with her dislike to you. Knowing
you to be an enemy to her, she will be tempted to use her power to thy
inconvenience.'
`The gods have spoken by thee!' he cried, grasping her hand with
warmth. `Thou art indeed a wise and well-judging woman, and would
become
a throne! Thou lovest not the princess well, I see, Fatziza. Ne'er
one beautiful woman loved another.'
`Wilt thou remain in the empire, my lord prince, when the princess takes
the throne?'
`Wherefore this interest in me?'
`I have weighed thy words to me. It were, indeed, better to wed a
prince than a serf. But '
`Thou art coming to thy senses! But
what?
'
`It were better to wed an emperor than a prince,' she added, boldly,
anticipating
her suspicions of his own purposes by
her
words.
`Thou hast it,' he cried, with animation. `I see I shall find in thee a
worthy coadjutor to my schemes.'
`Hast thou thought as I have hinted,
my
lord prince?' she asked, with
real earnestness, relieved to find her suspicions confirmed, and that her
artfulness
had not been used in vain.
`I will tell thee, Fatziza, what I have thought,' he answered with stern
emotion. `Listen! for I feel I am addressing a bold and kindred spirit,
who feels with me, and whose interests are linked with mine own.'
`I would have you think so, my lord prince.'
`I did but need a woman of thy strength of mind, and who has shown her
preference for ambition to love, to secure what I have in view. The
princess'
days are numbered. I have this night sent her a poisoned flower, and
do but wait to hear if it hath taken effect. The moment she is dead, I
assassinate
the emperor in his bed, call my guards about me, and proclaim
myself
sole monarch.'
Fatziza trembled at this fearful development of the plans of the wicked
prince, and her heart bled with sympathy for the princess, whom she felt
she had no power to rescue. Yet she listened, with outward composure, and
by her command over her countenance, deceived the prince as to the nature
of the effect his words had produced upon her. He looked to her, as if he
expected her to reply.
`This is a sanguinary plan, my lord prince,' she said, with an energy of
tone that came from the deepest feelings of horror, but which he referred to
kindling ambition; `but its conception is worthy of yourself.'
`Its success is certain. But I have not told thee all. There is among
thy class a spirit of disaffection and hostility to the government, which must
ere long break out. I have, while you have been within this chamber,
conceived a plan,  since thou hast shown thy strength of character,
and thought better of thy foolish love for a serf,  which will unite both
the nobles and the people, and heal the spirit of insurrection which now
menaces the stability of the throne.'
`Name it, my lord prince.'
`Canst thou not guess it?' he said, taking her hand, and speaking in a
subdued and passionate tone.
She hung her head in silence upon her bosom. How little did he know
the feelings that swelled her heart. It was with the deepest emotion of
disgust
and fear, that she could reply, in her assumed character, with which her
sick heart had long since wearied,
`I cannot guess, your highness.'
`Hear, then. It is to make you my empress.'
`My gracious prince.'
`Nay  be not moved. 'T is policy, as well as love, that dictates it, as
't is ambition towards this very thing that has changed thee. Thou seest I
have read thy heart, the while. What thinkest thou of this? Is it not
well conceived? I shall, by elevating one of themselves to the throne,
please the mass of the people, and ever hold them as a foil to the jealousy
and hostility of the nobles.'
He rose and rapidly paced the chamber, as if impelled to motion by the
irresistible impetuosity of his mind.
`'T is ably conceived, my noble prince; and promises, if the first steps be
securely taken, to be most successful,' she answered, also rising, from the
impulse of her feelings.
`Thou dost pledge thyself to me in this matter?' he demanded, with
animation
,
returning, and placing his hand firmly upon her wrist.
`I pray your highness, give me some little space to collect my thoughts,
she answered, with hesitation, and alarmed at his energy.
`No. Thou art a woman of native coolness of character, and hast
composedly
spoken thy ambitious hopes, as if they had been deeply weighed in
thy mind and in thy heart. No. The promise must now be given, Fatziza.
I must seize the throne, and I must win the good-will of the Mexitlian race,
to maintain myself securely upon it, against the opposition of the faction of
the princess. This I can gain only through yourself. No moment's delay
can be given  none should be needed, methinks,  where the price is an
imperial crown.'
It is the vastness of the end that makes me timid at the outset, my lord
prince. Give me some hours' time to consider it,' she said, with alarm too
perceptible in her manner to escape him. He fixed his gaze steadily upon
her, not with suspicion, but with surprise and angry impatience.
`What means this? Hast thou not promised me thy love? Didst thou
not, thyself, ere I had breathed it to thee, suggest this very scheme? Dost
thou retract?' he demanded, menacingly, doubts of her consistency suddenly
arising in his mind. `Thou shalt not leave this apartment, I solemnly swear
to thee, maiden, till thou hast knelt with me beside yonder brazen altar of
the sun, and pledged thy life and thy honor, thy heart and thy hand, to this
thing.'
`Then the pitiful gods have mercy on me!' she exclaimed, lifting her hands
to the heavens. For an instant, she seemed to be absorbed in silent prayer.
Then, with a kindling eye, blazing with the spirit of a lofty purpose, she
looked him steadily in his face, and said, in a firm and indignant tone,
`Prince! I devoutly thank the gods that I am not the wicked thing you
would believe. I have deceived thee. The sentiments I uttered, the hints
and suggestions I gave words to, were not my own, but as it were the fingers,
with which I felt thy heart's pulsations, first suspecting the disease. I did
but put a shaded lantern before me to light my way, myself in shadow, down
into the dark recesses of thy guilty soul. No, prince. I am no assassin,
no enemy of the Princess Eylla,  no friend of the wicked and usurping
Prince Palipan! Dishonor or death, I am conscious, is before me. I choose
the latter; and, therefore, do thus fearlessly confess my duplicity, to make
thy fury and resentment o'ermaster thy passion.'
The prince stood looking upon her, while she was speaking, with
amazement
only equalled by his fierce mortification. He could with difficulty
believe
he heard aright. But she was there before him, spirited, resolute,
and defying. His first impulse would have been to strike her to the heart.
This she had hoped her words would have prompted him to do. He was
fully aware of this feeling; and, with the greatest efforts, restrained
himself
,
by a deeper vengeance he meditated. He was silent, and, for a few
moments, walked the chamber, as if to collect his mind. At length, he
stopped opposite to her. Her cheek was like alabaster, for its deadly
paleness
.
Yet she met his look with firmness.
`Proud virgin, thou hast sealed thine own death. But not by my hand.
Fear not thou dishonor. I have no passion mingled with the potion I would
give thee. Death,  such a death as thy soul would shrink at, did I name
it,  is in store for thee.'
She had nearly fallen to the floor, overcome not so much by his terrible
words, as by the calm, vindictive manner, in which he addressed her. She
apprehended, she knew not what. She wished for instant and sudden death.
She sank upon a seat near, and was silent, from the keenest disappointment
and fearful forebodings.
`Fatziza,' he at length said, in a changed tone of voice, `I will forgive,
and let thee depart.'
She shook her head in despair.
`I will now leave thee here, foolish victim of thy own folly,' he continued,
with bitter reproach, `and promise thee, that within the half hour, I will send
some one, who will liberate thee.'
She was silent. She felt the prince would never forgive, and that some
dark, deceitful motive was hidden beneath the sudden change in his manner.
`Thou dost not believe me,' he said, with a sinister smile. `Very well.
Thou shalt soon learn if I speak truth or not. Fare thee well! I shall see
thee no more alone. When I next behold thee, it will be in the presence
of thousands, whose eyes, like mine, will be equally fixed upon thee.'
CHAPTER VIII.
THE VICTIM.
With
these ambiguous words, which, notwithstanding his promise to
liberate
her, rung with threatening, he was about to quit the chamber as he
had entered it, when the Tlascalan bounded into the apartment from the
secret
opening. His face indicated the greatest alarm. In his hands he
carried the robe and cap of the mascal, he had snatched from Casipeti as he
flew past him.
`Your highness, fly!' he cried, eagerly.
`What hath happened?'
`The princess suspected the otol, and tried it upon one of her slaves.
It soon killed her, and confirmed her suspicions. She hath ordered Lord
Cuiri instantly to arrest you and myself, and hath but now despatched a
messenger for the emperor. A moment later, and you are lost. Fly. I have a
disguise that will protect you for the present, till you can better insure your
safety.'
`Where are my guards! Why did you not fly to them, and bring them
around me? Thou hast lost the empire to me. Ho, there! I will defend
myself,  and let the die be cast at once!'
`Your highness, I had but time to hasten hither. There is no escape to
join your guards. By this time, Cuiri, with a party, are without your door.'
`I will face them! They dare not arrest a prince of the blood.'
`The lord Cuiri will show little favor, where the princess hath commanded
him to act. Your highness, there is no alternative but instant flight. I pray
you, put on this disguise, and leave the palace by the terrace, the route you
came with the maiden.'
The prince reflected a moment. In one instant, he felt all his plans had
been subverted. But his was not a spirit to despair. He felt the madness
of placing himself in the emperor's or the princess' hands, at such a moment.
He had yet hopes of accomplishing his end, through the instrumentality of
the very causes that threatened their defeat.
`No. I will not fly. I will remain here. This retreat is secure.'
`'T is suspected by the princess, and others. Thou wilt be sought for
here, if the walls have to be taken down. Fly, prince!'
`Whither?'
`To the Temple of the Sun.'
`Ha! thou sayest well, Tlascalan.'
Without further delay, the Tlascalan placed the cap he held in his hand
upon the head of the prince, casting, at the same time, his snowy plume to
the ground, and threw over his person the ample embroidered robe of the
mascal.'
`I will quit the palace; but I fly not from lord Cuiri, but to reach by
another route than I intended to do, my uncle's throne,' said the prince
calmly
.
`But what shall be done with this haughty beauty? 'T will just fulfil
my purpose in view! She shall be borne thither also; canst thou carry
her?'
`She will impede thy flight. We fly for our lives, your highness.'
`Thou for life, and I for a throne, rather,' he said, sternly. `Tlascalan,
thou shalt bear her to the temple! If I let her remain here, my vengeance
is lost to me forever. Take her up in thy arms, and muffle her voice. If I
lose my throne and life, I will not lose my revenge on this woman.'
During this scene, Fatziza had sat a surprised and startled listener. The
intelligence of the escape of the princess filled her heart with joy; the
command
for the arrest of the prince inspired her with hope. She listened
eagerly to detect signs of the approach of the nobleman despatched to arrest
them; but as their language began to relate to herself in person, she became
once more alarmed with the most painful apprehensions that at last the way
of escape and rescue that seemed to be opening for her might be lost. When
she heard their decision to bear her to the sanctuary with themselves, she
mentally resolved to die rather than be borne away from her hopes of succor.
The Tlascalan approached her, to cast over her head the cape of feathers
he had torn from the shoulders of the prince. She bounded away from him
with a piercing shriek. The prince instantly placed his hand upon her
mouth, while the Tlascalan drew the cape over her face, and took her up in
his arms. At this instant, the sound of voices was heard within, and the
wall was struck with heavy blows on the other side, shivering the mirrors of
itzli
that paneled it.
`That shriek hath brought them upon us,' said the prince. `To the
Temple
!
Within twenty-four hours I will make it my palace.'
With these words, he left the chamber by the private door by which
Fatziza
had been borne into it, and, followed by the Tlascalan, with her in his
arms, he hastily traversed the galleries and courts to the terrace. As he
gained this, he saw the light kindled by Hucha, and heard the ringing of
the shield of war mingling with the shouts of the insurgents.
`It is as I anticipated,' said he, `the people are in arms. By the sacred
Huitziltli! I am in mind to place myself at their head, and so take the
throne!'
`My prince,' said the Tlascalan, `seek your own safety first. Every
avenue
of the palace will be soon guarded to the water-side, and escape will be
impossible. Once in the Temple, you can act.'
`You speak truly. I would have thy burden safely deposited there. It
was my intention soon to have sent a priest for her, had not this ill news
come, not expecting to be driven thither myself. Hark! the shouts. I hear
strokes of steel. They are engaged in contest!'
The prince soon gained the lemon-grove, and thence reached the
water-side
.
Here, instead of taking a boat, he followed the quay some distance,
leaving the palace behind him, until he came under the second marble bridge.
Here he ascended a flight of broad stairs, and came into the moon-lit square
of the Temple of the Sun, in which he had witnessed the evening sacrifice,
and also held discourse with Casipeti. They took the north side of the
magnificent square, keeping within the shadows of a colonnade, composed of
tall, beautiful shafts of the purest marble, that adorned that side of the
square. On the west side towered the glorious Temple of the Sun, a gorgeous
pile of marble, and gold, and silver, and precious stones. Emerging from the
colonnade, they came before it, and passed beneath the altar on which stood
the statue of the deity, elevated before its lofty portal. This divine image
was of vast size, of black and shining marble, and dressed richly in feathers
and gems. A radiating crown, like the sun half-risen, was upon his brows,
and from his ears and under lip hung stones that shone like stars. His breast
was covered with massy gold, and on it was painted ascending smoke, to
represent
the prayers of the distressed. A large emerald, shaped like a
human
heart, was suspended from his neck by a chain of gold, and bracelets of
the most beautiful description were upon his arms. In his left hand he held
a golden fan, set round with beautiful feathers, and polished like a mirror, in
which he was supposed to see every thing that happened in the world.
Upon
the wrist of his right arm was perched a silver eagle. He was seated
upon a white cloud, wonderfully sculptured to resemble the truth, from snowy
marble. At his feet was the lesser altar of brass, upon which, once a year,
the fairest virgin in the empire was sacrificed to him.
The prince turned to his attendant, on coming within the shadow of this
deity, and said in a quick, stern tone,
`Place thy burden on the steps of this altar, and remove the cape. The
god hath heard maidens shriek, and will again. 'T is music he well loves!'
The Tlascalan obeyed him, and Fatziza, though nearly insensible from
suffocation, recognized at a glance the place to which she had been brought.
She looked at the altar of human sacrifice and shuddered. The prince, who
was attentively regarding her, smiled.
`Proud maiden,' he said, coldly, `thou hadst best look closely upon it, to
familiarize thy vision with it.'
`What mean you? whither do you convey me, prince?' she cried, with
agony.
`Thou shalt know in time. Wilt thou walk, or shall the Tlascalan again
carry thee?'
`Nay  if I must go forward, I will walk,' she said, shrinking from the
slave.
`Lead her, then, and follow me,' he commanded, going towards a small
portal of the temple to the left.
It had no door, for the temple was never closed, night or day. Passing
rapidly along a low arched avenue of brazen pillars, on one side of the vast
area of the temple, he came to a circular hall that seemed to be lined with
plates of silver. The representation of the sun, in dazzling
itzli,
blazed in
the light of a sacred flame on an altar beneath, like the sun itself. The floor
was of mosaic, exquisitely laid, and beautiful hieroglyphical paintings
adorned
the polished surfaces of each stone. Various articles of sacred furniture,
all of solid gold, were dispersed about the apartment, and upon the steps of
the altar. Opposite the altar was a table of gold and a bed. Standing by
the altar, watching the flame, which burned in a censor of gold upon it, was
a venerable priest, in crimson robes, with a tiara of silver, adorned with
pearls, upon his head. As the prince came to the entrance of this oratory
of the temple, the veil of which was drawn aside, he paused with reverence,
and waved his slave to remain behind where he was. He then cast aside
VOL. II. 9
his disguise, entered the place, and silently knelt an instant before the
sacred flame. He then rose to his feet.
`Reverend priest, I seek this sanctuary of the deity for protection,' he
said in a voice of command rather than of prayer.
`Thou hast it, prince,' calmly answered the priest, without betraying
surprise
or curiosity.
`I would see the high-priest,' he said, in a voice which had little reverence
for the sanctity of the place, or the sacredness of the person whom he
addressed
.
`He is in his chamber, within,' answered the priest, directing his glance
towards a door beneath a canopy on the left.
Without hesitation, the prince advanced towards it, opened it, and entered.
On a couch, in a room hung with arras of silver cloth, and richly and
beautifully decorated with the sacred feathers which had been offered to the
deity by worshippers, reclined a stern old man of great majesty of aspect.
`Thy blessing!' said the prince, kneeling beside his couch.
`The gods bless thee, my son, and render thee the instrument of blessings
to the people. 'T is long since thou hast visited the Temple of the Sun.
This devotion at this hour speaks well for the preservation of the purity of
our religion when thou shalt wield the sceptre.'
`It is my reverence for the gods, and my regard for their honor, holy
father, that hath brought me here now. On the seventh day hence is the
great day of annual sacrifice. Hast thou a victim?'
`A maiden exceedingly fair hath been sent for from some village beyond
the walls.'
`Hath she been brought hither?'
`Once  but hath escaped. Alas! that such have not piety greater than
love of life; they think more of the short happiness they hope by living to
enjoy here, than of the glorious felicity they shall be rewarded with in the
abodes of the gods!'
`Thou sayest truly, holy sir. I have found a maiden who is the most
lovely in the empire  a fit offering to the deity.'
`The gods reward your piety, my son. If thou wilt send her to the
temple
,
she shall at once be delivered over to the sacred virgins of the altar,
instead
of the virgin I spoke of, for the sacrifice.'
`My piety, holy father, would not let me delay. She is already without
the oratory.'
`Hath she piety, or doth she consecrate herself like most other virgins,
with reluctance, to the deity?'
`She will need thy authority and coercion,' replied the prince.
`It shall be cared for,' answered the High Priest, striking a silver bell
near him.
It was instantly answered by a youth, in the white habit of one of the
servitors of the temple.'
`Send to me four of the younger virgins of the altar,' said the priest;
and then turning to the prince, he said, `conduct her hither, noble prince,
and with thy own hands place her in my charge as the representation of the
god.'
The prince left the private chamber of the High Priest, and, on
reentering
the oratory, to his surprise beheld Fatziza, at the same instant,
break from the Tlascalan, and cast herself at the feet of the priest who was
watching the altar, and implore his protection. From the moment the
prince left her, she had been devising some safe means of flight. From the
side cloister in which she was standing, she could survey the vast interior
of the dimly-lighted temple, and its gloomy grandeur and vastness of space
filled her soul with awe. Here and there, above its pavement, altars of
black marble rose, crowned with statues, like spectres in the dim light, while
in far-distant niches, priests, in crimson vestments, could be seen watching
the lamp of sacred flame that burned before its peculiar shrine. She would
have fled in that direction, but the distance, gloom, and silent mystery of
the immense space terrified her. She looked back, but she felt if she even
gained the outside of the temple, she could not fly beyond pursuit. She
beheld
the venerable priest before her, and thought she saw benevolence
stamped upon his features. She hesitated; then, as if impelled by some
irresistible impulse, darted away from the Tlascalan, and threw herself at
his feet, just as the prince had ended his interview with the High Priest.
`Save me, I implore thee, by the sacred deity, whose minister thou art!'
she cried.
`Thou shalt have sanctuary, maiden,' he said, kindly, believing that, like
others, and like the prince but now, she had sought the temple for refuge
from the consequences of crime she had committed; it being the custom, not
only for the people to seek it on such occasions, but for the priests to grant
it; and such sanctuary, once granted, could not be violated, even by the
emperor.
`The gods! she hath taken sanctuary,' cried the prince, with vexation.
He instantly returned, and informed the high priest. `What shall be done?'
he demanded.
`She was, at the moment she sought it,' answered the high priest, `a
victim
devoted to the altar, and was, therefore, beyond the reach of the altar's
protection.'
`'T is true,' exclaimed the prince, joyfully. `Thou hast accepted her, and
she was but to be delivered to thee when she sought it. But,' he said, as if
struck with a happy thought, `this may be turned to a favorable issue. Send
for her hither, as if to ensure her safety, and then deliver her over to the
virgins of the sun. She may not know she is other than a refugee till the
morning of sacrifice. Thus thou wilt have a quiet victim.'
`'T is best, perhaps, some little deception like this were practised,' said
the high priest.
While he was speaking, four youthful maidens, arrayed in white robes,
entered the chamber, holding between them a rich heavy veil of transparent
silver cloth, each having a corner laid across her right arm. None of them
were beautiful, but all had sprightly, cheerful faces, and light, airy figures.
`Virgins of the sun, heaven hath sent the annual victim to the temple.
Go forth and meet her!'
They immediately commenced a hymn to the deity, in a sweet, wild
strain, and slowly entered the oratory. Fatziza lifted her head, and, with
pleased surprise, beheld them, while her ears were entranced with the music
of their choral voices. They came around her with slow and graceful
motions, and, as she knelt bewildered, cast over her the silver veil, chanting,
Hail, sacred sister  bride of heaven!
Hail, holy virgin of the sun!
To thee our god's high faith is given
By thee the bridal crown is won!
Bride of the sun, the sacred sun
The ties of earthly love are riven;
The time is near, the altar waits,
To give thy spirit back to heaven.
Hail, holy virgin of the sun!
The earth from thee shall pass away;
And when a few more sands have run,
Thou 'lt soar above, in bride's array.
And there, the bridegroom, god of heaven,
Robed in the everlasting fire,
Will wait to clasp within his arms,
Thy spirit from the sacred pyre!
Chanting these words, in a singularly sweet and touching manner, they
gently raised her, wholly passive, from the ground, scarcely conscious of her
situation, and only feeling a calm sense of relief from the presence of the
prince, and in the companionship of her own sex. She knew not enough of
the rites of the temple to be aware how fatal was such companionship!
Instead
of fear or doubt, she felt that she was in a sanctuary, and under the
protection of the sanctity of the place; if, as she rose to obey the maidens,
she reflected at all upon their object, it was to assure herself that they were
conducting her to a place of security.
They led her between them, still chanting a soft and soothing air, forth
from the oratory; but, instead of reentering the chamber of the high priest,
they turned aside into a door to the left, and slowly disappeared. The
prince, who had witnessed all this, listened to their low, sweet hymn, dying
away in the distance, until it was lost in silence, then took leave of the high
priest, passed hastily through the oratory, and resuming his disguise, joined
the Tlascalan.
`Now,' said he to him, `that I have accomplished this, I shall avail
myself
of my disguise, and return to the palace. I must act! Follow me!'
On reaching the extremity of the gallery, instead of leaving the temple,
he turned aside into a recess, in which burned a lamp, by the side of which
there lay a pile of torches. One of these he bade the Tlascalan light, and
then placing a key in a door, he entered, and disappeared in a dark passage,
that seemed to descend beneath the foundations of the temple.
CHAPTER IX.
SISMARQUI AND THE PRINCE.
When
Sismarqui had crossed the court of the silver serpent, he found he
had taken a direction, after passing by the fountain, that was conducting him
to the entrance of a dark gallery, instead of to the doors of the prince's
apartments
,
as they were described to him by Casipeti, who was, as it has been
seen, detained behind by the young lords in the rotunda. Looking back
after him, and not seeing him, he was too impatient to wait for him, and was
turning to the right, trusting to good fortune to guide him, when some one
laid his hand familiarly upon his shoulder.
`Ah, cousin Palipan! thou art late abroad in full armor. Whither art
thou going, that thou takest the gallery to the emperor's stables! I would I
were a knight, and then I would have an ass to ride.'
`I pray thee, good fool,' said Sismarqui, familiar with the person and
costume
of Sulukis, `detain me not.'
`I have a rare sport to tell thee, cousin,' said the joster, clinging to his
cloak, and walking beside him, notwithstanding Sismarqui's endeavors to get
rid of him; `the mascal o' the palace, having an over-stock o' wit and flesh,
ha' begotten another body to put them in, as like his own as two peas
save that the new one hath something more freshness o' wit.'
`Nay, fool, detain me not.'
`Whither goest thou?'
`To the prince's  that is, to my own apartments. If thou wouldst talk
with me, guide me thither.'
`Dost thou need a guide, cousin. An' it were late i' the afternoon, I
should ha' suspected good wine had shortened thy memory. Dost thou see
that door with a statue of Virtue on one side, and a statue of Vice on the
other?'
`Yes.'
`Well, those statues are the emblems o' the government.'
`They are not the prince's rooms.'
`No, they lead to the emperor's throne-room. He ever walketh in and
out between them, and so he walks i' the government.'
`Trifle not with me. Go forward to the door of the prince's room.
Methinks
it is one of yonder entrances.'
`Dost thou see three marble steps, leading to a door o'er shadowed by a
silver eagle?'
`Such is not the description of it,' said Sismarqui to himself, who had been
too much occupied with thoughts of Fatziza to pay proper attention to the
waterman's instructions. `I see it, good fool,' he answered, hastily.
`It is the entrance to the apartments of the empress. I wept three whole
hours when she died, and wore so melancholy a look for a month afterwards,
that the emperor banished me his presence, saying I kept him in too fresh
remembrance of his dead wife.'
`Fool, release my cloak, or I will leave on thy pate painful remembrance
of the hardness of my iron gauntlet,' answered Sismarqui, angrily.
`Nay, then; if thou art so drunk, prince, as not to know thine own door,
how should thou expect me to know it who have not wit enow to give a
mouse an idea. But I will have pity on thee, and tell thee. But when,
betimes
,
I would crave favor o' thee, thou must bear in mind my charity.'
`I will do it, good fool.'
`First answer me one thing. Am I not a drunken prince, and art thou
not a fool?'
`I see it not.'
`Because thou hast let wine steal thy brains out. I will prove it thee.
Art thou not a prince?'
`Well.'
`Art thou not drunk?'
`Be it so.'
`Then thou art a drunken prince?'
`Have it any way that thy humor likes, so thou lead me to my door,'
answered
Sismarqui, impatient, yet feeling it necessary, if he would gain his
end, to indulge his wayward humor in some degree.
`Well, being a drunken prince, thou hast parted with thy wits, seeing
thou knowest not the way to thy own chambers, when they are within
twenty feet o' thy nose. Having lost thy wits, thou art become a fool. Dost
acknowledge?'
`It cannot be disputed,' said Sismarqui, smiling, but vexed at the delay.
`Nay, cousin. Be not in too much haste,' he said, detaining him to the
spot. Having proved thee to be a fool, I will in one word prove myself to
be a prince.'
`Speedily.'
`I never did a thing speedily in my life, cousin Palipan. Speed hindereth
the growth and consistency o' fat; the wind o' speed finds its way into the
pores, and makes it light and spongy. Besides '
`Nay '
`Thou being a prince,  and a drunken prince,  art like me, as I have
proven by my logic, for having parted with thy wits. If a prince be a
fool, then a fool is a prince, and I being a fool, am a prince. So we are
brothers.'
`And what is the end of this? Wilt thou not guide me, as I command?'
`The end o' it is this, cousin,  that I and thou are equal yoke-fellows.
Thou hast no right to command me to show thee the way, and I am under
no obligation to obey thee. Give me thine arm, brother prince, and let us
go square together. But I guide not a foot,  not I. Thy ignorance o' the
way and my knowledge o' it will be like two street walls on each side to
keep us in it; and so, by the favor o' the gods, if we go forward we may
stumble upon thy door.'
With these words, the fool took Sismarqui's arm, and leading him,
notwithstanding
his declaration to the contrary, a few paces to the left, passed
with him round an angle of the court, which had concealed from him the
door he sought.
`Dost thou know that portal, cousin?' asked his guide, pointing to it.
Sismarqui instantly recognized the description Casipeti had given him;
and, casting off the fool from his arm, instantly approached it, and without
hesitation threw open the leaves, entered, and disappeared within it, with his
hand resolutely grasping the hilt of his sword.
`There is discourtesy and ingratitude most blank,' soliloquized the fool,
looking after him. `No, I am not a prince, for I have too much breeding,
if this be the quality o' it. Methinks,' he said, after an instant's reflection,
`I have suspicions o' this prince. He were not drunk, for he staggered
not; yet he knew not his own door. If he be the prince, he hath not only
taken to folly of late, but hath got a deeper voice and less courtesy than his
wont. There be two mascals i' the palace; why may there not be two
princes? I 'll keep my eye on the door, and see what comes o' it. Ah!
there is the mascal, yonder, or his other self! I will go gossip with him on
this matter.'
As he was about to cross the court, he saw the Tlascalan pass Casipeti,
disrobe him, and the next instant fly past him, and disappear in the
chambers
of the prince. Ere he could recover from his surprise at witnessing
this, and the transformation of the mascal, he beheld the monarch and
princess
cross to the apartments of the empress, and also the scene, though too
distant to hear any thing, that passed between Casipeti and the Peruvian
maiden. After seeing him assume the disguise she brought to him, and
afterwards
follow him into the ante-room of the empress' chambers, his
amazement
knew no bounds. He rubbed his hands with glee, and capered with
boyish delight.
`Here is matter! here is treason! here is mischief! The Tlascalan hath
a hand in it,  the prince hath a hand in it,  the Peruvian hath a hand
in it,  and Sulukis shall ha' a hand in it. And there goes the Lord Cuiri,
and he has a hand in it.'
Thus speaking, the fool glided along in the shadow of the colonnade, that
surrounded the court, stole towards the door of the ante-room, into which
Casipeti had entered, and slowly opening it, disappeared within.
Sismarqui, on entering and passing through the outer room of the prince's
chambers, found himself in an apartment that for an instant dazzled him with
its light, and the richness of its decorations. Drawing his sword, he glanced
around for the prince,  for some sign of the presence of Fatziza. He
beheld
,
on a table, the cap without the royal plume, which the prince had worn
on his expedition to the net-maker's street, and on the floor he beheld the
dress and armor he had laid aside, and which answered the description which
Hopo and Harani had given him of the costume of the cavalier. He was
turning away from them, when his eye rested on a flower, which had been
caught in a link of the corslet. With a beating heart, he bent down and
removed it. It was one of a wreath which he had himself presented to
Fatziza in the morning, and with which he knew she had adorned her hair
that evening. His heart bled,  his spirit burned. But he needed not
these evidences and tokens to assure him who had robbed him of his
betrothed
bride. They served, however, to assure him that she was here.
He placed the flower to his lips, and on his heart, breathing the deepest
retribution.
A brief search convinced him that the apartment was empty. He
discovered
a door opposite to the secret passage leading to the hidden
apartments
of the prince, and threw it open. It admitted him into a sort of private
chapel, dedicated to the sun, whose image of gold was seated upon a pedestal
of marble at the extremity. He surveyed the place strictly, and then
advancing
to the altar, knelt on one knee, and solemnly renewed his vows of
vengeance and retribution; for all hope of saving Fatziza in honor had
taken flight. Rising to his feet, he passed through an arched door behind
the altar, and came into a beautiful gallery, lighted alone by the moonlight
streaming through casements of rose-colored
itzli.
It was adorned with
numerous
statues to deities, and seemed an avenue of pedestals and altars. He
knew that he was in the temple of the lesser gods, contained within the
palace, and which the emperor himself had dedicated. On one hand, he
beheld the god of mirth, on the other the god of wine. Here was the god
of the imagination, there the tutelar deity of friendship. Every attribute of
the deity was also here deified, and every virtue had its statue and its altar.
A soft, rich light was diffused throughout the place, and silence held her
reign there. Neither priest nor sacred flame was visible. Here was no
worship ever performed, no oblation offered. Their presence was supposed
to insure wisdom, virtue, and power, to the head of the empire, and endue
him with all the attributes, of which they were the sacred emblems.
Impressed
with awe and with solemn feelings, he moved with reverence along
this stately avenue of statues, in search of some outlet that might conduct
him to the prince's more private chambers. While engaged in the search,
the Tlascalan, with the mascal's robe, passed through the apartments he had
quitted, and ignorant of his presence, disappeared through the secret door
into the room, where he had found both the prince and Fatziza. In the
meanwhile, the Lord Cuiri and the elder Lord Oznenetl, having ascended
the steps of the Lions to the Court of the Fountain, crossed towards the
very gallery, at the entrance of which Sismarqui had encountered the jester,
and slowly traversed it to its extremity, where it branched off to the right.
Here they lingered awhile in silence, the young noble pacing the pavement,
thoughtful and impatient, until the quick, measured tread of men-at-arms
caught his expecting ear, from a distant part of the dim passage. In a few
moments, the young cavalier Tlanotl joined him, with six men-at-arms.
`Thou hast too many,' said Lord Cuiri, quickly. `We need to be secret
in this arrest.'
`They are all tried men, and will be needed, my lord, to guard the
doors.'
`Very well. Follow me.'
`Who is to be arrested?' asked the elder cavalier, as he walked along by
the side of the Lord Cuiri.
`The prince.'
`The prince! Is it treason?'
`Murder and treason both, my lord,' he said, sternly.
`What hath he done?' asked the noble, with amazement.
`Attempted the princess' life, by poison.'
`Then did I never prophecy evil of this man for naught. 'T is a bold step
to arrest him, my lord.'
`'T is by the princess' commands. Silence, now, my Lord Oznenetl. We
are in the court. Tlanotl, I leave to you the disposition of the men-at-arms.'
`I will place two within and two without the door, lest he should attempt
to escape on seeing us, for his guilty conscience will give him suspicion of
our purpose. He is certainly within, for I saw him pass to his chambers
not three minutes before the terrified messenger from the princess came
for you.'
`You will enter close after myself and Lord Oznenetl, with the two
remaining
men-at-arms, and wait in the ante-room till you are required to
act. I would show the prince courtesy for his blood, but he hath little claim
to it.'
With these words they advanced to the elegant portal of porphyry, and
the young nobleman instantly threw open the ivory folds of the door, and
entered. The Lord Tlanotl disposed of the men-at-arms on either side, and
advancing near the entrance to the inner apartment, took his position. Lord
Cuiri and the old cavalier entered it together.
`He is not here, at least,' said the latter, looking round, with
disappointment
.
`There are secret chambers within his apartments, I am told,' said the
young nobleman, `and these panels of
itzli
must cenceal the secret entrance to
them. He cannot have learned our intentions, and fled!'
`Here are apartments beyond,' said Lord Oznenetl, approaching the door
Sismarqui had left open.
`That leads towards the gallery of statues, and thence to the throne-room,'
answered the young nobleman, `by which there is a subterranean passage
to the Temple of the Sun, known only to the members of the imperial family
and to the high priest. If he hath flown, he hath taken that way. I will
first well examine this wall. Ha! here is a fragment of a silk robe shut in
between these two nicely fitting edges of
itzli,
as if some one, in passing
hastily through, had caught and rent it. This is the secret way!'
He violently struck, with the head of his sword, the frame of the panel,
which the Tlascalan's haste had indeed betrayed, shattering the transparent
materials of which it was composed, and, with the point, attempted in vain
to force it open. Sismarqui had heard the noise of their entrance in the
apartment, and instantly turning back from the throne-room, into which he
was entering, suddenly made his appearance before them. His sword was
drawn in his hand, and his whole bearing was hostile. He looked the prince
to the life.
`The prince!' exclaimed the old cavalier, advancing upon him.
Sismarqui
stood silent on seeing the two nobles, and, full in view, in the next
apartment, the men-at-arms, instead of him whom he expected to find there.
`I arrest you, sir,' said the Lord Cuiri, going up to him, `as a prisoner of
state!'
Sismarqui started with surprise and alarm! He believed himself to be
arrested on his own account, as leader of the revolt. His first impulse,
remembering the amnesty promised by the princess, was quietly to surrender
his sword. His next thought was of Fatziza, and his yet unavenged honor,
and he resolved to defend himself, and, if it were possible, to effect his
escape. He therefore retreated a step, and placed himself in the door
through which he had entered, in a defensive attitude.
`Nay, prince,' said the young nobleman, resolutely, `we do not intend to
do battle with you. Your intention has failed. I arrest you by the
princess'
commands.'
`I know it, my lord; yet the princess hath pledged herself to give me
pardon with the others.'
`Pardon! traitor.'
`I do confess myself having been a traitor, but I had trusted to the word
of the princess.'
`Your highness, this is trifling! Give me your sword!'
`My lord, this is not the prince's voice,' said the old Lord Oznenetl, aside
to the young nobleman.
`The bars of his vizor disguise it; yet it doth sound something strange.'
`He doth not take fire at our intrusion, as the prince would!'
`Will it please your highness to lift your vizor!'
`I perceive you take me for one I am not,' answered Sismarqui, seeing,
from the present aspect of things, that the prince's character was no better
protection than his own proper one; `I am not the prince, but come hither
to seek him!' As he spoke he lifted his visor, and showed them the face
of a stranger.
`Who art thou?' demanded the young nobleman, with the deepest
feelings
of disappointment and anger, `that has assumed the bearing and
costume
of the prince?'
`I am Sismarqui, an armorer. The prince hath borne off my betrothed
bride, and I assumed this guise, which he left behind him, to gain admittance
into the palace to rescue her.'
He had scarcely replied, when he heard the alarm of revolt, and saw the
bright light of the signal Montezuma had decided upon, flashing up the sky.
`What means this?' cried the nobleman, springing to the casement. `See,
the altar on the Temple of War is lighted! Hark  the brazen Tlalonzon!'
`It is revolt!' cried the young cavalier Tlanotl. `I heard something
rumored of disaffection, and couriers have been passing hourly between the
palace and garrisons, so that the emperor hath had intimation of it.'
VOL. II. 10
`It is revolt, my lord,' said one of the men-at-arms. `A man from the
city, in the disguise of the mascal, came to the battlements and tampered
with us. One or two of us have listened to him, to learn his plans, that we
might make them known to the emperor; but afterwards he came and said
it would not take place. One of the insurgent leaders was called by him
Sismarqui. He said he was an armor embosser.'
`Ha! then the gods have placed him in our hands! This accounts for
his presence here. Seize and cut him down if he resist. The prince must
have headed these revolters!'
Sismarqui had been hardly less surprised at the sound of the insurrection
than they. He stood listening with surprise. The words of the
man-at-arms
,
and the mention of his own name, drew his attention. The command
of Lord Cuiri, and his suggestion as to the movements of the prince,
suddenly
aroused his love for life and his desire of vengeance, and he instantly
turned, and darted away through the hall of statues.
`Pursue him!' cried the young nobleman to Lord Tlonotl and the two
men-at-arms. `He cannot escape far. I will remain, and search for the
prince, if he be not the mover and head of yonder revolt. Hear their
shouts! There goes the battle-cry of the imperial guard! There is,
indeed
,
fighting between the men-at-arms and the people! The emperor hath
prepared for it.'
`If it were a fair battle between armies,' said the old cavalier, listening to
the noise and roar of the distant conflict, `I would not rest till I were
mingling
in it. But 't is but butchery there!'
`Bring hither yonder marble statue of the god of Loyalty, which his
highness
can now dispense with, and break in this panel,' said the young
nobleman
to the two men-at-arms in the ante-room; `the god will freely give his
image to aid in the discovery of a traitor.'
Sismarqui reached the throne-room on flying from his pursuers, and,
ignorant
of the outlets of the place, stood for an instant at a loss what course
to take. All was darkness and silence around him. Suddenly he saw a
door open beneath the throne, and two persons make their appearance. One
of them he instantly recognised as the Tlascalan, who bore a torch in his
hands; the face of the other he did not see, but, from his dress, he thought it
to be Casipeti, by whom he had been deserted on his way to the prince's
apartments. He bounded towards them, as his pursuers entered behind him.
`Hold, Casipeti! let us escape by this door!' he cried, seizing him by the
arm. `Fatziza is lost forever, and I believe the prince to be with the
insurgents
,
for he hath turned traitor to the throne.'
The prince  for it was he himself, who, trusting that pursuit would be over,
and confiding in his disguise, had returned by the subterranean passage to
the palace, for the purpose of placing himself secretly at the head of his
guards  was not a little surprised at the words of the speaker, as well
as amazed at the perfect semblance of himself he presented to his eye.
Ere he could speak or reply, the men-at-arms came up, and attacked
Sismarqui
.
The prince instantly recognised the young cavalier Tlonotl, and
divining his object in being in that part of the palace with soldiers, struck the
torch out of the hand of the Tlascalan, but not before the young noble had
discovered, by its light, who he was. He bounded forward to arrest him,
with the cry, `It is the prince!'
`Who?' cried Sismarqui, the while defending himself stoutly.
`He in the mascal's robe,' answered the young noble.
The Tlascalan threw himself between his master and Lord Tlanotl, and
struggled with him, while the prince fled, pursued by Sismarqui, who escaped
from the attack of the men-at-arms, with a cry of vengeance.
`Ha, men-at-arms! If the prince is to be caught, that fierce youth will
arrest him,' cried Lord Tlanotl. `Seize this lynx, that hath twice nearly
put his knife into my side. 'T is the Tlascalan!'
One of the soldiers went to his aid, and, after a violent conflict, made the
slave prisoner; while the other, a moment after, followed by the young
noble, pursued the prince.
Lord Cuiri heard the noise of pursuit from the gallery of the statues, and
the next instant the prince, divested of his cap and robe, bare-headed and
flushed, bounded into the chamber, with Sismarqui close behind him. His
glance fell on Lord Cuiri, and he instantly saw his perilous situation. He
was armed only with a light sword, and all the defensive armor he wore was
a silver cuirass he had put on before his interview with Fatziza. Lord
Cuiri and the old noble instantly presented their swords at his breast, while
Sismarqui, seeing that he would be arrested, withheld his revenge, and stood
by. The prince, finding escape impossible, at once assumed a characteristic
position. Drawing himself up with princely haughtiness, he glanced round
sternly upon them, and said in a tone of well-feigned indignation and
surprise
`How now, lords! what means this! I am the prince!'
`This confession, your highness, explains our meaning without further
words,' answered the young nobleman, sternly. `I arrest you as a traitor!'
`Ha! this to me?' he cried, with a flashing eye and a burning cheek.
Leave my chambers, nobles!'
`Only with your person in custody, my lord prince,' said the young man,
decidedly.
`What hath been urged against me?'
`I neither charge with crime, nor pass judgment, your highness. I but
obey the princess, who hath given me orders to arrest you.'
`My pretty cousin!' he said contemptuously; `I acknowledge no
authority
but the emperor's. If he command, I obey.'
`I command thee, then, traitor!' cried the stern voice of the emperor,
who entered the apartment at that moment by the passage through the throne
room, `to surrender thy sword and person to the Lord Cuiri.'
`The prince in silence gave up his sword to the young nobleman, and then
folding his arms on his breast, turned towards the monarch, with a
countenance
expressive of the deepest sense of injury and consciousness of
innocence
.
`Your majesty,' he said, with a degree of humility that formed no part of
his true character; `I am falsely accused. The guilt you lay to my charge,
I am innocent of.'
`My lord Cuiri, you will conduct this traitor to the dungeon, called the
Axuzco dungeon, once occupied by a traitor less guilty than he.'
`Hear me, your majesty,' he cried, casting himself on his knees before the
myielding monarch.
`The princess, not I, is to be your judge, prince,' he said, sternly.
`Then have I little hope, save to fall a victim to a proud woman's jealous
humor.'
Fear not! the gods shall weigh the justice she administers!' answered
the emperor. `Lead him away! But place no chains upon him.'
`Once more, my gracious uncle, I implore thy indulgence  I appeal to
thy sense of honor. I am of thy blood  an Aztec prince  thy nephew!'
`Therefore the more darkly guilty in thy crime,' replied the emperor, with
indignant sternness. `Lead him away!'
`Never!' he cried, with fierce exultation.
`He bounded forward, and lighted upon the marble slab. It instantly
revolved
with him, and shut him from their sight; but Sismarqui, who had
been forgotten in the deeper interest felt for the prince, and who was just in
the act of questioning him about Fatziza, reached the spot at the same
instant
,
and caught the panel with his sword, ere it returned to its position.
He forced it back, stepped upon it, and was also irresistibly carried into
the room after him. The prince was in the act of flying through the door
on the opposite side, when the armorer caught him, violently drew him back,
and cast him to the floor. He then placed his foot upon his breast, and the
point of his sword to his throat.
`Who art thou that pursuest me in my own shape?' cried the prince, with
fear and horror.
`Thy evil destiny.'
`What wouldst thou, man or demon?'
`Vengeance.'
`Have I wronged thee?'
`To unforgiveness. Confess where thou hast secreted the maiden thou
hast made the victim of thy princely lust, and then die!'
`Art thou Sismarqui?'
`Does thy conscience bid thee ask it? I am.'
`The maiden Fatziza hath not suffered wrong,' answered the prince, with
that irresisitble sincerity of tone that the young man's heart was filled with
joy. He removed his foot from his chest, but still held his sword to his
throat.
`I believe thou sayest truly, prince,' he answered.
`I swear it, by the gods! She hath received no wrong at my hands, save
bearing her hither.'
`Where now is she, prince?' he demanded, resolutely.
`Let me rise, serf, and I will tell thee.'
The sword was removed, and the prince got to his feet. His face
expressed
fear, rage and mortification. He looked distressed, and his whole
appearance served to excite sympathy and commiseration, rather than
resentment
.
`Well, your highness,' demanded Sismarqui, as these thoughts passed
through his mind.
`Aid me in making my escape, and I will tell thee.'
`My head would then answer for thine. Dost thou hear! they are taking
down the wall!'
`There is a way of escape for us both by this door, and so round a terrace
beneath the battlements to the water. Follow me!'
`Hold, Prince Palipan,' said the young armorer, standing between him
and the door, `you have wronged me in abducting the maiden, although she
may have been preserved from dishonor. I feel little desire to have thee
escape.'
`Then thou wilt never know where the virgin is thou searchest after,' he
answered, with determined malice. The wall shook at this instant as if
giving
way, and the prince struggled for the door. The monarch's voice was
heard encouraging those who were at work.
`If thou wilt tell me so that I can surely recover her, I will let thee
escape.'
`Didst thou see from whence I appeared to you in the throne room?'
`Through a door beneath the throne?'
`It was. Enter that, and follow the passage to its termination, and thou
wilt find her.'
`Wilt thou swear it?'
`By the sacred gods! I left her there not twenty minutes since. Release
me, villain!'
`In whose custody?'
`Art thou not satisfied? Know then, in the custody of the priests of the
Temple of the Sun,' he answered, with savage triumph, seeing a part of the
wall at that instant fall in, and knowing now escape impossible.
`A victim?' demanded Sismarqui, with horror.
`She hath already been consecrated, and is beyond human reach,' he
replied
,
maliciously.
`Then perish, accursed monster! Those who seek thee shall find only thy
torn corse.'
With these words, Sismarqui seized the prince by the breast, and with
iron strength dashed him upon the ground. At the same instant the whole
panel fell in, and Lord Cuiri leaped into the room through the breach.
`Hold! slay him not!' he cried, catching the arm of the infuriated young
armorer.
`My Lord Cuiri, step not between me and my revenge,' cried Sismarqui,
fiercely, thrusting aside the young nobleman; and, placing his foot upon the
almost senseless prince, he would have thrust his sword into his body. His
hand was arrested by the elder cavalier, and the sword at the same instant
was struck from his hand by the Lord Tlanotl.
`Seize and hold him, men-at-arms,' cried the young nobleman, as
Sismarqui
struggled to reach his victim. `He hath nearly slain the prince.'
`It were a blessing from the gods an' he had done it ere we got in,' said
the monarch. `It would have saved both poor Eylla and myself much
trouble and pain.'
`Rise, my lord prince,' said Cuiri. Are you much hurt?'
The prince slowly got to his feet, pale and suffering. He made no reply,
but with a lowering brow folded his arms upon his chest, and seemed to
await his fate. The young nobleman looked at the emperor, as if for
direction.
`Let him be held prisoner in his room, since he hath suffered this,' said
the emperor. `My Lord Cuiri, I shall look to you for his safety.'
`My head shall answer it, your majesty. I pray your majesty,' he asked,
as the emperor was leaving the apartment, after having east a glance of
stern pity upon his unhappy nephew; `what disposition shall be made with
this prisoner, who hath been the instrument of placing the prince in our
hands?'
The emperor, who, from the first, had no thoughts or eyes, save for his
nephew, and who had supposed Sismarqui, if he had previously noticed him
at all, in the other chamber, to be one of the party of the Lord Cuiri, now
fixed his eyes steadily upon him, as he stood between the two men-at-arms,
a prisoner.
`By the eagle of Aztec! this is a fairer semblance of our royal nephew
than the sorry wretch who stands there. How is this, sir knight, or
whatever
thou art? The royal feather! and the prince's cloak! What is this?
Speak!'
`Your majesty,' said Sismarqui, endeavoring to compose his feelings, to
address his sovereign; `I am the son of Ota, the armorer and embosser of
shields. I am betrothed to a fair maiden of my own degree, whom the
prince, thy nephew, inspired by passion, did insult in broad day, as she was
seated in her father's balcony. I resented it, and unhorsed him.'
`Ha!'
`He was masked, your majesty,' answered Sismarqui, boldly; `and I did
suppose him one of the court knights.'
`And being a prince, the offence were greater, and more worthy of
punishment
.
Thou didst well, though thou dost deserve to lose thy head for
unhorsing a knight, even in intention, for so slight a matter as some passing
salutation. Proceed with thy tale. What did he?'
`Attacked me with his sword, which I broke!'
`Better still,' said the emperor, ironically, `I wonder not, my lords,
insurrection
is abroad to-night, if such be the mettle of the serfs. It chimes with
that of a certain Montezuma, who resisted my governor of guards, and
caused
the slaughter of some score of slaves and several soldiers.'
`It was this act of the prince, and the brow-beating of thy governor, that,
with other things similar, gave head to the revolt that now rages in the city,'
said Sismarqui, with a boldness, that, in a man in less perilous circumstances,
would have been madness; but he felt that nothing could add to his heart's
bitterness for Fatziza's loss, (for there was no mortal rescue of a virgin
dedicated to the deity,) and he was well convinced that he had no clemency
to expect from the emperor.
`This is ringing speech. What is thy name?'
`Sismarqui.'
`Hast thou seen the Lord Esquitl this night?
`I have, your majesty.'
`He hath consented to join the revolters; is it not so?' asked the
monarch
,
with a very slight smile.
`He has, your majesty,  since 't is known to you.'
`And promised to place the arsenal in your hands?'
`He did, your majesty.'
The Lord Cuiri and the other nobles, and even the prince himself, started
at this intelligence, so new and incredible to them.
`The Lord Esquitl a traitor!' repeated the nobles, looking one at the
other.
`Let this matter of the revolt pass for the present,' said the emperor.
`Lord Esquitl will give us good account of it ere long. What further of the
prince, and what is thy business here in such guise?'
`Hearing, an hour ago, that some cavalier had rudely borne away from
her home the maiden to whom I am betrothed, your majesty, I hastened to
her chamber, and did indeed find it vacant; but on the floor lay this eagle's
plume, and on the railing of the balcony hung this royal cloak of green
feathers. These told me plainly who had been the despoiler. I was then
cased in mail, as one of the leaders of the revolt. I placed the plume where
it now is, cast the cloak over my shoulders, and sought the palace to rescue
her or avenge myself on the prince. Aided by my disguise, I gained
admittance
hither, and was in search of the prince in his rooms, when these
nobles entered to arrest him. Now, your majesty, I neither cast myself on
your mercy, nor excuse my rebellion, though the princess Eylla, ere the
revolt broke out, hearing of it, sent and granted amnesty to all who would
retire to their homes without taking up arms. This I had done when I
learned my dishonor.'
`The Princess Eylla knew of this!' exclaimed the monarch.
`And sending for Montezuma, our chief, pledged to him her imperial word,
that all should be forgiven, and such changes granted as the people desired,
if they would keep submissive.'
`This is strange! 'T is wonderful, she kept it from me. The serf,
Montezuma
,
have an interview with her!' thought the monarch to himself.
`She knew it in its outset! I will question her of this by-and-by. Thou
didst not find the maiden, bold slave?'
`Your majesty saw me pursue and enter this room behind the prince.
I seized him by the throat, here, and bade him tell me where he had
concealed
her he had dishonored.'
`What said he, surely?'
`That she was still an honorable maiden; but that if I would permit him
to escape from thee, he would tell me,' answered Sismarqui, sternly, fixing
his menacing glance on the silent prince. `I let him rise to his feet, and
finding it too late to escape, and that he could deceive me no longer, he out
with the fiendish caption of his vengeance against me and her.'
`He slew her not?'
`No. Would to the gods he had. He conveyed her to the Temple, and
dedicated her to the Sun.'
`Ha! didst thou do this thing, prince?' demanded the emperor, with
stern surprise.
The prince remained silent and gloomy, and neither stirred nor lifted his
eye-lids.
`You have done worthy of death, slave, in this rebellion; but I leave you
to the princess, who, it would seem, hath taken the matter up,' said the
monarch, turning to Sismarqui, and speaking without anger. `But you
have suffered wrong at the hands of the prince, and I pity your sorrow. If
I had the will, I could not rescue the maiden my excellent nephew has so
revengefully sacrificed. Had she fallen a victim to his passion, I should
have regarded it lightly; but this is a refinement of revenge I was ignorant
of. Thou art a prisoner till the Princess Eylla's pleasure be known. Lord
Tlanotl will take thee to the prison. Prince, thou art a state's prisoner, and
for the present, this room will be thy place of confinement.'
`Here is the Tlascalan, your majesty,' said Lord Cuiri, pointing through
the breach to where this confidential slave of the prince was guarded,
between
two men-at arms.
`He shall be hung without mercy,  not that I know he hath been guilty
of any present villainy,  but for his progressive crimes.'
`He was party to the attempted assassination of the princess, your
majesty.'
`Then cast him into a dungeon till this matter be thoroughly examined
into. If my gracious nephew hath crack of escape, he shall have all leaning
of mercy to enable him to get out at it.'
With these words, the monarch left the apartment, and returned through
the throne-room to his own private chambers, from which he had been
drawn by the noise of the attempt to arrest Sismarqui and the prince. When
he entered them, he saw, standing by the casement that looked towards the
scene of revolt,  his prime minister, and one or two others of his
councillors
.'
`How goes this war of Esquitl?' he demanded.
`The fire on the altar hath burned quite out, your majesty, and the sounds
of conffict have nearly ceased.'
`There is now and then a good blow dealt, by the sharp ringing of it,' said
his majesty, glancing forth, and listening.
`It seems to have been a final one, for all is still,' said one of the
councillors
.
`The young Lord Esquitl hath shown himself a general, said the emperor,
warmly. `He better deserves the throne,' he added, to himself, `than this
recreant prince. And 't is the heaven's truth, this girl must not rule alone.
There must be found some husband to her taste, if he wield not the sceptre
conjointly with her. The race of Aztec princes must not end in me.'
He moved across the chamber as he gave shape to these thoughts, and
continued to pace it, in deep meditation upon the subject that had taken
possession of his mind. At length, he suddenly left the room for the
chambers
now occupied by his daughter, and which communicated with his own.
CHAPTER X.
THE PRINCESS AND HER LORDS
The
Princess Eylla, after being left alone in the chamber to which the
emperor had conducted her, sat looking forth from the lattice, with her mind
agitated by the events that had transpired. Grief and indignation filled her
bosom. Though gentle by nature, and endowed with every lovely quality
and heavenly virtue that render her sex the superior, she had firmness of
mind, and a quick, proud spirit, that resented and condemned guilt. Her
sense of justice overcame her charity for the prince's disappointed love;
and, although she pitied him for his fallen hopes, she severely condemned
him for his criminal retribution. After dwelling some time upon this
unpleasant
subject, she abruptly cast it from her thoughts, as if she would recur
to it no more.
`He hath dyed his soul in blood. He is guilty, and must abide his fate.
Yet his life shall not be on my hands. In years of distant exile he shall
repent his crime, if so be the gods will give him the grace of penitence. I
will think no more of him. My thoughts would dwell upon a more pleasing
theme. From vice in ermine they would contemplate virtue in the coarse
tunic of the serf!' she said, with a heightened glow upon her cheek. `And
is it true, my heart? Are thy affections placed thus lowly? Irresistible
love! how sudden is thy work! how wonderful thy power!' She was silent
and maditative a while, and then added,  `Methinks I should blush meditative
confess
this love for one so humble. Yet I do not. My heart bounds with glad
pride when it thinks of him. I have confessed to him my love, and shame
made not my voice to falter. No, my heart was in my lips, and how freely
did my love surrender it to him! And he is worthy. Oh, how noble hath
nature made him. How my love would keep all virtues upon him. To it
he seems every thing a man,  a prince should be. Nay,  let me think
no more of princes. Methinks, from the bent my heart hath taken, that the
gods are about to reverse the scale of degrees, and begin again at the line
of virtue from which, as men climb up higher on it, they wander away, till,
as in my princely cousin, no trace remains of it. If my hand go where my
heart hath been given, this noble youth will rekindle the spark of honor that
centuries of vice and luxury have extinguished. Ha! what light is on the
summit of yonder temple! 'T 'is the altar of Huitziltli in flame. Hark! the
tocsin of war. Those deep, deep, measured tones of alarm sound like the
knell of the empire. It is the beginning of the revolt, that Montezuma hath
not been able to stay. May heaven protect him, whatever else befall!'
she cried, with the deepest fervency of feeling. She gazed forth with a wild
and startled look. The whole city, with its temples, towers, groves, columnar
altars, and palaces, arching bridges and encircling walls, was illumined with
the bright, red light, while loud and sullen came the heavy tones of the
Tlalanzon, each stroke sinking to her heart. The shouts of the revolters filled
the air, and soon afterwards she heard the battle cry of the legions, and the
shrieks, clangor, thunder, and turbulent roar of men mingling in fight. Her
soul sickened. Her head fell upon her arm, and for several moments she
was without motion. At length, she lifted her head.
`My poor father! The people will prevail! I care not for the throne.
My heart hath taken a lowly mate, and will be content with a lowly destiny.
Yet,' she continued, with animation, `I would fain place him whom my soul
has chosen upon a throne! My heart would honor him to its full love.
Those fearful cries! Shall I go to the emperor to give the alarm! Nay,
he knows it as well as I, and will too soon send his legions to mingle in the
slaughter. Alas, I shall feel that there is but
one life
there! And that all
men are aiming at it! The gods protect him! Did they not love me
enough to obey my wishes  to confide in my promises, or loved they blood
better? Oh, that I could get some intelligence of his safety!'
At this instant Tzitzis entered from the ante-room, where she had left
Casipeti disguised as one of the princess' attendants.
`My noble princess!' she cried, as she entered, the people are in revolt.'
`I know it, Tzitzis. Fly and bring me some intelligence.'
`I know nothing. The guards at the palace gates are all doubled, and
every side I turned, (for when I heard the alarm, I ran forth to the rotunda)
I beheld only bodies of men-at-arms, standing stock and stiff, like statues,
with spears in their hands. All the galleries seem to be alive with soldiers,
waiting for some order. Indeed, my noble princess, I would not venture
forth for my life. Poor Felitza's terrible death hath terrified me.'
`Then sit thou here. I will call some one else to send.'
`Nay, my princess; I will go. But see, from the lattice  the flame hath
subsided, and the shield is no longer struck. The shouts are stilled.
`There is indeed a cessation of the dreadful conflict,' replied the princess,
going to the window. `Alas! what life must have been poured out in waves
of blood! I fear  I fear! Oh that I were a dove, that I might fly and
relieve my anxious heart! His absence and his danger but each moment
deepens my love  binds him closer to my affections!'
`What dost thou fear, my princess?'
`For him! If thou lovest me, maiden, bring me present intelligence of
his fate.'
`The prince!'
VOL. II. 11
`Yes,
the prince!
But not the prince thou dost mean!' she said with
lofty and enthusiastic feeling.
`Who? I will fly to obey thee.'
`Methinks thou art dull, girl.'
The Peruvian was not dull. She had, in the interest of subsequent events
let the handsome young bondman she had conducted forth by the private
postern after his interview with the princess, pass from her thoughts. The
princess' manner awakened her memory. The events of the early part of
the evening flashed upon her mind. Suspicion then, of her mistress' tender
regard for him, was all that she ventured to cherish in her thoughts. She
was now confirmed in them.
`I will bring you word so soon as a messenger can be sent and return,'
she said, with a bright smile.
`Thou knowest, then, whom I mean, gypsy;' said the princess, with a
blush. `Know thou, maiden,' she added, in an impressive voice, and with a
maidenly dignity that became her at such a disclosure, `that if the gods will,
I intend to elevate to the throne this Montezuma, as I have already elevated
him to my heart.'
`He is most noble and most worthy, gracious princess,' answered the
Peruvian
;
`but I fear the emperor.'
`This attempt of the prince upon my life will work in my favor. My
father will think no more of him, and leave me to my own choice.'
`Perhaps he might, should you choose my Lord Cuiri, who is related to
you by blood, but he will never give his consent for you to espouse a serf.'
`Call him not a serf  yet he is a serf. But I will make him an
emperor
.'
`Thou knowest the fearful curse, noble princess, that hangs over the heir
of thy house that weds against the will of the imperial parent, or the
revealed
will of the gods!' said Tzitzis with awe.
`There thou hast it,' said the princess, quickly. `Thou hast well said,
or
by the revealed will of the gods! This, be sure of, maiden,' she said, with
reverence and fear, `that I shall never incur the curse heaven hath suspended
above my head. 'T is too fearful to contemplate or speak of. But I shall
wed this Montezuma, mark you, by the will of the gods.'
`I trust thou wilt, my noble mistress,' said the Peruvian with doubt; `but
I fear his majesty! I would I could believe it as thou seemest to do!'
`Thou shalt! Know that there is a prophecy, that, like the eagle that
led our fathers hither, hath followed our race downward without lighting,
that saith, when a female shall inherit the sceptre of the Aztec monarchs, a
slave shall sit upon the throne. My faith is firm in this prophecy!'
`And this slave is
`Montezuma.'
`'T is wonderful.'
`And 't will prove no less true! Now go and bring me good tidings.'
Tzitzis, whose mind reflected ever the clouds or sunshine of her mistress',
and was only happy in her own happiness, left the chamber with a light
heart and cheerful hopes. Wonder and surprise were not passive in her
breast; but, leaving the indulgence of them to another time, she went lightly
on her mission. After crossing a beautiful hall adorned with sculpture and
paintings, formerly appropriated to the attendance of the ladies of the late
empress' court, when in waiting upon her majesty, the Peruvian entered
the small ante-room or portal where she had left Casipeti. To her surprise
she found he had a companion with him. She was about to despatch the
waterman to the city, when it occurred to her that, as a friend to Montezuma,
he might serve his interest, should he need such an auxiliary, better in the
palace than abroad. She therefore said, in passing him,
`Remain thou here, slave! If the princess call thee, serve her faithfully
What dost thou here, foolish Sulukis? Why art thou not asleep?'
`Asleep!' cried the fool, with astonishment in his visage, `Marry come
up! and who can sleep this night in all the palace, or in all Mexico, for that
matter? Here comes first a pair o' quarrelling mascals, as much alike as
thy two ears, and what should I do but see the sport o't! Then comes a
running here and a running there  a courtier this a-way, and a silly woman
that a-way! and what should I do but be kept busy looking no mischief went
on without my knowing of it! Then comes transformations o' the strangest
sort, wi' the emperor and cousin Eylla in the midst o' it!  all o' which
pertaineth
to treason! Then comes the banging o' the god's shield, and lights
enow in the sky to put one's sight out! Sleep, quotha!'
Tzitzis did not wait to hear him out, but left the portal to seek a
messenger
to despatch for some tidings of Montezuma. The fool looked towards
the door for a brief instant after she had left, and then, shaking his head
gravely, turned to Casipeti, who was seated on the step of a niche, in which
burned a portal lamp.
`Why ha' she not been asleep? Why art thou not asleep?'
`I wait on the princess,' answered Casipeti.
`Doth she go fishing to-night?'
`How mean you?' demanded the waterman, with surprise, and suspicion
of being known.
`What is thy name?' asked the fool, abruptly, without replying to the
interrogation
.
`It is  is  is  it
is!
' stuttered Casipeti.
`Thou hast a villainous name, cousin Iziziziz. Where wert thou born?
`Born?'
`Who had the begetting o' thee, that he gave thee such a heathenish han
dle for honest men's tongues to take hold o' thee by?'
`In Mexico.'
`And yonder Peruvian maiden, who hath not half thy years, was the
midwife,' said the wily and mischievous jester.
`Thou art in humor, good fool!'
`Thy mother was a mascal o' the palace, and thou didst come into the
world a waterman i' full feather, save thou wert not armed with a pair of
oars; and this Tzitzis wrapped thee in a slave's cast off garment, to keep
thee from catching cold.'
`Thou knowest me, fool!' exclaimed Casipeti, with alarm, taking him by
the shoulder.
`Should I not know thee, when I saw thee put together out of three
pieces!'
Help me to escape from the palace, and I will give thee a golden
xu.
'
That will buy me a silver whistle wi' a gilt chain. No, no! The
Emperor
'll give me five
xu
to have thee well hanged.'
`Thou shalt have five
xu
then, so thou give me guidance safely forth.'
`Hast thou got them, demanded the cautious fool.
`Here in my girdle.'
`Let me see thy purse, gossip! I ha' lived too long wi' courtiers, to trust
what a man's tongue saith. Out wi' thy purse and let me see five
golden
xu
in it!'
`Wilt thou let me walk forth beside thee, and wilt tell the guards the
princess hath despatched me on a message, so that they will let me pass.
Thou canst so engage them with thy folly, if thou wilt, they shall not heed me!'
`Why wouldst go, gossip?'
`I hear there is fighting in the city, and would see it.'
`I would rather keep safely here. Give me seven
xu,
gossip, and it shall
be done.'
`I have not seven
xu.
'
`Then thou art hanged.'
`Who is hanged? What sayest thou?' cried the Peruvian maiden,
returning
.
`I will have thee punished for intruding hither.'
`I ha' but been nursing thy bantling here, till thou didst come back. I
ha' a sympathy for him since I was at his birth, and was just thinking I
would like to be in at his death.'
`He hath discovered me, maiden, having seen me adopt this disguise,'
said Casipeti, with earnestness.
`Thou wilt hang him, wilt thou, fool!' cried she, threateningly, yet,
without
anger. `Thou shalt ne'er come to the servant's banquet-hall again to
feast. So, away with thee with thy hanging, sir cut-throat braggart.'
`I will not hang him, pretty Tzitzis,' he said, coaxingly tapping her on
the cheek.
`Then see thou keep secret that thou knowest him to be other than he
seems. When thy interests are involved, thou hast full sense enough.'
`'T is not sense, 't is discretion, Tzitzis.'
`Call it what thou wilt. See, then, thou be discreet,' she said, passing
towards the chamber of her mistress.
`Thou wilt give me the five
xu,
cousin.'
`For what?'
`For my discretion.'
`If thou wilt try to aid my escape.'
`It is done for thee, gossip.'
With these words he held forth his hand, and Casipeti placed three
xu
in it.
`I will give thee the remainder at the gates.'
`'T will smell o' bribery i' the noses o' the sentinels, cousin, and I shall be
hanged as well as thou.'
Casipeti added the remaining two pieces of gold, and then wrapping
himself
carefully in his disguise, followed him from the ante-room into the
colonnade
of the court of the fountain.
`Whom hast thou sent? What hast thou heard?' demanded the
princess
,
as Tzitzis reentered her chamber.
`Elic.'
`He is a good messenger.'
`He is a jealous one.'
`Thou forgetest this youth's destiny?' said the princess, reprovingly.
`But Elic knoweth it not, and went with reluctance. He accused me of
desiring to see him.'
`He will soon be undeceived, Tzitzis,' said the princess, smiling; `so do
not be pained.'
`Have they taken the prince yet?'
`The prince! I had forgotten I had sent to arrest him. The
nobler
prince hath filled all my thoughts! Go and learn what hath become of Lord
Cuiri! Bring me word if the prince hath been taken! Leave me; there
is my father's step!'
As the slave departed, the emperor entered her chamber, after
announcing
his presence by a light tap on the door. She met him with a tender
embrace.
`My dear father!'
`I seem to receive thee from the dead, my child, after thy escape.'
`What of my  of the '
`The treacherous prince hath been taken, after having once escaped. The
gods seem, indeed, to send madness upon those they intend to destroy. He
had got out of the palace, then threw himself back into the jaws of danger
again.'
`Where is he?'
`He was something bruised in the struggle with those who arrested him,
and I made his rooms his prison. The Lord Cuiri hath him in custody.
The Tlascalan is also taken. Alas, my poor, misguided nephew! I did
hope he would one day sit on my throne!'
`How appeared he? How met he the arrest?'
`At first, boldly  then, imploringly  then, with cowardice  and,
finally, with sullen submission.'
`My poor cousin! Now that resentment hath had its victim, I do feel
pity for him. What will be his fate, sir?'
`Death,' answered the emperor, sternly.
`Nay, do not shed his blood!'
`It shall not be shed. He has courage to die if he be of the Aztec race!'
The princess shuddered, for she knew the bloodless but fearful death
doomed princes must die.
`Wilt thou hold a judgment for him on the morrow. He may plead his
innocence; for, 't is true, I have no testimony from whom the fatal otol
came, save my faithful Peruvian slave's. But 't is evidence enough for me.
I need no further.'
`He hath confessed.'
`Confessed it!'
`I visited him but now, on my way hither! I found him silent and
gloomy, pacing his room. I asked him if he desired a trial. He replied
No, emperor; I confess myself guilty, not only of conspiring the death of
the princess, but of contemplating thine, had I succeeded, and then
ascending
the throne. '
`Heaven be thanked for thy escape, dear father!' she cried, with emotion.
`Alas! my wicked, ambitious, deeply guilty cousin!'
`He further confessed that his object was to unite the throne with the
people, by a union with a Mexitlian maiden, and thus fortify himself against
the opposition of the nobles to his usurpation, by his favor with these.'
`Said he so!' cried the princess, with a kindling cheek, all the woman
awakened in her. `Who was this maiden, sire?'
`The daughter of a net-maker, by the name of Fatziza! She has a
brother, Montezuma, who was the cause of the tumult in the afternoon, and
for whom thou didst plead so warmly. Why does thy hand tremble thus in
mine!'
`'T is nothing, sir.'
`The prince had conveyed to the palace, and confined her in his rooms for
this purpose, when, hearing of the order to arrest him, he fled with the
Tlascalan
for sanctuary to the temple. The maiden was previously betrothed to
a youth, who, like this Montezuma, has been conspicuous in this revolt! She
firmly resisted all dishonorable proposals of the prince, and when he proposed
to elevate her to the throne, she scorned him, accused him of his treachery to
thee and me, and so enraged him, that he determined to sacrifice her. He
therefore bore her with him to the temple, and dedicated her to the deity.
`Did this foul prince confess all this?' she asked, with surprise and
detestation
strongly pourtrayed upon her expressive features.
`He confessed it calmly, but with the subdued tone of exultation that
evinced the gratification it gave him to lay before my astonished eyes the
broad map of his well-schemed villainy.'
`It was the malicious confession of a desperate and bad man,' said the
princess. `Alas, I feel for this poor virgin! She must be saved!'
`It is impossible! It were wresting the very laurels of the gods from
their brows! It were impiety.'
`Will no other substitute be accepted?'
`None, save the deity himself should point one out by some extraordinary
interposition.'
`Hath this ever been done?'
`Never. The maiden must die.'
`Alas, Montezuma!' she sighed, sympathizing with the brother when it
should reach his ears.
`There is one who will feel it deeper than he,' said the emperor, who little
knew the depth of feeling from which that exclamation came; `her lover,
Sismarqui, who came even to the prince's room in search of her, and was
found there by Lord Cuiri, and mainly contributed to the prince's arrest.
He was himself arrested, by my command, for the part he has taken in
the revolt.'
`Confessed the prince further, sir?'
`No, save that he had truly loved you, but that he had loved ambition
more, and that he forgave you, for you knew him better than, until then, he
knew himself. The princess was silent, and the emperor added: `I then
asked him if he declined the trial of the throne. Yes, was his reply. I
then told him he should receive my sentence in the morning, and that I
trusted he would meet his fate with the fortitude of a prince.'
`Must he die?' she asked, earnestly.
`By to-morrow's sun rise,' was the stern reply of the emperor. `The fatal
cup hath already been commanded to be prepared. Nay, princess! this
traitor's fate should not move thee!'
`We have been children together, sire, and I cannot but recall a period of
time when once he was innocent. Besides, I believe he sincerely loved me!'
`Thou must school thy heart to forget him. This is a weakness that is
nearly allied to sympathy with guilt. Think of him as of the dead.'
`I will speak of him no more, sire! Alas, that he hath so fallen! There
was still a cord that bound him to my heart I knew not of, till I did now
feel it part,' she said, inaudibly. `Fare thee well now, prince! I have let
thee go forever.'
The emperor watched her face a few moments, until he saw she had
conquered
her feelings, and then said
`Thou knowest, Eylla, that the cycle of my government expires on the
seventh day from this, and that, by the provision of our imperial laws,
framed by the gods, I then immediately resign my crown and sceptre to my
successor. Thou, Eylla, art destined to take my throne! Thou wilt be sole
empress, while I, retiring to the temple, devote the remnant of my days to
heaven.'
`Oh, may they be prolonged, that I may ever have thee as my guide and
councillor,' she said fervently.
`Thou art a good child, and will make a good ruler of the empire. But,
EyHa, the race of the Aztec emperors, who, for seven centuries, have sat on
the throne, must not end with thee.'
`My father,' said the princess, bending her face to the earth, while her
heart began to throb with alarm.
`Nay, this
must be
spoken of,' he said, with kindness. `I would have thee
wed some one, who will make thee happy, and who will be worthy of thee.
I must look among the nobles now. I have thought of the Lord Cuiri, who
hath some princely blood in him, and of the gallant Lord Esquitl, his cousin,
who hath this night saved the empire. He hath, therefore, won it.'
`I pray you, speak not to me on this theme,' she said, with feeling, yet
with firmness.
`Hast thou aught to say against either?'
`They are both honorable men, and brave knights; but speak not to me
of them, I implore you, my dear father.'
`Has thy heart a preference for any noble in the empire, who is worthy
of thee?'
`No.'
`Eylla, thou must consider of this matter,' said the emperor, impressively.
`I would make thee and thy reign happy.'
`Not thus,  not thus!'
`I will leave thee to think of it,' he said, kissing her on the forehead.
`'Tis somewhat sudden; but I trust thy love for me and the future welfare
of the empire will induce thee to make some sacrifice.'
`I would make every sacrifice for thee, my father  but  't is sudden.
Give me time to consider upon it.'
`If thou wouldst let thy thoughts go more towards Lord Esquitl than the
Lord Cuiri, thou wouldst best please my humor,' he said, smiling, and rising
to leave the apartment. `I will question, and propose it to these lords.'
`Your majesty,' said Tzitzis, entering the chamber, with a silver scroll in
her hand, `a courier, who says he comes from Lord Esquitl, inquired if
thou wert with the princess, and desired me to hand this to your majesty.'
`From Esquitl! Then shall we know the issue of this rebellion,' he said,
breaking the gold thread, with which it was tid.
`Your majesty,' he read aloud, `will please to learn that the insurgents
are put down. The leaders,  Montezuma, Hucha, and one or two others,
are made prisoners. The city is again quiet. I have sent the prisoners
to the castle. I shall presently be at the palace, to make my report in
person
to your majesty.
Esquitl.
'
The princess listened till her worst fears were confirmed, by this
intelligence
of Montezuma's arrest. She then, wholly overcome by her feelings,
fainted away. The emperor was alarmed, and filled with wonder, at the
occurrence. Tzitzis flew to her assistance, and with the aid of both she soon
revived. She instantly felt that she had been guilty of a dangerous
weakness
,
in thus exposing the state of her feelings. Her first glance rested on
the face of the maiden, inquiringly, as if to ask her if she had betrayed
herself
.
The Peruvian shook her head. She then sought the expression of the
emperor's countenance, and discovered only alarm and wonder. By a strong
effort of her mind she recovered herself, and resolved to guard her emotions
until she could safely indulge them. The emperor had not suspected the
cause, and, after a moment's reflection, could refer it to none other than joy
at the happy issue of the rebellion. With this impression, he spoke.
`We may well give way to joy, my daughter, at this prompt termination
of this revolt. If it had not been for the early discovery made of it by Lord
Esquitl, and his noble conduct in action since, it would have got to a head
that no power could have crushed. But methinks I heard it was known to
thee, as well as to this young nobleman,' he said, recollecting at that moment
the words of Sismarqui.
The princess started, and looked confused, while Tzitzis, anxious to relieve
her mistress, said, with address,
`I found a youth, your majesty, near the water-side, and led him to the
princess, from whom she got it.'
`Is this truth, Eylla?'
`He gave me information of a contemplated revolt, and I sent him,
bidding
him, in my name, to intreat the people to remain quiet, and that
when I came to the throne I would redress such grievances as they
complained
of.'
`'T was a bold promise. Thou couldst no sooner redress one, than two
more would rise up in its place. The people are never satisfied. There is
but one way to govern them, and that is by making the very power that
awes them a grievance that shall swallow up all others. You see they
heeded not your wishes. I sent Esquitl, with some thousands of
men-at-arms
,
and you see he hath given a good account of them. Was not this
youth called Montezuma?'
`It was his name, sire,' answered the princess, with composure, assumed
from a deep sense of its necessity at such a time. For an instant, she
imagined
her heart's secret was discovered. She knew that instant death would
punish both her love and his ambition. But a second glance at the emperor's
face reassured her.
`Why did you keep the intelligence from me, when another hour's delay,
had not Esquitl discovered it, would have endangered the safety of the
realm? Methinks you had great confidence in this serf, Montezuma. His
head shall come to the block to-morrow, and so shall this Sismarqui's,' said
the emperor, in a stern and angry voice.
The Princess Eylla trembled, and remained silent; but her thoughts were
busy in running over a hundred plans for her lover's safety. At this
moment
,
one of the emperor's attendants came in.
`Your majesty, the Lord Esquitl is without, and waits your pleasure.'
`Admit him hither.'
`Not here, my father,' said the princess.
`Where can a successful soldier be so well received, on his return, as in
the presence of beauty? My lord, you are welcome. I owe you service for
your address and consummate generalship. The princess will thank you
in person for saving her empire, and bringing these insurgent leaders to
submission
and to the block.'
The young noble laid his hand upon his heart, and bent low before her, at
these words, and said gallantly,
`My life is ever at the disposal of my maiden sovereign.'
`I thank your lordship,' said the princess, in a low, embarrassed tone.
`This is sorry thanks,' said the emperor, reprovingly. `My lord, she is
something ill at ease from recent events that have transpired. Where have
you placed the prisoners?'
`The leader, Montezuma, I have placed in the cell adjoining the Axusco
dungeon. Hucha, a hunchback, and the most active leader of the revolt, I have
placed in a cell adjoining it. Some other prisoners of less note are in chains
in the castle keep.'
`'Tis well, my lord. Princess, thou wilt entertain my noble general here
until I return. I go to prepare for the further security of the city and throne.'
Thus speaking, his majesty instantly left the apartment. The princess was
vexed, distressed, and pained above measure, herein plainly seeing her
father's object, and knowing by it his firmness of purpose. She held the
young nobleman in the highest regard, and admired him for his bravery, and
high, chivalrous qualities. With feelings of a more tender nature she had
never once thought of him. She was silent, and for a moment, seeing her
so embarrassed, he remained so. At length he approached her, as if to
relieve her.
`Gracious princess, I beg leave to return you your signet, which this
Montezuma, possessing himself of by some means, showed to the people to
induce them, for some end of his own, to defer rising in arms to-night. It
was taken from him by the men-at-arms.' With these words, he presented
it to her on bended knee.
`I thank your care for it, my lord,' she said, coldly receiving it.
`Your highness is displeased,' he said, as if hurt by her manner.
`No, my lord,' she replied, her voice tremulous with some sudden
emotion
.
`My Lord Esquitl,'  she stopped, attempted to address him again,
and then burst into tears.
Struck with amazement and sympathy, he remained petrified. Of what
had he been guilty? How had he wounded her feelings? He could not
explain it, and gave it up, as a good knight should do when perplexed to
know why a pretty woman sheds tears, when she hath a mind,  a mazy
labyrinth,  which many an honest cavalier hath been sorely entangled in.
`My lord,' she at length said, with deep energy of feeling; `I must cast
myself on your generosity.'
`Name what I can do to serve you, noble princess, and it shall be done.'
`Thou knowest the prince hath  hath '
`I have heard it, your highness,' he said, understanding her.
`The emperor would now unite me, my lord, to a noble of the empire,
without my will. He will speak to you upon the subject. Though I
esteem this nobleman, I can never give my hand where I have not first given
my heart.'
`You may depend upon my desire to serve you,' he said, earnestly.
`Will you, then, tell my father that you do not consent to it?'
`As boldly as you would wish. But I fear me, your highness, he will
little heed me.'
`He hath resolved to leave it to yourself and the Lord Cuiri. Yet your
opposition may cost you his displeasure, my lord.'
`I would think of your favor, and forget it.'
`It may cost you your life, my lord.'
`I can never lay it down to well as in the service of my beloved princess.'
`I would, my lord, I could reward your devotion as I could wish to. You
have relieved my heart of a heavy weight.'
VOL. II. 12
What says Lord Cuiri, your highness?'
`I have not yet spoken with him. I do expect him hither soon.'
`May I ask your highness who is this favored, yet unfavored, noble?'
inquired
Lord Esquitl, with a smile.
`The emperor will inform you, my lord,' said the princess, with a degree
of embarrassment that did not escape him. `Ah! well, maiden, what is it?'
she asked, as Tzitzis came in from the ante-room.
`The Lord Cuiri hath been looking for your highness in your own
apartments
,
that he hath not been here sooner. He is without.'
`Admit him.'
The young nobleman started on beholding the Lord Esquitl with the
princess; but, recovering himself, made a profound and almost worshipping
obeisance to the princess, and said
`I have obeyed your highness' commands.'
`I have learned the painful result from the emperor, my lord, who has
just left me, desiring me to entertain the Lord Esquitl till his present return.
I fear me I have been but a dull entertainer.'
`I congratulate you, Esquitl,' said Lord Cuiri, whom the brief explanation
of the princess had relieved from a slight pang of jealousy that shot through
his heart, `on your brilliant achievement to-night.'
`It was a noisy affair while it lasted, but not a very agreeable one. It
was a slaughter, not a battle.'
`'T was strange the people should rise in this manner! I supposed them
peaceful and happy, under the long-established government of this throne.
It has been a stirring night, both within and without the palace.'
`My Lord Cuiri!' spoke the princess, abruptly, yet with emotion.
`Your highness.'
`The emperor, my father, whom I deeply love, as you do well know, and
for whom, but for his evil ambition, I was ready to have sacrificed myself to
the Prince Palipan, hath, within the hour, desired me to espouse one of the
nobles of the court.'
`Your highness surprises me!' cried the nobleman.
`I cannot obey him. Although, were circumstances different from what
they are, I might love, as now I esteem and honor, this noble; but, as I am
now situated, I cannot give him my heart, without which my hand were
worthless.'
`Well, your highness,' said the young nobleman, glancing his eyes
towards
Lord Esquitl, who, observing him, slightly smiled, as if he knew more
than he did know.
`The emperor is informed of my indisposition to this union  nay, of my
firm refusal to consent to it; yet, anxiously desiring it to take place, he hath
decided to refer it to yourself and Lord Esquitl. It will rest on your
lordships'
decisions.'
The suspicions he had began to entertain in reference to Lord Esquitl
were instantly dissipated by her final words, which seemed to exclude that
nobleman, as well as himself, from this honor designed by the emperor.
`Does your highness consent to this umpirage?'
`Cheerfully, knowing that I can fear no decision from you that will give
me pain.'
`Your highness may depend upon me to oppose it, when my decision shall
be required by the emperor.'
`Lord Esquitl hath pledged himself to do the same. I ask no more of
either of you, my lords, than this. You have increased my esteem for you.
What iron key hast thou stuck in thy silken belt, my Lord Esquitl?' she
inquired, abruptly, her eyes suddenly sparkling. `'Tis a new fashion of the
court.'
`The key of the cell in which this Montezuma is locked up. I should
have given it to his majesty when here, that he might appoint a jailer and
a guard.'
`Give it to me, my lord. I will hand it to my father,' she said, quietly.
He placed it on the table beside her, and said
`I will intrude no further on your highness' courtesy. I have duties that
call me forth. Depend upon my loyalty and devotion.'
`I do, my lord, and do sincerely wish I could give you a more grateful
return.'
Lord Cuiri also took his leave, and left the princess once more alone with
her Peruvian slave.
`Tzitzis,' she said quickly.
`Your highness.'
`Do you know the way to the dungeon in which the rebel lord, Axuzco,
was confined?'
`Yes, your highness, I could find it.'
`Take this key, be fleet and secret! Open the dungeon adjoining, and
lead privately hither the prisoner.'
`Montezuma?'
`Who else, maiden?
`I can scarcely lift the key, your highness,' she said, letting it fall heavily
upon the floor. `I can never turn, with my strength, the bolt to which it
belongs.'
`No, thou couldst not. Alas! I have no one to trust.'
`There is one in the palace I can confide in, your highness.'
`No, no! not in thy lover! he is one of the imperial guard! It is a
perilous
secret!'
I mean not Elic. It is one who came hither with Montezuma, and, by
some means, could not get out from the palace without detection. I once,
by address, rescued him by Montezuma's desire, as he beheld him on his way
to the postern, in danger of being arrested.'
`He is trusty, then, if he is Montezuma's friend. Bring him hither.'
`I left him in the ante-room, disguised as an attendant, but the fool,
Sulukis
,
induced him to leave it, with the promise of aiding his escape from the
palace. I met them near the rotunda, where the jester, instead of aiding his
friend, was proclaiming, in a loud voice, to a group of listeners, what a rare
virtue the slave had of changing himself, averring, that he could say
presto!
and turn him into a waterman before their eyes. I succeeded in getting him
from his peril for a third time, and he is now in the ante-room.'
`I would see him.'
The next instant Casipeti stood in the presence of the princess.
`Art thou a friend to Montezuma?'
`I am, noble princess.'
`He is in prison. This key will liberate him. The maiden will guide
you thither. Go, free him, and conduct him hither. Be secret, cautious,
and bold!'
`His person must be disguised, your highness,' said Tzitzis, turning back
from the door.
`Thou hast well thought of it.'
`There is a slave's dress in the ante-room,' your highness.
`Let that shroud his person. It shall soon give place to an imperial robe!'
the added, in a tone that only reached the maiden's ear.
Casipeti then received the key from her hands, and, preceded by Tzitzis,
bearing a lighted torch, with the slave's habit on his arm, quitted the
chamber
by a door opposite to that by which the emperor had retired from the
apartment.
CHAPTER XI.
THE PRINCE AND HEADSMAN.
Early
the ensuing morning, the emperor was seated in his cabinet. In
his hand he held a scroll, bound with a crimson thread, and sealed with the
symbol of death. At his feet silently knelt a man in black garments, with a
mask upon his face. The countenance of the emperor was stern, and his
firm mouth was compressed with resolution.
`Thou wilt bear this scroll to the Prince Palipan, sir headsman, as I have
commanded thee. Hast thou the cup?'
`It is here, your majesty,' answered the man, in a low, deep voice,
uncovering
his left hand, and exposing to his view a small golden goblet, shut
with a cover.
`It is well. Go, do thine office. Mark closely how he receives the
message
,
and how he beareth himself. I would question thee after.'
The executioner rose from his knees, and silently left the presence of the
monarch.
The sun shone brightly through a casement into the room in which the
prince was confined. He was alone; for the emperor had given orders for
the guards, which Lord Cuiri had posted in his apartments, to keep their
guard at the doors, and leave him to the solitude of his own soul. He was
seated, or rather reclining, with an air of lassitude, upon an ottoman. His
face was thoughtful, but calm; yet, at times, an expression of mental agony
would dart across his features, showing the state of the tortured spirit with
in. He had been defeated, disappointed, degraded! He was, therefore,
disgusted with life, and desired to die. He was brooding over his dark fate,
when a step caught his ear. He looked quickly up, as if having been in
expectation
of it. The executioner slowly entered the chamber. The hapless
prince's fortitude forsook him at the sight, and he sunk back upon the divan,
and covered his face with his hands. The struggle was but momentary!
He again lifted his face, from which, save that it was like marble for its
whiteness, all emotion had vanished. The minister of death approached, and
kneeling before him, silently presented the scroll he held. A shudder ran
over the prince's frame, as he extended his almost lifeless hand to receive it.
He opened it, however, with considerable composure, and read the contents
aloud, in an even tone:
`
Nephew,
The gods gave you life to elevate you, by its proper use, to
equality, after death, with themselves. You have defeated this intention of
your existence. The deity waits to receive back the gift of which you have
proved yourself unworthy. Degraded, dishonored, and despised, you can no
longer wish to live, and, like a brave man, have professed your desire to die.
This last virtuous wish, unhappy prince, I have seen fit to enable you to
fulfil, although, if I measured your punishment by your guilt, I should
condemn
you to live. May the river of death purify thy soul, and may the
gods yet grant you to begin a new existence in another state! Thou wilt
find the last best gift of heaven to man that hath outlived his honor, in the
cup I send thee! I commend thee to the gods.
Ulyd,
Emperor.
'
The prince dropped the hand that held the fatal scroll faintly by his
side, and for a moment he seemed to labor under the most terrific emotion.
His brow became flushed with the rushing current of blood from his heart,
and every fibre in his body seemed to be strung to its utmost tensity, by the
pressure of the struggling spirit within. He sprung to his feet, and rapidly
walked the floor for a few minutes. At length he stood still, with his face
up-turned to the morning sun, stretched forth his hands towards the bright
orb, and moved his lips, but in silence. After a brief prayer, his face
became
again composed, but pale; and walking towards the executioner, he
said, sternly
`Why dost thou fear to show me that which thou hidest in the folds of thy
mantle. Place it on the table!'
The executioner obeyed, and retired a few paces from the spot. The
prince approached, with a firm step, and took the cup in his hand. He
then removed the cover, and calmly surveyed the colorless draught.
`This, then, is the water of life immortal! This, then, is the Lethe of all
mortal grief! This quaffed, and it will matter not to me if I have missed a
throne, or won it  whether I have lived a serf or prince! This heals all
heart wounds, all injuries of the spirit of man. It is, truly, the best gift of
the gods to a man who hath lived long enough! It will bear me far beyond
my cousin's scorn, the emperor's wrath, and all men's tongues! It will open
my prison doors, and give me the liberty of the skies! Well, I am sick of
life. Crime hath never prospered with me, and I do begin to feel assured
't is never countenanced by the gods! If they are virtuous, and punish
guilt, then I may fly to an evil greater than that I suffer. But this is
torture
!
that can be no more, and present death will at least shorten that
which longer life would have in store for me. So I will accept my uncle's
charitable gift. 'T is but a draught, and all is over!'
He approached the goblet to his lip, shuddered, and replaced it upon the
table. For a moment his face was livid! He made a silent gesture without
looking towards him, to the executioner.
`Dost thou know the principle here hidden?' he asked, in a voice that
seemed to come from the grave.
`
Death!
your highness,' answered the man, in an impressive voice.
`But I would ask if it give instant freedom to the spirit? If,' he
continued
,
with painful earnestness, `if there be no fearful struggles  no
writhing
agony of the limbs  no pangs of torturing horror  no appaling
distortion
of the countenance, with starting eye-balls and foaming lips!'
`No, your highness, it is instant as the lightning. The pulse throbs not
twice after.'
`Go from me. I will take it,' he said with a composed voice, but with an
expression on the face, from which even the executioner turned away his eyes.
He again took up the cup, and brought it to his lip. His hand shook, and
he appeared as if he would have fallen. He hurriedly replaced the goblet
upon the table, and buried his face in his hands.
`'T is horrible!
I feel I cannot die.
To leave the bright world, the
pleasant skies, the birds and flowers, the smiling fields and glorious
landscapes
the thousand pleasures and delights of life! I cannot seal with
corruption these hands, these features, and this body, warm, glowing, and
throbbing with life! To think that when that sunbeam that lies so brightly
upon the floor, travels an inch further round, I shall be lying there, gazed
upon by this man, a corse  a thing for dogs to lick, and rude men to handle.'
`Your highness, time waits,' said the executioner, sternly.
`Time! Nay, methinks it flies at fearful, fearful speed!' He then
made an effort to compose himself, and succeeded.
A third time he took up the fatal goblet in his hand, and, turning to the
executioner, said with a smile on his ghastly features,
`Be patient, good sir, I will not keep thee much longer waiting.'
He then approached the divan with a staggering step, and sat down
upon it.
`I would fall decently when I die,' he said, in a tone of indescribable
emotion, calm and subdued although it was, by his resolution to die. `
Executioner
,
tell the princess I do confess the deep wrongs I have done her!
Tell her I have loved her
loved
her with all my heart  but, but  even
her image could not purify the heart in which it was enshrined! Tell my
uncle, the emperor, that I confess the justice of my doom. Now may the
gods receive my soul.'
He raised the cup with a firm hand to his lips  hesitated  withdrew it
a little distance, and looked slowly around the room, upon each object it
contained
,
then up to the bright skies. Here his gaze lingered an instant, and
then, closing his eyes, he raised the goblet steadily to his lips, and drank
off the contents. He remained in the same position for an instant
afterwards
;
the cup then dropped from his hands, his face became rigid, and he
fell back upon the pillow  a corpse.
A few moments after the departure of the executioner from the cabinet
of the emperor, Lord Esquitl entered. He was no longer habited in the
suit of armor he wore the night before, but in the rich costume of the court,
his only armor being an elegant gilt steel cuirass, and a sword by his side.
`I have sent for you, my Lord Esquitl,' said the emperor, advancing a
step towards the noble youth, and addressing him in a tone calculated to
inspire
confidence, `to talk with you on a subject very near to my heart.'
`I listen to your majesty,' said the young soldier, his thoughts instantly
referring to the communication made to him by the princess.
`The Prince Palipan hath, ere this, received my command to make use
of the only remedy left to him.'
`Death, your majesty?'
`He hath consented to it. The executioner hath borne to him the fatal
draught that wipes out his dishonor and that of his race.
Lord Esquitl was moved by this intelligence for a moment, and took two
or three steps aside to recover himself. At length he said,
`'T is pitiful! But he deserved it. Is the vile Tlascalan to be
punished
?'
`He was beheaded before dawn. Methinks the earth breathes freer.'
This event, my lord, will leave the throne without a male occupant.
The princess will soon ascend it, and if I find not a husband for her in this
wicked prince's place, I shall behold the end of my line. The sceptre of
the empire, which heaven hath placed in my hand, must not be cast to
the earth. It becomes both my gratitude to the gods, as well as my imperial
honor and human ambition, to leave my throne to my children's
children
!'
`Your majesty utters sentiments to which every true heart in the
empire
will respond.'
`I know it, my lord. Therefore would I see that this matter I have on
my mind be brought to issue. Look ye, my lord!' he said, abruptly, `I
have decided to give the hand of my daughter, on the day of her
coronation
,
to a noble of the empire. The Inca of Peru hath twice sent a
mission to my court to propose an alliance between his son and her. But
I have feared to look this way, as I like not the policy of that empire,
and I should fear its influence on this! It would be casting my empire
into his lap! It would be all Peru.'
`What saith the princess?'
`I never spoke to her of the proposal, looking then to betroth her to
my nephew.'
`Does your majesty consider it now?'
`No  not if I can find a noble in the realm worthy of her. I have one
in my mind, whom I would cheerfully give her to!'
`Your majesty, I should fear more the princess' union with a noble, than
even with the Inca's son,' said the young lord, remembering his promise to
the princess.
`Dost say thus? How means your lordship?' demanded the monarch,
with surprise.
`It would rouse the jealousy of the rest, and endanger the stability of the
throne you would consolidate by this measure.'
`There is some truth in this. Nevertheless, I have such faith in the
wisdom
,
courage, and military genius of this noble, that I should fear little but
he would keep that I gave him.'
`How does the princess Eylla regard the wishes of your majesty?'
`Not kindly. Yet he is worthy of her, my lord.'
`I pray your majesty, act not in opposition to her wishes.'
`She
must
marry, my lord!' said the monarch, in a determined tone.
`She has no one in her eye, and I therefore choose for her. If he consents,
she shall be his.'
`He will never consent, your majesty, if he have knowledge of her
reluctance
,'
said Lord Esquitl boldly.
`No?' exclaimed his majesty, fixing his eyes wide upon the face of the
young man. `This is bold! My wishes are my commands.'
`It is true, your majesty; but still, were he an honorable knight and
true-hearted
man, he would sooner incur your displeasure than be the instrument
of unhappiness to the princess.'
`By the black eagle of Aztec! thou art a free-spoken youth,' said the
emperor
,
with high displeasure. `What if thou hadst been this noble?'
`I still would have answered as I have done, your majesty,' was the firm
reply.
`Then thou hast already answered. Thou art he I would thus have
honored
.
But, my lord, I like not thy spirit. It is of the same traitorous
stamp that hath shipwrecked Prince Palipan. If I followed my will and
thy desert, I would place thee under arrest!'
`I pray your majesty, pardon me,' said the young lord, who had been not
a little surprised at the discovery of the honor intended him, and who could
not but smile at the extraordinary part the princess had given him to play
against himself. `Nevertheless,' thought he, `if she can love me not, I do
not repent what I have spoken. I would not, to be emperor, make her
unhappy
.
I wonder if my Lord Cuiri is also a victim to this sweet tactician!
His majesty may have proposed us both to her! Methinks if it were so, I
would like to hear my lord, who really loves her, take up her cause against
his own dearest interests.'
`My lord, I shall punish you no farther than you have punished yourself
by your opposition to my wishes,' said the emperor calmly. `Our interview
is at an end, my lord.'
The young nobleman retired, with more regard for the princess than
before
,
and, displeased with the emperor for desiring to make him the
instrument
of his own plans, notwithstanding the rich prize. But he was too
high-minded
and generous, and far too disinterested, to purchase even a throne
with the tears of a maiden. `Methinks,' he said, as he entered the rotunda
from the emperor's chambers, `that Lord Cuiri will be the next emperor;
for she said that it depended on my decision and his. I have given in mine
to his majesty, i' faith. Cuiri, if the emperor plays the same line with him,
will, for his love, assuredly repent himself, and accept the princess. Yet,
truly, she loves him no more than she does me. Yet, she did speak well of
me to my face, I, ignorantly wondering the while, what lucky rogue was so
well liked, yet so badly loved! Well, I am determined to aid her highness,
in this matter, to the end. I do believe that she has her heart on some one. A
woman,' he added, smiling, `situated as the princess is, under the
circumstances
,
would not so decidedly oppose so well-favored a cavalier as myself,
who hath done such execution of late among her rebel subjects,  or my
Lord Cuiri even, who loves her to adoration. Yonder is my cousin, Cuiri,
looking as meditative as if he were thinking of this very thing. There
walks towards him a messenger from the emperor. My life on it, he will
have the proposal made to him.'
Lord Cuiri instantly followed the messenger to the cabinet of the
emperor
.
`Ah, my lord,' said Esquitl, laughing lightly as he passed him,
`if thou wouldst be wise, presently repent thy pledge, given to the princess
last night.'
`Hast thou done it?' demanded the noble, quickly, and with a look of
suspicion.
`I pray thee, question his majesty, cousin,' he replied, as the nobleman
passed on his way. `Now I do pity from my heart, poor Cuiri. He will
suspect any other than himself to be in the emperor's mind; and, for very
jealousy, will deal hard knocks, that will only fall on his own pate. This
pretty princess hath given him a sad task. He will never forgive her for it
never. He is too sensitive ever to forget such an involuntary use of
himself to batter his own brains out.' With these words, he walked away
and mingled with the courtiers in the hall of attendance.
The emperor was looking from a window when Lord Curi entered his
cabinet, and did not notice him.
`I have obeyed your majesty's commands,' he said, advancing to within a
few paces of the window.
His majesty turned suddenly round, and stood, for a few moments, with a
hesitating manner, as if undetermined how to open the subject to him. At
length he asked, in a tone of assumed indifference,
`Hast thou seen the princess this morning, my Lord Cuiri?'
`No, your majesty. I trust she hath not suffered from the painful scenes
of yesterday.'
`I have not sent to her chambers; but a woman's spirit can endure much
without breaking, my lord.'
`The princess hath great fortitude.'
`I am glad to hear thee speak thus honorably of her. She is a noble
maiden. I deeply regret this unfortunate affair of my nephew, that hath left
the throne without a prince.'
`She liked him not ever, I believe, your majesty,' said Lord Cuiri, with
animation.
`Had he not shown openly this evil of his nature, she would have been
induced to espouse him, nevertheless, my lord. As it is, there is no further
consideration of it. The prince is by this time dead.'
`By his own hand!' exclaimed Lord Cuiri.
`By my command. He hath become his own executioner.'
`Is this indeed true, your majesty?' inquired the young nobleman,
between
surprise and pleasure. `Then hath your majesty removed from the
state one of its most dangerous enemies.'
`I do feel well assured I have done so, my lord. I wait but the return
of the executioner, to bring me tidings of his death. This event, my lord,
will leave the hand of the princess free.'
The young man's heart throbbed harder, and his cheek grew flushed with
anticipation. The emperor placed his eyes upon him, and seemed to wait
for him to speak.
`I have thought of it, your majesty,' he said, scarcely knowing what he
said.
`Ah, indeed, my lord!' exclaimed the emperor, lifting his eye-brows with
surprise.
`It did occur to me, your majesty.'
`Naturally. It has occurred to me, too. I have chosen a nobleman to
her husband instead.'
`Hast thou consulted her, your majesty?'
`I consult alone my own will, and the happiness of my empire,' answered
the emperor, haughtily. `I ask your lordship's opinion of such a union.'
`May I know, your majesty, the name of the individual so distinguished
by your regard?'
`It is one who has other claims to it, besides his own merits, that of being
connected by blood with the throne.'
`Lord Esquitl!' exclaimed the young nobleman, turning pale.
`Lord Esquitl is but related to
thee  thou
to the throne.'
`Your majesty does not mean  '
`But I
do
mean thyself. Why this consternation? Wilt thou also kick
at the throne, as thy foolish cousin has done?'
The young nobleman hardly heard or understood. His mind was
bewildered
with surprise, delight, perplexity. It was, then, himself, the princess
desired him to plead against with the emperor. He saw through her
design
,
so skillfully and delicately conceived, and his heart smote him. The
throne  the hand of the princess  was within his grasp. His deep love
for her tempted him to stretch forth his hand to seize it. His love, on the
contrary, also caused him to shrink from being the instrument of her
oppression
.
Besides, he recalled his pledge given to her firmly, and if need be,
VOL. II. 13
with his life, to oppose any proposition of this nature, that should be referred
to him. He then thought of her language: `I esteem and honor this noble,
my lord; but I can never give him my heart.' `Yet,' thought he, `I might
teach her to love me, if I had the opportunity.' At length, his love got so
the better of his fear of making her unhappy by accepting her hand, that he
would, doubtless, have acceded to the proposal of the emperor, but for his
word given to oppose it. Lord Cuiri had ambition as well as love; and
ambition gave boldness to his love, and held out to him the hope of success
in it.'
`Well, my lord, have you thought sufficiently long upon this subject?'
`Indeed, your majesty, I pray you give me some days to ingratiate myself
into the princess' affections. I could seek no higher happiness than this you
have done me the honor to propose.'
`Then why not at once accept of it? Let me have the matter well at
rest.'
`I would beg the privilege, first, of an interview with the princess, if it
please your majesty,' said the young nobleman, who hoped, by boldly
pressing his love, so long and secretly cherished, he might win the throne of
her heart, and so receive from her hand the sceptre which the emperor would
force upon him.
`You are not to obey the princess, my lord, but the emperor,' said the
monarch, in a stern and commanding tone.
The young nobleman was perplexed. He felt he could not resign the
princess, although she had, in as many words, plainly told him she could not
love him. But what will not love hope for? He fondly trusted that by
confessing his deep passion for her, he might at least awaken her pity, which
he knew enough of woman's heart to believe could soon be deepened into a
warmer sentiment. With these hopes he resolved to confess truly to the
emperor the pledge he had given to the princess, conjointly with his cousin,
and which led him to withhold his consent, and desire him to give him
opportunity
to win her heart. He, therefore, without reserve, laid the whole
matter, including his long cherished love for the princess, before the
surprised
monarch. When he had ended, he waited with trembling hopes for
his decision.
The emperor was silent for some time; and at length a smile gradually
lighted up his features, for he had been amused, notwithstanding his
displeasure
,
with the art of the Princess Eylla in getting rid of her two suitors.
`My lord,' he said, `I acquit you of any intention to slight my proposition to
you. I will permit you to woo the perverse maiden until the sixth day hence.
But this permission is conditional; and I shall expect you, if unsuccessful in
winning her affections in this time, to obey my commands, and win them, if
you care for them then, after marriage.'
Lord Cuiri was silent for a moment; but, inspired by hopes of ultimate
victory over the obdurate princess, he accepted the terms.
`I shall soon visit her chamber. I should have again seen her last night,
after I left Lord Esquitl there, but was detained by some pressing matters.
At twelve o'clock, my lord, I shall ascend the throne of justice. Have these
rebel leaders then brought before me. I would question them of this
conspiracy
,
and its object, ere I condemn them to the block.'
Lord Cuiri then took his leave of the emperor, who was also in the act of
quitting the cabinet for the apartment of the princess, when the door opened,
as his hand was upon it, and the executioner entered.
`Ha! well!' exclaimed the monarch, quickly.
`He is dead.'
The emperor placed his hand for an instant to his forehead, as if painfully
affected by the intelligence so abruptly communicated, although prepared to
receive it.
`How died he?' he asked, recovering his composure.
`At first he lamented his fate; but after nature had shaken him, his spirit
overcame the bodily weakness, and he died better than most men would
have done, your majesty.'
`Did he die instantly?'
`His heart became still ere he had dropped the drained goblet.'
`You speak of this too coolly, sirrah!' cried the emperor, with disgust;
`but 't is your profession. Away!'
The headsman left the apartment by a secret passage, which
communicated
with his own quarter of the palace.
`Alas, alas, my poor, misguided nephew! Thou art no more, and I
forgive
thee  for the gods now have thee in judgment. Mortal men have
naught more to do with thee, in love or hatred.'
`Good morning, cousin emperor,' said the jester, who at that instant
entered, and pulled him by the mantle.
`Ha, fool! carry thy mummery to the courtiers; I am ill at ease.'
`Therefore shouldst thou ha' my society, cousin. I have a secret for thee!'
he added, with a look of profound importance.
`Nay  go to!' said the emperor, hastily.
`Where dost
thou
go to?'
`To the princess' chamber.'
`That 's my secret,' said the fool, placing his finger on his lip, and looking
serious.
`What dost thou mean, sirrah?'
`Thou art in bad humor this morning, cousin! If I tell thee, I shall
get my pate broken. Yet there hangs an odor o' treason about the matter.'
`Out with it, then, if thou hast aught to tell me, or thou wilt get a broken
pate for keeping silence,' said the emperor, irritated; for the looks of the
jester led him to believe he had possession of some intelligence of
importance
.
`Is it true, gossip, thou hast killed the poor prince?'
`Is this thy secret! Thou wilt behold him laid in state to-morrow; for
the empire to gaze upon, that they may see the emperor can be just,
even with his own blood,' answered the monarch, rather addressing himself
than the fool. `Leave the cabinet! or, if thou wilt, remain here; do thou
follow not me!'
`Go not in there, cousin; thou wilt frighten a pair o' doves an' thou dost,'
he said, mischievously, and with a deeper meaning in his twinkling eyes
than his words conveyed.
`Rogue,' said the emperor, angrily, turning back from the princess' door,
and seizing him by the arm, `there is something at thy heart which thou
wouldst fain trust to thy tongue.'
`Mercy, sweet gossip! said I not you were in the gross humors?' he
cried, terrified.
`What hast thou to say? What mean thy hints?'
`Nay  you hurt, gossip! Now, I can breathe again. Thou art good at
a pinch, cousin. Well, the secret is, that I have seen what I would not ha'
believed had I not seen it. Thou knowest I every morning, at sunrise,
repair
to the altar in the empress' little oratory, to weep and pray for her! I
got there, gossip, (when the rooms were closed,) by a sliding panel behind
the altar. Many a rare crying time I ha' had o' it there!'
`Well, come to the end,' commanded the impatient emperor.
`This morning, gossip, I went something later, for I was not able to sleep
last night for the motions and notions going forward, turning the palace
upside down, and driving sleep from honest persons' eyes, and so I napped it
after sunrise. Well, I opened the panel to glide in, when what should I see
but the Princess Eylla there.'
`Fool, she hath taken the rooms for the present.'
`But hath a tall, handsome youth, wi' black bright eyes, and a sunny smile,
taken them with her, cousin?'
`What meanest thou?' demanded the emperor, surprised.
`The Princess Eylla was sitting on a divan, and the youth, who looked
and dressed every inch a prince, was seated on the ground at her feet,
looking
dove-eyes up at her, and she was looking dove-eyes down at him. It
were a proper sight for a modest youth like me, gossip, and so I crept off to
bring thee to view it. It passed my comprehension, and spoilt my prayers.'
`Didst thou see this, Sulukis?' demanded the emperor, his plainest
suspicions
roused.
`Do I see thee, gossip! I ha' not shed a tear or said a prayer this
morning
for the circumstance.'
`Didst thou know him? Is he one of the courtiers?'
`He hath never been seen i' the palace in my day,' answered the jester,
decidedly.
The emperor reflected a moment, and then said, sternly, `Remain thou
here, nor speak of what thou hast seen, on pain of my displeasure.' Thus
speaking, he instantly left the cabinet, and entered the suite of rooms
terminating
in the chamber then occupied by the princess. Before he reached
her door, he turned back, and despatched the jester for Lord Esquitl. That
nobleman instantly made his appearance.
`My lord, follow me to the rooms occupied by the Princess Eylla, with a
file of men-at-arms!'
The nobleman, amazed, silently disappeared, and the emperor proceeded
towards her apartment, his face and manner divested of all excitement or
traces of suspicion.
CHAPTER XII.
THE LOVERS.
Casipeti,
after having unlocked the door, and released Montezuma from
the cell, left him to the guidance of Tzitzis, anxious himself to quit the
palace, where constant danger awaited him, and return to his house in the
city. He succeeded, soon afterwards, under cover of his slave's costume, in
evading the guards, who regarded less who went out than those who entered.
As he was passing the post, he saw, with pleasure, the mascal, whom some
one had identified, liberated from his confinement, and sent lamenting to his
chambers. It is needless to say that Montezuma obeyed with alacrity the
command of the princess, and followed Tzitzis, without delay, to the
presence
of the mistress of his heart.
Hours passed away, and the princess and Montezuma were seated by the
casement, discoursing on those tender themes that are so dear to lovers,
which in themselves are light as air and nothing, but which to them are
every thing! As violets that grow in couples are sweetest scented, so
sweeter and deeper grew their love for this intermingling of their young
hearts. In a politic female, it would have been policy to have cherished the
love of a handsome and bold young man, whose word could arm fifty
thousand
men within the capital's walls; and, in the prospect of her coming to
the throne, the most refined diplomacy to have secured the stability of her
empire, by inviting so dangerous a person, as he might have proved, to share
it with her. But Princess Eylla was no politician, and knew little of
diplomacy, save that of the heart.
By her command, Montezuma, on his first entrance from the prison,
exchanged
his slave's costume for a suit which she sent Tzitzis to bring her
from the emperor's wardrobe. It became the majestic height and manly
beauty of his person; and as they sat together, as the morning sun shone
into the casement, he looked every inch a prince. Such he now knew
himself
to be; and although he spoke not of it to the princess, she saw and
rejoiced
in the change the knowledge of his high lineage had produced in his
air, bearing, and general demeanor, attributing it, with something of truth, to
the elevating and magical influence of love.
They were engaged, as the fool had discovered them  Montezuma
reclining
at her feet, listening to a tale of Peruvian chivalry from the lips of
the princess. Secure in the secrecy of the apartment which she had made
his `prison,' as she playfully termed it, until she could safely open to the
emperor the resolution of her heart, she gave herself up to the happiness of
the present moment.
The emperor tapped gently on the door of the outer apartment. The
watchful Tzitzis sprung to it and opened it, and the next instant was about
to fly to the oratory to give the alarm, when the monarch, perceiving her
intention, seized her by the arm, forcibly placed her in the outer room, and
turned the bolt upon her. The next instant Lord Esquitl appeared in the
main entrance to the apartment, leading from the court of the fountain.
Close behind him were the men-at-arms. The emperor made him a sign to
remain there, and then, with a quick, light step, crossed over to the door of
the oratory. It was ajar, for thus it became the princess, and she depended
on the faithful slave to notify her of the emperor's approach. He discovered
the lovers as the jester had truly related  Montezuma seated at the feet of
his lovely mistress, attentively listening to her, with upward gaze, while she
was relating some interesting legend of the Mountain of the Burning Stone,
her snowy fingers the whilst half hidden amid his raven locks! He gazed
an instant, without being able to identify the youth, upon the incredible scene,
and then waving his hand to the guards, flung wide the door and entered.
`Seize the traitor!' he shouted, in a voice of thunder.
Montezuma sprung to his feet, and the princess shrieked, at the sound of
the terrible voice, which gave the first intimation of his presence, and the
next instant, true to her love and her womanhood, threw herself between the
advancing soldiers and her lover. `Back  touch him not!'
`Seize him!' repeated the monarch, with vehemence.
`No, no! Hold, I command!' she cried, grasping with both hands the
points of the lances, and turning them aside.
`Spear the hound!' thundered the emperor.
`Through my heart, then, seek his!' she cried, clasping his form in her
arms.
The guards hesitated. She caught this moment of indecision to turn and
address the enraged monarch.
`Father, listen! Bid the guards wait without the door, (he cannot escape
them!) and hear me one word.'
He gazed on her face penetratingly a moment, and then motioned the
wondering and amazed Lord Esquitl to withdraw the soldiers from the room.
`So this is the pretty princess' offset of Cuiri and myself,' he said, gravely
shaking his head, yet smiling at the singular discovery; `this is the secret
of this Montezuma's possession of the signet  her influence over him in
this revolt! The key I gave her hath let him out of prison. How artful
love makes a woman! The emperor hath not yet recognised him. By mine
honor, if he escape for seven days, and manage to keep his head on his
shoulders on the eighth, she 'll put a crown on it, or may I never hope to
see Lord Cuiri when he heareth this! Well, I will stand by the princess,
and if she honor this Montezuma, what care I, so he rival me not.
Doubtless
he will make a far better emperor than the prince.'
Thus philosophically mused the light-hearted young nobleman, at
this extraordinary event; but he awaited the issue with the deepest curiosity
and interest. He closed the door, and the three were left together; the
monarch, restless as a caged tiger, pacing near the door; Eylla looking
imploringly
towards him; the young man standing silent, proud, and calm. At
length the emperor stopped full before her.
`Now, traitress?'
`Nay, I am wanting nothing in my love or loyalty to my emperor and
father,' she said, approaching near, and kneeling before him; `hear me, my
father! You have once loved your Eylla! Have you forgotten how
in childhood I sat upon your knee  and how, as I grew older, each morning
I left upon your pillow the sweetest flowers, nor left your couch until you
had kissed me? And when I got to be a maiden grown, and thou wert sick
nigh unto death, how I watched thy couch and cooled thy brow; and did you
not say I was a blessing to you, and that you owed your life to my tender
nursing?'
`Eylla!'
`Thou art moved. I see returning love for thine only daughter in the
gentle beaming of thy eye upon me, as I seek its light! Father, I know
you love your own Eylla!'
As she ceased, she softly rose from his feet, and, like a child climbing a
its parent's knee, slid upward into his arms, and laid her head confidingly
upon his breast.
`What, Eylla? what would my child?' he said, in an affectionate tone.
He looked tenderly down upon her as he spoke, and for the moment forgot
the presence of the object of his displeasure.
`
His
life, father, and thy forgiveness!'
Her answer recalled him to himself. He flung her from him, yet still she
clung to him, and strode sternly towards the young man.
`Ha! methinks I have seen that face!'
`Thou hast, emperor,' he answered with firmness.
`Who art thou?'
`Montezuma, the net-maker's son.'
`Princess, is it so? This slave  this serf thy paramour!'
`My betrothed husband.'
`Princess Eylla, thou liest with thy false tongue!'
`I have spoken the truth, father,' she answered, calmly but firmly.
`Then both your fates are sealed,' he said, with deliberate determination.
The deepest dungeon of the prison shall be your abode till you get the better
of this madness. But by the sacred eagle of the sun! if I had a doubt (yet I
see why I should not have!) of thy honor, I would slay thee with my own
hand, ere thy bosom heaved twice more.'
`Father, for my life I care not  the threat of the dungeon does not
terrify
me. It is thy displeasure that I feel. I am innocent.'
`I believe thee for mine own honor's sake,' he said bitterly; `for after
this, thy word hath little weight with me. Yet thou shalt not go unpunished!
Ho, without there!' he cried, sternly. `Take this woman prisoner!'
`Your majesty!' cried Lord Esquitl, as the emperor stood pointing with
his finger towards his daughter.
`Dost thou obey me or not, lord?'
`I surrender myself prisoner to your lordship,' said the princess, coming
forward.
`Never, by my knightly honor!' said Lord Esquitl, with indignant
feeling.
`Suffer it, my lord,' said the princess, with an imploring look; and she
placed herself between two of the men-at-arms.
`Entreat her gently, mind you,' said the emperor to them. `Conduct her
to the palace keep, and bid the jailor on his life see that she suffer no
rudeness
;
for if she be a prisoner, she is no less an emperor's daughter. For
you, sir,' he said, as she departed with lord Esquitl and the guard, `for whose
crime I cannot find a name, I will invent for thee a death that shall in some
shape measure it. Bear him off to the farthermost dungeon beneath the
water! If he escape, the life of every soldier of the palace guard shall pay
for his. Lo, see to it!'
`Without a word, calm and dignified, with only sorrow for the princess'
fate shading his countenance with grief, Montezuma was led forth from the
oratory, a second time to become the occupant of a dungeon.
The imprisonment of the princess was brief. The emperor, after the first
excitement was past, felt all the father return to his bosom, and ere she had
been in prison an hour, sent for her to his presence. Lord Esquitl left them
alone together in the cabinet. After the lapse of half an hour, the princess
returned to her apartment, where sat Tzitzis, trembling, weeping, and terrified.
The result of the interview with her father, to judge from the happy yet sad
expression of countenance with which she met the tearful, inquiring look of
the Peruvian, had not left her quite destitute of hope.
`You are pardoned!' exclaimed the joyful maiden, flying and throwing
herself at her feet.
`He has forgiven me, Tzitzis. I have confessed all to him, from the
moment
I first beheld Montezuma, until now.'
`And what said he?'
`It made him more thoughtful than angry, and he put to me many
questions
about him,  then shook his head, walked the room, and muttered to
himself. I could only hear by piece-meal of
policy  no male heir
myself
security of the empire  noble in person  better for my successor
than a noble  Cuiri nor Esquitl merit it  she loves him too  his
influence
with the body of the people  consolidate the empire!
I could
hear nothing consecutively. I stood silent by. He seemed to have
forgotten
my presence.'
`Mark me, my princess, you will yet be happy.'
`I cannot tell, Tzitzis! He kissed me '
`Who?'
`My father, minion, when I left him  but I trembled when I ventured
once to look up into his face, and saw how dark and stern his brow was,
notwithstanding
this token of love. He was thinking of Montezuma, and of
punishment for him. He dare not slay him, for he knows he will slay his
child with the same blow!'
`What do you think will be done with him  that is, provided,' she added
archly, `the emperor does not give him to you for a husband?'
`Silence, Tzitzis!
He shall not die!
'
`And if they intend to keep him in prison, woman's wits can get him out,'
said the slave resolutely.
`Ere I quitted the cabinet, my father commanded me to meet him in the
judgment hall at noon.'
`I augur something from this, your highness!'
`May it be of good,' was the foreboding reply.
CHAPTER XIII.
THE JUDGMENT AND EXECUTION.
At
the hour appointed by the emperor to judge the insurgents, the
imperial
hall of justice was thrown open. On a throne of black marble, with the
silver Aztec eagle spreading his wings like a canopy above it, sat the
emperor
,
the sole arbiter and judge of every cause brought before this fearful
tribunal
,
his word alone the law! with him resting the power of life and
death! He was enthroned in grandeur commensurate with his imperial
dignity, surrounded by his stately court of gorgeously attired nobles. In his
crown blazed a jewel of extraordinary size and wonderful brilliancy, its light
being of mingled hues, and its radiance dazzling as the sun. On his left
hand, near the throne, a marble slab was elevated above the floor, beside
which stood his executioner, resting upon a gigantic sword, bright and
gleaming
in the sun-beams. Opposite to him stood a man holding a large mantle
of crimson cloth. On the right of the throne, a step below the seat of the
emperor, on a sort of lesser throne of gold inlaid with pearl, sat the princess
Eylla, pale and drooping, yet observant of all that passed. She was
attended
by a brilliant galaxy of the ladies of her court. The emperor was-stern
and silent! and although from time to time she furtively glanced upwards to
read his face, its expression foiled her skill to interpret it. It afforded
neither
hope nor despair.
The monarch now waved his hand, the trumpet sounded, and, loaded with
chains, Sismarqui, pale, and with a resigned melancholy air, and Hucha, not
less pale, but with an eye flashing haughty defiance around, were led into
the judgment hall. The princess looked beyond these to the outer portal,
long and eagerly, expecting, she knew not why, that Montezuma would also
be brought in to receive his sentence; and if it were to be death, she had
prepared herself to die with him there! Ah! for woman's love!
The emperor fixed his eyes sternly upon the two insurgent leaders, as
they were guarded to the foot of the throne. Hucha met and returned his
gaze so steadily, that his own involuntarily lowered before it. The
hunchback's
disdainful defiance irrevocably from that moment sealed his own doom.
The emperor turned to Sismarqui, who stood before him, bareheaded, and
deprived his armor, and with a sad, downcast look; for his untoward fate in
losing Fatziza  of himself he thought not  had made him weary of life,
and his only hope was that he might die ere he lived to know that she
suffered
.
`Thy name is Sismarqui,' affirmed, rather than inquired the emperor.
`It is, your majesty.'
`Thou wert a mover and instigator in this revolt of the last night?'
`I was, your majesty,' he answered, firmly.
`For this, thou deservest death. But in consideration of what thou hast
suffered through the late prince, and also of the happy end of this revolt, I
am willing to display to the people my clemency in pardoning thee,
inasmuch
,
moreover, as the Lord Esquitl hath shown me you took no active part
in the rebellion. Thou art pardoned. Go, and by thy future example,
lead thy erring fellow-citizens back to their loyalty. Take off his chains.'
Sismarqui looked up surprised. His face, at first, lighted with joy, but
was instantly saddened by the recollection, that all he desired in life was
lost to him forever. After his chains were removed, he stood, as before,
silent and sorrowful.
`Methinks thou shouldst have the grace, slave, to bend the knee, in
gratitude
for thy life,' said his majesty, displeased.
`Life, your majesty, hath little to lead me to desire it,' answered he,
respectfully
.
`I need not thy blood. Justice will have a sufficient victim,' he said,
looking upon the Hunchback. `Life hath a thousand springs of enjoyment.
Think it not worthless, because one is dried up. Go, and sacrifice to the
gods for thine.'
Sismarqui turned slowly away, as if burdened with the life he had hoped
to lay down at the foot of the throne; and, leaving the palace, insensibly
bent his steps towards the temple that contained the object of his hopeless
love.
`My Lord Esquitl,' said the emperor to that young nobleman, who stood
not far from the princess, to whose presence sympathy and pity had of late
closely attached him.
`Your majesty.'
`This is he of whom you spoke?' and his glance rested on Hucha.
VOL. II. 14
`The same, your majesty.
`He carrieth it in his eye.'
Then, fixing his gaze upon the Hunchback, he said, in a tone of irony,
`So, thy name is Hucha?'
`Your majesty hath been rightly informed,' was the answer.
`Art thou impudent! What set thee upon this revolt, of which thou art
a head?'
`Tyranny and oppression!'
`This rings!'
`I am glad I have struck a chime that suits your majesty's ears. How
liked your majesty the ringing from the Temple of War the last night?'
`Sir Hunchback,' said the emperor, with surprise, but suppressing his
resentment
,
feeling, as he cast his eye towards the block, he had full
retribution
in reserve,  `I would know of thee, thou art so free a speaker,
what-hopes
tempted thee to this revolt?'
`Of placing thy head where thou wilt soon place mine,' he answered, with
a boldness that filled every one with astonishment. It was not the audacity
of rash temerity that marked his manner, but of lofty and almost sublime
enthusiasm
.
`This is plain spoken enow. What complaint have my people to make
against the throne? I would heal these wounds before my daughter takes
the sceptre, and to do so I must first know the evil.'
`I have told your majesty  tyranny. We are a nation of slaves, trodden
upon by a licentious court of tyrannical nobles, who take the pattern for
their insolence and oppression from the tyrant himself. We would have
made ourselves free, and left open every avenue of distinction and honor to
every man, whom the gods give ambition to aspire. We are a nation of
slaves  of whom,' he cried, lifting his manacled arms, and clanking his
chains loudly, `with these emblems of bondage upon me, I stand here the fit
representative.'
`Enough. This is doctrine I would not hear too freely spoken, unless
I loved anarchy. If thou hast sowed such seed among my subjects, thou
hast well earned death.'
`Ignorance, your majesty, is the very pedestal of the throne on which you
sit,' he replied, stretching forth his hand towards it.
`I have heard enough. Lead him to the block,' sternly commanded the
monarch.
He betrayed no emotion at this sentence; but proudly folding his arms
across his breast, walked towards it ere the guard could advance to obey the
command of the emperor.
`Nay  Eylla, thou shalt remain,' he said, seeing her rise precipitately.
`If thou canst not witness a traitor's death, thou art not fit to rule an empire
that seems rife with them.' She hid her face in her mantle, and silently
obeyed.
The Hunchback, on coming to the block, turned to the throne, and said,
in a firm voice,
`Has not your majesty seen a seed, which, put in the ground and dying,
gives life to a vigorous tree, which bears a myriad like itself? So will my
blood spring from the ground.
`Why do ye delay? Hasten his death. Our very throne shakes with his
daring words!'
`Would to the gods my single voice could make it so tremble, as to be
felt at the very heart of the empire. Well, headsman, I am ready. Thy
sword is bright. Hath it a keen edge? Let me feel it. 'T will do!' he
added, after passing his finger over the edge. `It should be sharp, and thou
must strike well, for remember thou art not with thy blow striking off a man's
head, but an emperor's crown.'
Thus speaking, he knelt upon the slab of marble beside the block, and,
lifting his hands, from which the chains were removed, towards the skies, he
cried aloud,
`Oh, thou glorious Deity, who hast created all men equal, take not my
spirit from the earth, when it shall leave the body, but diffuse it through the
souls of my poor, degraded countrymen, till, inspired with one spirit, they may
arise as one man, and wrest from the usurpers of human rights the liberty
that is their glorious birthright!'
He cast a calm glance around the hall of judgment, and then resting it for
an instant, with proud defiance, upon the emperor, he bared his neck, and
calmly laid his head upon the fatal block.
`Strike, executioner!' cried the emperor.
The shining sword glanced in the air, and descended with a dull sound
upon the block. The head of the Hunchback rolled to the feet of the
executioner
,
who, holding it up, cried, in a loud voice,
`Thus perish, at the foot of the throne, all who seek to overturn it!' He
then placed the head upon the block, and immediately his assistant cast over
it and the body the crimson cloth, veiling the scene from every eye. The
same instant, the scaffold, with its gory burden, was rolled away from the
presence.
`So perish every traitor!' said his majesty, in a firm tone. `My Lord
Esquitl, there is one other prisoner.'
`He is now being conducted into the judgment hall, your majesty.'
The princess started and raised her head, at these words, and fixed her
eyes upon the entrance. There was a slight movement among those about
it, and a moment afterwards she beheld Montezuma walking, closely
guarded
,
but not in chains, up the hall. Her heart ceased its beating. She held
her breath, with the agony of expectation. She sat, like a statue of marble,
with her gaze riveted on him. He advanced with a firm step, and a calm
and dignified bearing. The emperor, as well as all present, were struck
with his noble air and lofty carriage. He looked rather like one who
commanded
,
than one who was a prisoner. He came forward and stood before
the throne, his guard standing a step behind him. His glance fell on the
princess, and he smiled with such confidence and hope, that her heart felt as
if a beam of sun-light had fallen upon it.
The emperor gazed on him a moment, with a look, in which admiration
plainly was mingled with deep resentment. At length, without trial,
without even naming his offence,  he gave a parchment to Lord Esquitl,
and bade him read it aloud. The Princess Eylla clasped her hands
together
,
and half rose from her seat, in her painful eagerness to hear some
fearful doom, till now kept secret from her. Her gaze was riveted on
Montezuma
,
and it seemed as if a word would cause her to spring forward, and
throw herself into his arms.
`It is known to all the world,' read the noble, in a voice painfully affected
by the distress of the princess, which he observed, and keenly sympathized
with, `that the dazzling diamond that now adorns the imperial diadem was
found, seven centuries since, in the throat of a condor, which fell dead in the
court of the palace. From the variety of its hues, and its sun-like splendor,
it is supposed to have been brought from the glittering peak of Ix, the Star
of the Burning Stone. As diamonds of this class are ever formed in pairs,
it has been, it is well known, the ambition of numerous preceding emperors
to obtain the mate to this; and it is estimated that more than a million of
state's prisoners have perished in the course of ages, in endeavoring to
purchase
their forfeited lives by reaching the summit. Hitherto, no human foot
has trodden it, and the diamond is yet unobtained. Now, inasmuch as
Montezuma
,
son of Mahco, the net-maker, has been adjudged a traitor, he is
hereby condemned to be conveyed from hence, closely guarded and in chains,
to the foot of the mountain of Ix, and there released. If he do ascend the
peak, and return again bringing the mate to this, or a diamond of equal size
and beauty, he shall not only be pardoned for his treason and rebellion, but
shall receive in marriage the Princess Eylla, and succeed the emperor on
the throne. If he shall refuse to purchase life on these terms, he shall die
the death by the axe of the executioner.'
`Long live the Emperor Ulyd, just and wise!'
Thrice the trumpets sounded when he had finished reading this
proclamation
:
and amid the acclamations, murmurs of surprise, and adulating
shouts of the audience of people, high above which rose the wild shriek
of the princess, the emperor dissolved the assembled court, and retired with
slow and stately dignity to his cabinet.
CHAPTER XIV.
THE ASCENT OF IX.
Night
had scarcely began to veil the streets of the capital in gloom, when
a private postern that gave access to the wing of the palace occupied by the
princess, was cautiously opened, and a female figure came forth, with her
mantilla, or
huepilli,
drawn closely about her form, and covering all her
face, save one lively eye. But, with all her care, each passer-by knew her
to be Tzitzis, the favorite slave of the Princess Eylla.
After surveying the ground about her, to see that she was not observed,
she hastily darted across the street into the shadow of the temple, and
crossing
the bridge swiftly, pursued her way through many windings and across
many squares, until she came to the ruins of the Axuzco palace. The moon
was just rising as she reached it. With a hesitating, yet resolutely onward
pace, she ascended the steps and entered the portal, and swiftly crossed the
deserted hall. At its extremity she came to a low door, at which, after
hesitating an instant, she knocked. A clear voice, of inexpressible
sweetness
,
bade her enter. She started back with surprise. This portion of the
ruins had been for a long time the abode of a fearful woman, who, to many
other marvellous sciences, added the knowledge of the secret virtues of all
herbs; also, by her art and skill, she could, it was believed, convey death
through the eye, and restore life by a breath. She was never visible by day,
nor while the moon was above the horizon! Instead, therefore, of hearing
the stern voice she expected, she was greatly surprised to hear sounds so
sweet inviting her to come in. She opened and entered. Before her,
instead
of the sorceress, she beheld a bright and beautiful being standing in
the light of the rising moon, the level rays of which made their way through
a broken casement into the chamber. She would have sunk to the ground
for fear. But her smile and pleasant voice, as she said, `Why do you come
hither, pretty maiden?' gave her encouragement.
In a few words, Tzitzis told the tale of the loves of Montezuma and the
princess, and the sentence of the emperor. `Can you show me the weird
mother?' she asked, as she ended.
`I am the weird mother, maiden.'
`Nay, sweet lady, trifle not with me! I would see her, if possibly she
may not do something for my mistress' love.'
`I tell thee I am the weird mother,' said the spirit-being, sharply. `When
the moonlight is gone, in which I live, as you mortals do in sunlight, as my
natural element, I become old and shrivelled, and hideous with age and
deformity
.
When the new moon appears, I sit in its beam, and grow younger
and fairer till it is full, when I become youthful and beautiful again, as you
see me. The moon wanes from last night, and each day thou wilt find me
grow older and older. Alas, mortal maiden! I would I could live for years
in youth, like thee, and not thus become old each month.'
`It were better thus to renew youth, even for a day, than, when age has
once come upon us, to be unable to cast it off, save in the grave,' answered
Tzitzis, between alarm and pity and wonder at what she heard and saw.
`Death, methinks, were a sweet sleep. I can never die!' she said, with
a touching melancholy in the tones of her voice that brought tears into the
maiden's eyes. `How I do weep as the moon wanes!'
`Why, when the moon waneth, sweet lady, not seek for life in the
sun-light
?'
`The beam of the sunlight to me, maiden, would be like a sea of fire to
thee! It would consume, but never destroy me.'
`Wilt thou live so forever?'
`No. The day is at hand when my task on earth will be ended. I shall
then be dissolved in the element of fire, and, purified, return to the skies. On
that day I shall stand in the sun, and, for an instant, be bright as his own
glory.' This was said with impressive solemnity. `But what can I do for
thee, pretty one?' she asked, with a smiling countenance. `Why hast thou
sought me?'
`For the aid of your art and wonderful knowledge,' answered Tzitzis,
without fear. `The Princess Eylla, who has sent me hither, hath heard
thou wert skilled in all the mysteries of creation, and that to thee are
unfolded the hidden springs of life. She now implores you to exert this
power in her favor, and that of the noble youth, who will assuredly perish
else. Canst thou do nothing for him, sweet lady?' she asked, earnestly.
`The Princess Eylla is gentle, fair, and virtuous! She shall be obeyed.'
She instantly disappeared by a door hitherto unseen by Tzitzis, who
remained
with her heart throbbing between hope and fear. In a few minutes
she returned, and put in her hands a small sealed package, saying
`Place this in his hands, and leave the rest for manhood and lofty love to
accomplish. I foretold him of this trial. He must first win the throne, and
after prove his right to have inherited it. Depart speedily, as thou camest.'
Ere the Peruvian maiden could express her gratitude, or question as to
the nature of the contents of the package, she had disappeared.
The succeding morning, a band of a thousand soldiers marched out of the
northern gate of the city; their numbers serving rather to add dignity to
their mission, than as necessary to guard the chained prisoner, who moved
with a proud step and unbroken bearing in their centre. The first night
they encamped within a league of the mountain. The youth slept in his
guarded tent, and his dreams were of love and ambition; for a stout heart
like his, that loved so truly, did not despair of success, even where his path
was over the footsteps of a million who had gone before him, and left their
bones bleaching on the mountain side. At midnight, his dreams of Eylla
were disturbed by a slight touch on the shoulder. He started, opened his
eyes, and beheld an indistinct figure gliding from the tent, without waking
the tired and sleeping guards, who doubtless thought their prisoner's safety
sufficiently secured by his heavy chains  and he, at the same moment,
discovered
that something had been left in his hand. Instinctively, he hastily
concealed it in his bosom, and turning over with clanking chains, which
roused his guardians, once more sank to slumber.
With the rising sun the camp was in motion, and, under a select guard of
one hundred men, the prisoner was led to the foot of the mountain, and
divested
of his chains. Lord Esquitl then embraced him, for he had
compassion
on his youth and gentleness, and wishing him success, accompanied him
a few paces on his way, and bade him farewell.
For the first two miles the ascent was comparatively easy. But at length
the young man, of whom the soldiers never lost sight, reached the region
of eternal snow, against which his dark form was but just relieved, appearing
like a speck which, save that they had continued to keep it in their eye, could
not have been detected.
When, after great hardship, Montezuma gained the region of eternal
winter, the verge of which, far down the mountain, was artificially whitened
with myriads of bleaching bones of those who had perished before him, but
the sight of which made him no fainter hearted, he paused to survey the icy
pyramid that pierced nearly a league higher into the skies, presenting to the
eyes of those below one polished cone of glittering snow, crowned by the
starry gem that had burned on its crest from the first day of creation.
Notwithstanding
the probable fatal end of the attempt, Montezuma, after gazing
upward a while, and seeing many fissures in the sides of the glacier invisible
to those below, resolved to make it. Lying down on the last spot of verdure
to rest his weary limbs, he reposed for an hour, and then, with a bold spirit,
and inspiring himself with the thought of the Princess Eylla, he began to
scale the icy steep.
He had toiled two hours, and won but a twentieth part of his way, when,
as overcome by the cold and exertion, he was about to admit into his mind
despairing doubts of success, a small package fell from his bosom, and after
sliding down a hundred feet, lodged in a deep cleft of the glacier. It recalled
to his recollection the mysterious visit of the preceding night, which, until
now, had not entered his mind; and he rapidly descended to recover it. On
opening it, he found a transparent substance, like gum, of a delightful
fragrance
,
enclosed in parchment, on which was written these words
`
The gum of the herb that containeth the mysterious principle of life! Eat
sparingly at morning, noon, and eve, and thy strength shall be as the sun,
and neither the four elements, nor the two great principles of heat and cold,
shall have power over thee. Child of the Sun, run thy race, and rejoice in thy
strength!
'
Ready to sink under fatigue and cold, and hitherto just about to give up
the further ascent in despair, he placed a small particle of the gum between
his lips. It instantly dissolved, and suddenly he felt a new principle of life.
The stagnant blood warmed and glowed in his stiffening veins; his heart
leaped; his sinews became strong; his spirits cheerful and full of elasticity;
and hope and anticipated victory once more filled his soul. He was a new
being. He felt the strength of an immortal, and the enduring power of the
tireless sun. His first impulse was to spread his hands in gratitude to this
visible dispenser of life and heat, who was at that moment descending the
western horizon, to light unknown realms beyond its verge. Then carefully
replacing the remainder of the gum in his vesture, he sprang up the icy cone
with the strength and fleetness of the chamois. Upward, and onward, and
still upward, unwearied he kept his skyward way, till the astonished troops
below, who had followed him until he appeard like a minute speck on a
snow-white
spire, could scarcely see him, and soon the distance and twilight veiled
him from their view.
Three days and nights they remained encamped at the foot of the
mountain
,
and he did not reappear. His death was then considered certain. The
camp was ordered by the nobleman to be struck, and he returned with the
soldiers to the capital, to bear the sad intelligence to the princess. The
emperor
received the news of the failure and death of the bold aspirant for his
crown, without surprise; yet there had been a secret hope harbored in his
breast that he would succeed. In sending him thither, he had, however,
condemned
him to a more lingering species of death than he could have
received
at the axe of the headsman. The princess, though struck with the
deepest grief, gave not away to despair, for there was an anchor of hope in
her soul, to which she secretly clung.
CHAPTER XV.
THE SACRIFICE.
The
day following the return of the troops that had conducted Montezuma
to the Peak of Ix, a third embassy, from the Inca of Peru, who knew of the
approaching accession of the princess, chanced to arrive at the court of the
emperor, again to propose a union between her and the heir apparent to his
throne. Under the existing circumstances, and in the mood in which the
monarch was found by the embassy, the proposition, twice before declined,
at once met with his approbation. The same objections he had formerly
urged, ere he had decided on uniting her to her cousin, still remained, and
occurred to his mind; but desirous of securing the princess from farther
attachments of a like nature with that from which he believed he had
rescued
her, and anxious to have this question of succession settled, he did not
hesitate to call the embassadors into his presence, and openly signified his
consent to the proposed union. Having thus expressed his approbation, he
sent for the princess to appear, and informing her of the proposal of the
Inca, commanded her to prepare for the nuptials, to take place by proxy, on
the day of her coronation, and also of the annual sacrifice to the Sun. The
princess, to his surprise and pleasure, signified her consent and intention to
obey her father! Faith was strong in her heart that Montezuma was safe,
and she felt that there would be a diversion in her favor ere the fatal hour
arrived. If not, she knew that she could die when all hope had expired!
She quietly consented, received passively her father's embrace, and left the
cabinet.
`Tzitzis,' she said, as she returned to her own apartment; `I shall in four
days either be the bride of Montezuma on earth, or the companion of his
bright spirit in the skies.'
`I do feel assured, my princess, that he is safe, and also victorious. I
have not forgotten the words of that beautiful lady of moonlight. Believe
me, he will soon return triumphant.'
`The gods grant it! but hope, maiden, hath nearly died,' she said, sadly.
`I will prepare for this bridal, for if there be a bridal, and I the bride, the
sovereign of my heart shall be the groom! I will be arrayed in my richest
robes, and his hovering form shall receive to its arms a spirit-bride!'
`Oh, my sweet princess!' cried Tzitzis with fear, `thou wilt not take thy
life, should he not appear to save you?'
`I said not what I would do, save that I would never become this Inca's
bride,' she answered quickly and resolutely. Talk to me no more. I do
feel sick at heart.'
The bridal day at length arrived. The throne-room, the proudest hall of
the imperial palace, was gorgeously decked with banners and hangings of
gold and crimson; innumerable stars composed of gems, blazed in the azure
dome, in the midst of which was a sun of dazzling gold, the centre of a
zodiac
of the most brilliant mosaic of precious stones. The columns of the
hall that supported the vaulted roof, were of single shafts of porphyry,
resting
on vast square pedestals of black marble. The pavement was inlaid
with costly marbles of various hues, in the most beautiful manner. The
throne itself stood opposite to the main entrance  a creation of gold, silver,
and marble! Tall windows of golden colored
itzli
let in the sunlight, which,
enriched by the medium through which it was transfused, shed a soft, rich
twilight throughout the place.
The pride, pomp, and magnificence of the nobles assembled there, were
displayed on this occasion in a degree hitherto unapproached. The emperor
stood near his throne, arrayed in imperial purple, and surrounded by his
court. On his right was the princess Eylla, in robes of silver silk,
her bosom shining with the soft light of priceless pearls, and her bright hair
glittering with jewels. Her face was pale, but calm, and in her eye was an
expression singular and startling! it was despair united with resolution.
Opposite to her stood the Peruvian ambassador, who was to receive the hand
of the princess for his prince.
The ceremony was to take place at high noon, in the Temple of the Sun,
and the emperor, heading the procession of knights and ladies, nobles and
priests, leading the princess by the hand, amid the thunder of martial music,
and the acclamations of tens of thousands that lined the arched way, walked
to the temple. The vast square before it was living with the multitude,
while myriads of gay and gilded barges on the water were filled with
spectators
of the imposing scene. For this important day witnessed not only the
resignation of the sceptre by the emperor, and the coronation of the princess,
but also the great annual sacrifice of a virgin to the sun!
The high priest of the sun received the emperor standing in the portal of
the temple, surrounded by a train of priests in crimson robes with fringes of
gold, and mitres like suns upon their heads. In front of the portal, a few
yards distant towered the tall black altar and majestic image of the deity.
Before it was the lower altar of sacrifice, surrounded by priests. Seven
steps ascended to it on every side. Upon it were laid fascines of bituminous
wood, which too plainly showed the purpose to which it was to be devoted.
The high priest, standing elevated at the door of the lofty portal, above
the multitude, received the princess from the hand of the emperor, and
seated
her upon a silver throne, placed on his right hand, while the emperor
seated himself upon a throne, a step higher, on his left. The high priest
stood beside the princess, and, taking her hand, commanded the Peruvian
ambassador to kneel.
The first words of the ceremony had begun to be spoken by the high
priest, for the impatient emperor brooked no delay, when the princess sprung
to her feet, and drew a dagger from her bosom. It would have been the
next instant buried in her heart, if her eye, watchful to the last, had not at
the same moment caught sight of a distant plume, the wearer of which was
forcing his way wildly through the crowd, which on every side gave way
before him with loud and exulting shouts. The arm that held the dagger
faltered!  color mounts to her cheek!  the weapon is dashed to the
ground, and with a wild shriek of joy she fell senseless into the arms of her
father. At the same instant, a young man, magnificently attired in cloth of
gold, silk, and purple, like a prince, with a dazzling casque upon his head,
on which blazed a wreath of diamonds each of which rivalled in size and
splendor that on the imperial diadem, and which was shaded by a snowy
plume of the white eagle of the house of Alcohuan, bounded into the space
before the two thrones. Close behind him followed a vizored knight, in an
ancient but splendid worn court dress, over a suit of armor.
VOL. IL 15
The throng of courtiers about the emperor gave way involuntarily. The
foremost, on reaching the temple portal, instantly knelt before the monarch,
uncovered his head with one hand, and with the other extended towards him
a single diamond of wonderful size and beauty. Every eye that beheld it
instantly acknowledged it to be the counterpart of that on the imperial
crown.
`Montezuma!' cried a thousand tongues, both of cavalier and bondman.
`I
am
Montezuma,' was the reply of the young man, rising from his
bended
knee, and glancing proudly around.
The shouts restored the princess to consciousness  to joy  to life! She
beheld him living whom she believed dead!. She beheld him victorious
where death had ever before been conqueror! She was too exquisitely
happy to move  to speak. Her heart would have flown to his embrace,
yet her eyes, as his softening glance fell on her for whom he had achieved
so much, were the only messengers and indices of her overflowing joy and
love she could command! The emperor gazed bewildered; he seemed to
doubt the convincing evidence of his senses.
I have returned, your majesty,' he said, turning again towards the throne,
and speaking with respectful modesty, `to claim the reward of my success;'
and here his glance fell on the princess. `Behold the twin diamond to that
in the imperial diadem upon thy brow.'
As he spoke, he elevated it aloft, in juxtaposition with that on the crown,
and held it to every eye in full comparison. A general exclamation from
the assembled courtiers acknowledged the resemblance. Montezuma then
placed it in the hands of the monarch.
Without a word the emperor rose to his feet, and taking the hand of the
trembling and joyful Eylla, he placed it in that of Montezuma. The heart
of every one present, not even excepting the emperor himself, as thus the
princely pair stood together before the throne, confessed that Nature had
formed them for each other, though hitherto Fortune had placed them
widely
apart. The loud acclamations that hailed this act of the monarch ceased
at a wave of his hand. He then thus addressed Montezuma,
`Take her,
Montezuma the First!
The word of an emperor is
pledged
and is redeemed! The deity hath destined thee to become the founder
of a new dynasty of kings. Long may thy race live upon the throne, and
peacefully reign!'
The high priest then advanced, and while they kneeled together before
him, he anointed them with sacred oil, and then joining their hands,
performed
the simple rite that united them forever.
`May the deity bless you, my children,' he said, lifting above their heads
his aged hands. `The spirit of prophecy tells me that a thousand years
will be the end of thy empire! that the last of thy name shall become the
slave to a warrior whose advance shall be with the rising sun, and whose
coming shall be from a world unknown to us.'
The bride and bridegroom then rose to their feet, and faced the assembled
multitude, while the skies shook with the acclamations that hailed their
union.
`Now let the sacrifice be offered, for 't is high noon,' said the emperor.
`I will then resign my crown and sceptre, and give to the service of the gods
the residue of my life.'
The high priest waved a silver wand, and the temple was suddenly filled
with the sweetest music. It increased in loudness and grandeur, and there
were seen, advancing from the interior of the temple, an imposing procession
of priests. As it advanced, it was seen to be composed of the numerous
companies of priests, that served in the temples of the several deities. Each
body, as it came slowly onward, was distinguished by the rich dresses of its
order, and by the statue of their god, borne elevated in its midst. They came
on to the sound of music, wonderful for its depth and religious majesty. At
length was seen a train of virgins in snow-white robes, over which were worn
silver cuirasses, and wearing light and beautiful helms of gold upon their
heads. In their midst, beneath a canopy, walked a virgin, veiled to
the feet.
The procession issued by a side door, wound past the thrones, and
surrounded
the altar of sacrifice. The sacrificial priest then descended from
the altar, and, receiving the victim from the virgins at the foot of the steps,
was about to lead her to the summit, when a youth, haggard, wild, and
wretched, in aspect and appearance, rushed through the line of priests, cast
himself at her feet, and passionately embraced and kissed them. The virgin
shrieked, threw the veil upward from her face, and would have cast herself
into his arms. But he was rudely torn from the altar by those around, and
the sacrificial priest drew her, struggling, to the top of it.
Fatziza had soon learned that she was regarded as a victim for the altar;
but despair and her own misery, with the persuasions of the high priest, who
failed not to impress upon her mind the impossibility as well as impiety of
returning to the world again, at length led her to passive acquiescence. She
went forth, prepared to die. The sight of Sismarqui, with his deep grief
and utter misery, broke at once the charm that had lulled her senses. But
there was no human aid that could now avail her. The heart of the
princess bled for her, and she would have saved her if she could have done
so; but she had no power to withhold that which was devoted to heaven.
Montezuma started at the shriek, for he believed he recognized it. He
nearly fell to the ground when he beheld her face. He had not known
of his sister's abduction by the prince, nor her subsequent misery. A
prisoner
and a victim himself, he had no liberty to aid her, had he known her
fate. Alas, Fatziza! without hope  without help even from the gods who
were sternly demanding the sacrifice,  she was dragged to the summit,
beside
the fatal altar. The sacrificial priest now removed her veil entirely,
and a murmur of surprise ran from lip to lip, at her wondrous loveliness.
He elevated the knife. The next instant, she would have been laid
bleeding
upon the altar, when,  no one knew whence,  a bright, glorious
creature, dazzling as if she had come out of the sun, stood upon the pyre.
The arm of the sacrificer was arrested with astonishment.
`Priest, hold!' she cried, in a clear, sweet tone. `Maiden, thou art free.
The gods have sent me to be a victim in thy stead. Hear, oh priests! and
thou, high priest of the sun! This day does the sacrifice of virgins cease
forever. The gods have accepted my one sacrifice for that of all virgins,
from this time forward. Young man,' she cried to Sismarqui, `lead the
maiden from the altar, and to the priest of the sun. Emperor!' she said,
turning towards the surprised and awed monarch, `thou hast but fulfilled the
decrees of destiny this day. He, to whom thou hast given the hand of the
princess, is as royal as thyself. In him you behold the true heir of the last
Mexitlian king, whom heaven hath kept to this day, for the restoration of the
empire of the Mexitili, which, for the sins of its kings, hath been punished
for seven hundred years. The book of destiny is sealed again for a
thousand
years! Then new gods shall be worshipped on thy altars, and temples
shall be dedicated to a virgin, instead of condemning her, a victim upon its
altars. Priest! behold thy sacrifice. Heaven receive the oblation!'
Instantly the altar-pyre was supernaturally enveloped in lambent flame,
which, after burning a moment, separated from the altar, and ascended with
her, as it were, a chariot with eagles towards the sun, till lost to the eye in
the dazzling glory of its noon-tide blaze.
The emperor then turning to Montezuma, said,
`Noble prince! May Heaven, that hath so many centuries kept your race
in exile and obscurity, preserve you now that they have restored you to the
throne. Thy sister is full fair,' he said, as the reseued virgin threw herself
upon Montezuma's neck. `This Sismarqui should prove at least noble
now.'
`I will make him noble, your majesty,' said Montezuma. `Come hither,
Sismarqui. There is my sister's hand. Kneel both, and let the high priest
perform for thee the kind office he hath done for me.'
One tremulous moment of mingled awe and delight, kneeling together,
hand in hand, beneath the uplifted hands of the priest, repaid both for all
past suffering.
`Now, we will return to the throne-room, where I will resign my crown
and sceptre to my children, and bury the vexing cares of state forever in
oblivion.'
The throne-room again was thronged, presenting, with its assembled
courtiers, a similar appearance to that which it exhibited before the
procession
moved to the temple. But now, the emperor was seated on his throne,
with his sceptre in his right hand, and his crown upon his head.
Montezuma
and the princess were standing before it. Silence reigned over the
multitude. The emperor rose with dignity from the throne, and descended
three steps, and taking the princess by the hand, led her to it. He also
conducted Montezuma, and placed him beside her. Then, kneeling down,
he removed the crown from his head, and placed it, with his sceptre, upon a
cushion before the throne. Elevating the cushion in his hands towards
heaven, he said, solemnly,
`From thee, shade of my imperial sire, I received this diadem and sceptre.
Behold, I have fulfilled my destiny. I now transmit them to the successor
the gods have given me, even as I received them from thee.'
Thus speaking, he rose and put the crown upon the head of Montezuma,
and placed the sceptre in his right hand.
`Receive, Montezuma the First, these symbols of empire. As I leave
them to thee, as I received them from my predecessor, so keep them as a
sacred trust to those who come after thee. May heaven bless thee,
Emperor
Montezuma and Empress Eylla, and make your reign long and
prosperous
.'
`Hail, Montezuma the First!' cried the assembled nobles, and the cry
flew from palace to square, and from square to street, till the vast city rung
with the universal acclamation.'
`Hail, Montezuma the First!' cried the knight, who had appeared before
the temple with him, advancing to the throne. Kneeling down, he raised
his visor, laid his drawn sword at the feet of the young emperor, and added,
in a loud, firm voice,
'I Atelole, Lord Axusco, swear to counsel thee
with wisdom, defend thee with valor, and honor thee with my life and death, if need be, even as my
fathers did for thy fathers. So help me, the sacred gods of Mexitili! Hail!
Emperor and King!'
'Art thou, Lord Axusco, come to life?' cried the emperor, with
amazement
.
'From Peruvian exile, your majesty,' answered the knight, smiling.
The emperor looked at him for 'a moment, shook his head, and turned and
left the throne-room, and shortly afterwards the palace forever.
Montezuma now rose with dignity, and dissolved the assembly, first
receiving,
however, the defiance of the Peruvian ambassador, in the name of
his insulted master, the Inca, for the discourtesy done both himself and the
prince, his son, by the breaking off of the contract of espousals.
The descendants of Montezuma and Eylla, for many centuries, continued
to fill the throne with honor, until the last bearer of the proud name lost his
power, his empire, and his life, by the hands of an invader, 'whose coming
was from. the rising sun,' and whose pathway was deluged in blood.`
Nephew,
The gods gave you life to elevate you, by its proper use, to
equality, after death, with themselves. You have defeated this intention of
your existence. The deity waits to receive back the gift of which you have
proved yourself unworthy. Degraded, dishonored, and despised, you can no
longer wish to live, and, like a brave man, have professed your desire to die.
This last virtuous wish, unhappy prince, I have seen fit to enable you to
fulfil, although, if I measured your punishment by your guilt, I should
condemn
you to live. May the river of death purify thy soul, and may the
gods yet grant you to begin a new existence in another state! Thou wilt
find the last best gift of heaven to man that hath outlived his honor, in the
cup I send thee! I commend thee to the gods.
Ulyd,
Emperor.
'